VOL. I. 2
CHAPTER I.
I have got
A seat to sit at ease here, in mine inn,
To see the comedy; and laugh and chuck
At the variety and throng of humours,
And dispositions that come jostling in
And out.
Ben Jonson
The New Inn
.
The
little town of Raymond, in the state of
Mississippi
,
was in the utmost commotion. Court-day
was at hand, and nothing was to be heard but the
hum of preparation for that most important of all
days in the history of a country villagethat of
general muster alone excepted. Strange faces and
strange dresses began to show themselves in the
main street; lawyers were entering from all
quarters
saddlebag
and sulky lawyersmen who
cumber themselves with no weight of law, unless it
can be contained in moderately-sized heads, or valise,
or saddle-bag, of equally moderate dimensions.
Prowling sheriff's officers began to show their hands
again, after a ten or twenty days' absence in the
surrounding
country, where they had gone to the great
annoyance of simple farmers, who contract large
debts to the shop-keeper on the strength of crops yet
to be planted, which are thus wasted on changeable
silks for the spouse, and whistle-handled whips for
Young Hopeful the only son and heir to
possession
,
which, in no long time will be heard best of
under the auctioneer's hammer. The population of
the village was increasing rapidly; and what with the
sharp militia colonel, in his new box coat, squab
white hat, trim collar and high-heeled boots, seeking
to find favour in the regiment against the next
election
for supplying the brigadier's vacancy; the
swaggering planter to whom certain disquieting hints
of foreclosure have been given, which he can evade
no longer, and which he must settle as he may; the
slashing overseer, prime for cockfight or
quarterrace
,
and not unwilling to try his own prowess upon
his neighbour, should occasion serve and all other
sports fail; the pleading and impleaded, prosecutor
and prosecuted, witnesses and victims,Raymond
never promised more than at present to swell
beyond
all seasonable boundaries, and make a noise in
the little world round it. Court-day is a day to
remember
in the West, either for the parts witnessed
or the parts taken in the various performances; and
whether the party be the loser of an eye or ear, or
has merely helped another to the loss of both, the
case is still pretty much the same; the event is not
usually forgotten. The inference was fair that there
would be a great deal of this sort of prime brutality
performed at the present time. Among the crowd
might be seen certain men who had already
distinguished
themselves after this manner, and who
strutted
and swaggered from pillar to post, as if conscious
that the eyes of many were upon them, either in scorn
or admiration. Notoriety is a sort of fame which
the vulgar mind essentially enjoys beyond any other;
and we are continually reminded, while in the crowd,
of the fellow in the play, who says he loves to be
contemptible. Some of these creatures had lost an
eye, some an ear, others had their faces scarred
with the strokes of knives; and a close inspection of
others might have shown certain tokens about their
necks, which testified to bloody ground fights, in
which their gullets formed an acquaintance with the
enemy's teeth, not over-well calculated to make
them desire new terms of familiarity. Perhaps, in
most cases, these wretches had only been saved
from just punishment by the humane intervention of
the spectatorsa humanity that is too often warmed
into volition, only when the proprietor grows sated
with the sport. At one moment the main street in
Raymond was absolutely choked by the press of
conflicting vehicles. Judge Bunkell's sulky hitched
wheels with the carriage of Col. Fishhawk, and
squire Dickens' bran new barouche, brought up from
Orleans only a week before, was staved all to
flindersso said our landladyagin the corner
of Joe Richards' stable. The 'squire himself
narrowly
escaped the very last injury in the power of a
fourfooted beast to inflict, that is disposed to use his
hoofs heartilyand, bating an abrasion of the left
nostril, which diminished the size, if it did not, as
was the opinion of many, impair the beauty of the
member, Dickens had good reason to congratulate
himself at getting off with so little personal damage.
These, however, were not the only mishaps on this
occasion. There were other stories of broken heads,
maims and injuries, but whether they grew out of
the unavoidable concussion of a large crowd in a
small place, or from a great natural tendency to
broken
heads on the part of the owners, it scarcely falls
within our present purpose to inquire. A jostle in a
roomy region like the west, is any thing but a jostle
in the streets of New York. There you may tilt
the wayfarer into the gutter, and the laugh is
against the loser, it being a sufficient apology for
taking such a liberty with your neighbour's person,
that business is business, and must be attended to.
Every man must take care of himself and learn to
push with the rest, where all are in a hurry. But
he brooks the stab who jostles his neighbour where
there is no such excuse; and the stab is certain
where he presumes so far with his neighbour's wife,
or his wife's daughter, or his sister. There's no
pleading that the city rule is to take the right hand
he will let you know that the proper rule is to give
way to the weak and feebleto women, to age, to
infancy. This is the manly rule among the strong,
and a violation of it brings due punishment in the
west. Jostling there is a dangerous experiment, and
for this very reason, it is frequently practised by
those who love a row and fear no danger. It is one
of the thousand modes resorted to for compelling
the fight of funthe conflict which the rowdy seeks
from the mere love of tumult, and in the excess of
overheated blood.
If there was a sensation among the arrivals at
Raymond, there was scarcely less among the
residents
.
The private houses were soon full of
visiters
,
and the public of guests. Major Mandrake's
tavern was crammed from top to bottom; and this
afflicting dispensation led to the strangest
disruption
of anciently adjusted beds and bedsteads. Miss
Artemisia Mandrake, for example, was compelled
to yield her cushions, to a horse-drover from
Tennessee
,
and content herself with such sleeps, as she
could find in an old arm-chair, that stood in
immemorial
dust in a sort of pigeon-roost garret. It
was to this necessity, we may be permitted to say
in this place, that she for ever after ascribed her
rheumatism, and a certain awry contraction of the
muscles of the neck, which, defeating her other
personal charms, was not inaptly assumed, by the
damsel herself, to have been the true cause of her
remaining, up to the time of this writing, an
unappropriated
spinster. Major Mandrake has certainly
2*
had excellent reason to repent his cupidity. The
rival tavern of Captain Crumbaugh was in equally
fortunate condition with that of the Major. They
were both filled to overflowing by midday, and
after that you could get a bed in neither for love
nor money. And yet the folks continued to
arrive
;
folks of all conditions and from all quarters,
in gig and sulky, or on horseback; some riding
in pairs on the same donkey,and not a few
short-petticoated
damsels, led by curiosity, from the
neighbouring farms, and mounted in like manner,
on battered jades, whose mouths, ossified by
repeated
jerks, now defied the strenuous efforts by which
the riders would have sent them forward with some
show of life and spirit, as they emerged from the
forests into the crowded thoroughfare.
Well, there's a heap of folks still a-coming, and
where in the world they'll find a place to lie down
in to-night, is a'most past my reckoning. I'm sure
the major ha'n't got another bed left, high nor low;
and as for the captain, I heard him tell Joe Zeigler,
an hour ago, that all was full with him. Yet, do
look, how they are a-coming. Can't you look, Jack
Horsey, if it's only for a minute. You hav'n't got no
more nateral curiosity than
Shut up, Bess, you've got enough for both of us.
What's it to me, and what's it to you, where the
folks sleep. Let them sleep where they can; there'll
be no want of beds where there's no want of money.
If they have that, the captain and the major will
take good care that they have every opportunity to
spend it. As for you, go you and see after the
poultry
;
court-time is a mighty bad season for chickens;
they die off very sudden, and the owner is not
always
the wiser of the sort of death they die. Push,
Bess, and see if you can forget for awhile the
business
of the two taverns.
The good wife was silent for a space, but this was
the only acknowledgment which she condescended
to yield her stubborn and incurious husband. She
did not leave her place at the window, but continued
to gaze with the satisfaction of a much younger
person
,
at the throng in the thoroughfare, as it received
additions momently from every new arrival. At
length the stir appeared to ceasethe carriages to
disappear; horses vanished in the custody of bustling
ostlers, and their riders, making amends for the day's
abstinence, on a dry road, might be seen, in great
part, at the bar-room of the Major or the Captain,
washing away the dust from capacious throats by
occasional draughts of whisky or peach brandy.
The latter article seemed most in demand at the
house of Captain Crumbaugh. He had the art of
preparing it to perfection; and Crumbaugh's peach
was, in my day, a sort of proverb with all who
travelled
in his parts. Major Mandrake took care to
have the very best whiskyof particular strength
and peculiar flavour; and there was a class, and
this no small one neither, that might readily be found
to give it preference. I class myself among none of
these. The oily excellence of the peach of
Crumbaugh
is still a flavour on memory's waste;
(query, taste?) and whisky was never a
favourite
of mine, though I have partaken of it along
with governors and judges, senators and saints.
But to return to the curious Mrs. Horsey. The
dispersion of the crowd, as it ceased to furnish her
with any new subjects of interest, necessarily left her
somewhat more free to remember the injunctions of
her husband; and she was about to turn from the
window, with a long drawn sigh of weariness, or
dissatisfaction that the show was over, when a
smart-looking
youth, whom she did not know, rode up to
her door.
Oh, Mr. Horsey,a gentlemanon a fine roan
horsehe's at the doorI reckon he wants to see
some of us, and maybe comes to look after a
lodging
for to-night. I knew the major was full, and
the captain
Now, the devil take the major and the captain,
and all the taverns in the state, since they drive
every thing out of your brain that ought to be there;
was the angry speech with which the stubborn
husband
interrupted the wandering soliloquy of his
spouse. Why don't you see what the stranger
wants, woman?you heard his knocking, and there
you stand, guessing about tavern business, and such
matters as you've no need to think, much less to
speak about.
La! John Horseyyou're too positive and
contrarious
;
not let a body think
No! What the devil should you think for?
that's my business, I tell you now, as I've told you
a good hundred times before. But go to the door;
don't stand there staring like a gray owl in a green
bush; go and open the door and see what the man
wants, unless you desire that I should get up with
my lame leg and show him in. Won't you go, I ask
you.
Well, John, don't you see I'm going? You're
always in such a fret.
Enough cause too, with such a trouble as you
are.
Yes, sometimes I'm any thing but a trouble;
there's no word you have too good for me; and then
agin
There's none too bad; said the splenetic
husband
,
finishing the speech as she had begun it;
but go to the door, as if you had some life in you,
or the stranger will batter it down before you get
there.
There was some reason, indeed, for the
apprehension
expressed by Horsey, as the applicant for
admission
,
seeing that no heed was given to his first
summons, yet hearing, without doubt, a buzzing of
the sharp controversy going on within, had renewed
his application with redoubled force, employing for
the purpose the but of a loaded whip, every stroke
of which told like a hammer upon the plank. The
dame started in compliance with the clamours from
without, rather than the impatient commands within;
for she still seemed panting for another word, and
muttered between her teeth, as she slowly moved
towards
the door, something which, to the jealous
authority
of her liege lord, seemed to denote a
resolution
still to think as she pleased and when she
pleased, in spite of his declarations against her right
to do so.
Look you, Bess, go to the door: and move a
little more quickly, if you don't want to make me
mighty angry. See what the stranger wants; and
remember we don't keep a lodging-house any longer.
We have no room; we want no company.
This was spoken in those subdued tones, and with
that show of suppressed and striving feeling, which,
perhaps, denote a greater degree of earnestness and
resolution than any words might do. The effect
upon the wife was instantaneous, and her hand was
soon upon the lock.
Remember, we have no lodging, murmured the
husband, as the door opened. I only wish I were
a mile or two back in the woods, where I mightn't
be worried as I am about board. There was a
time when I might have been glad of a good stand
on the road, but it's not so now. I can live like a
gentleman, and why should I be bothered to get
breakfasts, and see after strange horses, for people I
shall never see but once, and don't want to see at
all? I'll
The words of the stranger, spoken in bold, free,
musical language, which reached the ears of the
invalid
at that moment, put an end to the soliloquy.
Mrs. Horsey, ma'am?
He might swear to it, if he knew only half as
much as I, exclaimed the invalid.
The stranger, a tall, well-made youth of
twenty-five
or thereabouts, meanwhile, drew up his steed,
lifted his cap handsomely from his head, like one
born a courtier, with a grace that found its way
instantly
to the lady's heart, and proceeded in his
inquiries
.
I have been advised, Mrs. Horsey, by a
particular
friend, to seek lodgings at your house during my
stay in Raymond. Can I have them?
Before the good lady, prefacing her denial with a
long apology and a pleasant smirk of the face, could
bring out what she was preparing to say, the rough
voice of the sultan from within, gave his answer to
the stranger.
Can't have 'em, my friendthis is no
lodging-house
no
room to spare.
Very sorry, indeed, said the old lady.
Not sorry at all, stranger, said the
truth-speaking
Horsey; for you see, if we wanted to lodge
you, the thing might well enough be done. But we
don't set out to keep company, and there are taverns
enough in the village.
Scarcely, if the story is true, that they are all full,
replied the stranger; but let me alight and see you.
I have a message to you, madam, and to your
husband
from my friend Carter, who tells me that he
lodges with you, and that you could easily find me
lodgings also for the little time I mean to stay in
Raymond.
The effect of this speech was instantaneous upon
the man of the house. He barely heard the youth
through ere he replied,
Eh! what's that you say, my friend? Did you
say, Carterwas it Ben Carter that sent the
message
?
The same, replied the youth, while entering the
house.
And why the dl, stranger, didn't you say so
at first, without any prevarications. What's the
use of this cursed long palaver, when two words
could have done the whole business. Of course we
can give you lodgings. Ben Carter told you
nothing
but the truth. He has a habit of speaking the
truth which would be very good for many other
people to take up, not meaning you, stranger, for if
you be a friend of Ben Carter, I reckon, it's like you
are of the same sort of stuff.
You speak only as my friend deserves, Mr.
Horsey. Carter is the very man you describe him.
True in all his words, and just in all his dealings
with men, it is my pride in esteeming him one of the
most valuable and closest friends I have. It is not
amiss, Mr. Horsey, to add that he has an opinion of
you, no less favourable than yours of him.
Tush, young man, soft soap don't tickle me at
my time of life, replied Horsey with an Indian
grunt of seeming indifference. I am as I am, and
it's no great matter what I am, seeing that I'm of
little use in this world at present, and likely to be of
less; yet it's not a bad thing to have the good words
of them that's good. It sort o' reconciles a man to
a great many evil things that might otherwise bring
him a mighty deal of trouble. And Ben Carter is
a good man,when did you see him last?
Some ten days ago. He left me at Monticello,
and was on his way to Jackson, from which place
he promised to return directly to this. He was to
meet me here to-night.
Well, I reckon he'll be as good as his word, if
there's nothing to stop him on the way. He's
mighty punctual to his business, and when he says
he'll do, you may count it done. True as steel, is
Ben Carter, and it's no use to say farther. Bess,
let's have something. What'll you take, stranger?
there's some mighty fine peach, some of Crumbaugh's
peach, as they call it, which is pretty much the same
as calling it the very best in Massissippi. I have
some old Monongahela besides, which I can speak
a good word forsugar, Bess.
The beverage was soon prepared, and the two
were about to drink, when Horsey reminded the
other of a degree of inequality between them which
needed to be reconciled before they could properly
drink health together.
You have all the advantage on your side,
stranger; my name's John Horsey,that, it seems,
you know already; but yourswhat's your name?
There's no pleasure in calling a man `stranger'
every minute, when you're talking and drinking
together
all the while.
True, replied the stranger; but I never thought
of that. My name, Mr. Horsey, is VernonHarry
Vernon. It is not improbable that you have heard
it before from my friend Carter.
Don't recollect, don't think I ever did. Vernon,
Vernonit's a good name enoughcomes smooth
and easy to the tongue as a gentleman's name ought
to do always; but Harry, Harry Vernon! You
wasn't christened Harry, I reckon, Mr. Vernon?
Must have been Henry, and they call you Harry for
short.
For short, say you? Well, it may be so,
replied
the stranger with a laugh, but long or short,
I was never called by any other since I have known
myself; and never, until this moment thought of
asking which of the two I had the clearest right to
make use of.
The old people living, Mr. Vernon? Your
health, sir, in the meantime. That's what I call
peach brandy, sir,no make b'lieve,none of your
whisky run through peach timber such as they give
you at Orleans. Old Crumbaugh warrants that
stuff, and gets his price for it. Did I hear you, Mr.
Vernon? the old people, you said they were living.
Neither, sir.
Try another sip, Mr. Vernon, said the other
consolingly, peach perfectly harmless; Crumbaugh
keeps the temperate society house; warrants his
peach; calls it sobriety peach; and so you've lost
both parents, Mr. Vernon?
Bothall, sir. I may almost exclaim with the
Indian, that there runs no drop of my blood in the
veins of any human being.
Don't say that, Mr. Vernon, don't say that. It's
much more than any man can say, and be certain.
Fathers, sir, are apt to leave children where they
never look for them; there's something of that sort
at my own door, Mr. Vernon, and so
La, John, how you do talk.
What, you're there, Bess, are you? The
chuckle of the veteran was arrested, and probably a
long string of confessions, by the timely ejaculation
of his wife, who happened to be busy in the closet,
these women, Mr. Vernonbut you're married?
No!
Be thankful, young masterit's a pleasure then
to come, if it comes as a pleasure, which is
something
like Bazil Hunter's pea crop, `a very doubtful
up-coming.' You will run your race like the rest of
us, and come up at the post as usual, but it won't be
VOL. I. 3
the starting-post, I tell you! You was saying
something
about the Indians, and that brought up some
recollections of mine when I was among them. I've
been among all the Southern Indians, except the
Catawba. I've never been among them, and I reckon
there's but few of them now left to see; but I've been
among the Creeks and the Cherokees, the Choctaws
and the Chickasaws, and there was another tribe,
when I first came into these parts, that I hear nothing
of now, called the Leaf River Indians, there was but
few of them, and I think they belonged to the
Chickasaws
,
but they were the handsomest Indians I ever
did see in all my travelling, and I begun early. I used
to trade, when I was little, a mere sprout of a boy,
from Tennessee, through the mountains, into North
and South Carolina,then after that to the
Massissippi
;
and many's the time I've made out to carry a
matter of five pack-horses,I and three other lads
of Tennesseethrough the very heart of the `nation,'
without so much as losing a thimble, and almost
without having a scare. In one of these journeys I
saw my wife, then a mere bit of a girl.What! not
gone, Bess!It's gospel truth, Mr. Harry Vernon,
from that day there's been but one pack-horse in our
family, and that's Jack Horsey himself.
La! now, John, cried the wife with uplifted
hands, the stranger don't know your ways, and
he'll take for true what you're a-telling him. That's
jist the way with him, stranger
Stranger!the gentleman's got a name, Bess.
Mr. Vernon, Mr. Harry Vernon; remember, now,
it's not Henry, but Harry Vernon.Mr. Vernon,
this is my wife. You'd soon enough find that out,
if you lodged with us awhile. And now, Bess, be
off, and look after supper;a silent wife, and a
singing
kettleit's not always we can have 'em, Mr.
Vernon, but that only helps to make them the more
desirable.
Mrs. Horsey was not to be sent off, however, in
so conclusive a manner. The complaints of Horsey,
touching the constraints upon him of his better half,
were ludicrous enough; contrasted, as they were,
with the almost despotic sway which he exercised at
every instant. Perhaps a latent desire to show her
guest that her good lord did not have it altogether
his own way, led her on this occasion to dispute his
commands.
It's not time for supper, John Horsey. Now
that you're lame, you seem to think of nothing but
eating and drinking.
Did mortal husband ever hear to such a woman?
was the exclamation of the sultan. The wife
mistook
for compliance a mildness in the speech which
was only due to the astonishment of the speaker.
She continued:
It's a good hour to supper yet. We have our
hours, John Horsey, jist the same as the major,
and
Now dn the major, and dn the captain, and
dn all the taverns in Massissippi. Thus it is, Mr.
Vernon, a wife will make a man swear, sir, when
there's nothing in the world farther from his wish.
You see, sir, my wife will do and say just what she
pleases, as I told you. She will always be bringing
up to me those cursed taverns; but I'll stop that, or
there's no snakes! Look you, Betsey!
Here his finger guided her to the door, through
which she made her departure in the shortest
possible
space of time. A look had done what, probably,
no word in John Horsey's vocabulary could have
achieved half so soon.
A good woman enough, Mr. Vernon; but
women
,
sir, are women; and the very best of them are
incapable of serious concerns: they are all triflers
mere childrena sort of gingerbread creatures, the
ginger of which lasts a deused sight longer than the
molasses. But, as you were saying, Mr. Vernon,
you are a lawyer.
You have guessed rightly, sir, that is my
profession
indeed. Your ears are something better than
mine, I think, for I do not recollect ever having told
you the fact.
Nor did you, my dear fellow, replied the old
man with a hearty laugh. It was, as you say, a
mere guess of mine, and Jack Horsey's guess is
seldom
short of the mark. It's a way with me to take
for granted, just as if my neighbour had said it, the
thing which it appears to me reasonable to think he
will say; and I could ha' sworn, from a rakish,
sharp, lively something about your face and eyes,
and a little swing of your shoulders, that you was a
lawyer, or going soon to be one. You practise in
Monticello.
I came from Monticello last, but it is not my
residence.
Well, but you practise law somewhere in
Massissippi
.
I shall in season, I doubt not, provided I get
clients. Young lawyers find in this their chief
difficulty
.
They practise with some such rule as
governs
a good angler,where the fish bite best,
there you are sure to find them. For my part, I am
but too lately admitted to determine where the best
water lies for my purposes; I have not yet thrown
out my lines.
And that you won't do till your hooks are well
baited, for that I believe is one of the first lessons
which a lawyer learns. I know'd if you had begun
to practise, you hadn't done much in that way; your
chin is almost too smooth, though that's no
misfortune
as times go, if so be your tongue proves smooth
and oily like your chin. But there, it seems to me,
Mr. Vernon, that your difficulty lies. I'm afraid
you ha'n't got the gift of the gab. I haven't heard
you say much.
And for a very excellent reason, Mr. Horsey:
you haven't given me a chance. Your tongue has
utterly outwagged mine, and I yield the palm to you,
where my vanity, perhaps, would allow me to yield
it to few other persons. But, it is now my turn, and
if I do not prove myself quite your equal before I'm
done with you, I will at least convince you that I am
not entirely without my claims to take rank among
the mouthing part of my profession.
Spoken like a man, and a good fellow, cried
Horsey, with a hearty laugh, and with no sort of
discomfiture at a retort as just as it was unexpected.
I have better hopes of you now, Mr. Harry
Vernon
.
'Ecod, you gave it me then,a raal dig in the
side with a sharp elbow. The truth is, I am a leetle
too much given to hearing myself talk, and what's
worse, I can't easily be convinced that it is not my
neighbour whose tongue all the while has been
making the
hellabaloo
. Somehow or other, thinking
of what the man ought to say, that I'm talking to,
I come to think he says it, and half an hour after,
could almost take my Bible oath to the fact. It's a
strange infirmity, Mr. Vernon; don't you think so?
Very,very strange, said the other, smiling at
the seeming seriousness of his companion.
And so, you were telling me you practise law in
Orleans.
No
Ah, Mobile, yesMobile you said.
Nay, nay, Mr. Horsey, I said neither, replied
the youth laughing out aloud; this is only another
sample of the infirmity you were telling me about
3*
another of your guessesand I will not tell you how
far from the truth. But it is my turn now, and while
I throw another stick upon your fire, and draw my
chair a foot closer, I will prepare my thoughts for
the cross-examination which I mean to give you in
turn.
Ah, well; but `wait a bit and take a bit,' first,
as we say in Massissippi. We'll have it over after
supper, when you may try your skill upon me, for a
first witness, and see what you'll get for going. I'm
a tough colt to ride, when the bit hurts me; and he
must be a skilful rider, indeed, if he saves himself a
throw.
We shall see, we shall see, said Vernon
confidently
,
and with a smile of good nature; while the
old man, with whose humour the course which the
youth had taken seemed admirably to tally, told him
a dozen anecdotes of the young lawyers round about
the country, with most of whom he had had sharp
passes of wit, and in all cases, according to his own
phrase and showing, had come down uppermost.
CHAPTER II.
If you look in the maps of the 'orld, I warrant you shall find, in
the comparisons between Macedon and Monmouth, that the situations,
look you, is both alike. There is a river in Macedon, and there is also,
moreover, a river at Monmouth; it is called Wye at Monmouth, but it
is out of my prains what is the name of the other river; but 'tis all
one, 'tis so like as my fingers is to my fingers, and there is salmons in
both.
Shakspeare
Fluellen
.
The
landlady spread her little board, on which a
broiled chicken and sundry smoking slices of ham
soon made their appearance. Chubby biscuits of
fresh Pittsburgh flour, formed a pyramidal centre in
the table arrangements, and a capacious bowl of
milk stood beside them. Coffee, which is the
sine
qua non
in a western supper, was of course not
lacking; and appetite, that commends even the
unflavoured
pulse and the dry roots, rendered necessary
no idle solicitings to persuade our young traveller to
do justice to a meal, in preparing which, the good
hostess had spared nothing of her store.
Fall to, Harry Vernon, and don't wait on me,
was the frank command of Horsey, as, grunting and
growling the while, he worked his rocking chair,
foot by foot, up to the side of the table, and drew
from it one of the plates into his lap. Vernon had
his good word for the hostess, and in a little time
proved himself to be in possession of the best wisdom
of the traveller, whom experience teaches, that good
humour and a cheerful spirit are the most valuable
stores which he can take with him in a course of
western travel. We recommend them to all your
ill-favoured bookworms who carry their stilts with
them into our swamps and forests, and fancy all the
while that they can see any thing, who never cease
looking on their own pedestals. Vernon had been
already something of a wayfarer. Necessities of
one sort or another, had schooled him into a
knowledge
of men of every sort, and it was a rational
boast which he was sometimes wont to make, in the
glow of a youthful and pardonable vanity, that he
could go from Tampa bay to the Rocky mountains,
and win good usage and a smile with his supper
every night. Such a brag may be made by few
with safety. Invidious comparisons constantly rise to
our minds as we think of the little and peculiar
luxuries
of our homes, and we lose our appetite for that
which is before us, by suffering our feeble fancies to
trouble us with the memories of what we cannot
have. Your Englishman is a traveller of this sort.
From the first jump which he makes from Dover, or
Liverpool, he begins to smell out novelties which
are always offensive to self-conceit, simply because
they are novelties. His sole business from that
moment
,
seems to be to discover in what things his
present differs from his past, and to find fault and
grumble accordingly. He turns up his nose with
such an inveterate effort from the beginning, that it
remains in that inodorous position for ever after.
But we have nothing now to do with him.
Vernon
,
as we have said, was of very different temper;
lively, bold, frank, generous, he was just the sort of
person to commend himself to the southern and
western people. His dignity never apprehensive of
doubt and denial, was never on the watch to take
offence at every thing in the least degree equivocal.
To avoid controversy, to avoid the crowd, to yield
gracefully in argument, and to forbear pressing his
advantage at the proper momentwere some few
of the maxims by which, avoiding every prospect of
offence, he gained the most substantial victories, as
well over the hearts as the understandings of those
with whom he contended. Fluent in speech, with a
memory abounding in illustration and anecdote, a
fancy lively and playful, an imagination vigorous
and bold, the profession which it seems he had
chosen, appeared to be that in which, above all
others, he promised most to excel. Such, we may
add, was the opinion of his friends, and such, were
it proper for the narrator to predict, was the
appropriate
event after the lapse of that usual period of
probation, to which it is natural and well that all
ambitious minds should be subjected. Precocious
greatness is generally very short-lived.
There was that superiority in the mind of Harry
Vernon, which never suffered him to think himself
above the occasion. He could descend from the
abstract to the practical with an ease and rapidity
at once singular and successful. To rise from the
actual to the abstract is a far easier matter, and
hence it is that we have so many theoretical men,
who always fail in the attempt to carry out their
own principles. To accommodate himself to the
understandings of those he addressed without
degrading
his own, was another of those advantages
the result of actual experience in the busy world,
which, added to the store of our young traveller, and
supplied to him as it was supplied to others, in many
instances, the lack of money and the aid of powerful
friends. Before supper was fairly ended he had shown
some of these possessions, and Horsey, the rough,
garrulous, grumbling invalid, was not unwilling to
hear another voice than his own occupy those
intervals
in the progress of the meal, which he had
seldom
failed to fill up hitherto from his own resources,
and to his own perfect satisfaction. The youth
requited
him with story for story, joke for joke, and
when, at the usual hour for retiring in the country,
where folks are very apt to go to bed with the fowls,
the worthy dame intimated to Vernon that his bed
was ready whenever he wished to lie down; her
spouse blazed out like a splinter of fat lightwood
bade her be gone and not send the young man to
bed at dark, to tumble about half the night in
sleeplessness
and stupor.
That's the way, Harry; and by the Lord
Harry
,
it's a monstrous vexing way, my wife has got.
She goes to bed at dark, you see; she's kept up a
little longer to-night than's customary with her; and
before day-peep she's a-stirring, and a-tossing, and
a-calling up the niggers. Now, you see, I can't
sleep soon o' nights for the life of me. I never
could ever since I was a lad driving my pack-horses
over the mountains. 'Twas then I got a sort o'
habit of sitting up late. When we'd come to a
running
water, or a spring, or some such fine place for
a camp, why we'd drive stakes, cut bushes, make
tents, and fasten our horses. Then we'd feed 'em,
git up a fire, and set to preparing our own feed.
Well, we'd have to do all this mighty slyly, I tell
you, for fear of the Indians. We'd git away from
the main track, hide our horses pretty deep in the
small woods, and put our fire in a sort of hollow, so
that nobody could see the blaze. Then we'd git
round it, put down a hoe and a griddle, bake the
biscuit and broil the venison. Ah! Vernon, it was
mighty sweet eating in that fashion. There's no
meal I ever ate that come up to them. And as we'd
eat, we'd talk about what happened to this one, and
what happened to that; and how many scares and
dangers we'd had; and then we'd steal off, taking
turns at that business, to look after the horses, and
up and down the road, to see all was right. And
so we'd pass the night, Mr. Vernon; and in the
morning, betimes, we'd brush up and gear the
animals
,
and put on our packs, and be ready for a start
by dawn; and many's the time, Vernon, my boy, in
them days, that I've taken `Sweetlips,' that ugly
long-shanked rifle you see there in the corner, and
dropped a turkey from his roost in the tree jist over
the horses, so fat that his breast-bone split open by
the time he thumped the ground. Ah! them days,
Mr. Vernon, them blessed days, with all their
troubles
,
and all their dangers, I'd give all I'm worth, or
ever hope to be worth, if they only were to go over
again. But it's no use pining for what can't be got.
We can't always be young, Mr. Vernon, and if we
could, pack-horses are gone out of use, and there's
no Indians to make us lie snug and suspicious,
telling
stories that helped to frighten us the more. The
Choctaws will soon be gone, and the Cherokees and
Creeks, I s'pose, though they're something farther
off, and I don't know so much about them. You
can tell though, Mr. Vernon, seeing you're jist from
Mobile.
Horsey, with an inevitable tendency, had
recurred
to his old practice. The youth replied good
humoredly,
I haven't seen Mobile for months, Mr. Horsey;
but you forget, it is my turn to question now, and
lest you should start off, and throw me out again,
I will begin at once. Have you had many visiters
in Raymondmany strangers, I mean, until this
time, within the last two weeks?
Psha, Harry Vernon, say what you want in plain
terms. Is it a man, or a woman, you're in chase of?
It's a man, I reckon; for Ben Carter a'n't the chap
to encourage young lawyers to be running about the
country after women. Am I right in my guess,
Vernon?
Suppose I tell you, then, a woman?
Well, I've nothing to say; but I hardly think it.
Are you sure it's a woman, now?
Nay, there's no certainty about it. A small man,
in woman's clothes, might very easily pass himself
off for one, said Vernon, with an air of musing.
Yes, nothing very strange in that, if he had to
make a run for it, and had hope of outdoing his
enemy's head sooner than his heels. Your chap
has no such hope, I reckon, Mr. Vernon.
It may be not; but man or woman, Mr. Horsey,
have you had any strangers in the village lately?
Well, I'm the very last person in Raymond to
see strangers, unless they come to me. I ha'n't
walked out of the house for the last five weeks, and
jist make out to hobble up to bed, when it's time to
lie down. There's my wife, now,she can tell you
more than I. She sees every thing and every body, I
think, that comes into the village; I don't know but
she sees whoever goes out of it. She's a most
curious
woman,my wifelikes to pry into every
body's business, and know all about them, but she
means no harm; good womanshe's fast asleep
now.
A hearty laugh of Vernon followed these praises
of the wife, which she was no longer in a condition
to hear; and drawing nigher to his companion, he
renewed his inquiries, though with a slight change of
topic.
Your wounded limb disables you from seeing
much of the world at present, Mr. Horsey, but it has
not always disabled you, and there are some parts
of it which I know you have seen, about which I
would like to obtain some informationthe `
Choctaw
purchase,' for example.
How do you know I've been in the `nation?'
demanded Horsey, with some gravity.
You told me so, yourself.
The dl I did! Can it be possible! Well, it is
strange how difficult it is, when a man's growing old,
for him to keep his own secrets. Out he pops with
every thing he knows, and with the help of a long
tongue, he will empty the longest head. Are you
sure I told you I had been in the `nation,' Mr.
Vernon
?
I think so, sir.
You are not certain, then. It is very probable
you are mistaken, sir. I should wish to think so, for
I look upon it as one of the last signs of dotage when
a man can't keep his secrets.
But this is no secret, surely. Can there be any
harm in stating so simple a fact, demanded the
youth, with curiosity mingled with amusement to
discover in a man of so much good practical sense,
an apprehension so ridiculous.
So simple a fact has hung a man before to-day,
as your law books should have told you. Not that I
fear to be hung for any thing I've done, whether
among Creeks, Cherokees, or Choctaws. I've had
something to do with all of them in my time, and can
show some marks of my acquaintance with the red
rascals; but then there's no sort of need to tell every
thing a man knows, even when it does him no harm
to tell it, and when a man's brains become like a
bottle of sassafras beer, ready to boil over when a
little warm, I think he may as well cast up his
accounts
,
and get his coffin made. But, sir, I have
been in the `purchase' and maybe can tell you what
you want to know.
To what portions do the people go who settle
there now? Which are the portions most in demand?
Oh, there's a sprinkling of our people every where,
VOL. I. 4
there's no stopping them when they begin. When
you think you've got to the end of the settlements,
there's still some further on; and the business of the
squatter always carries him over the line of the old
settlements. But the quiet folks that have got
something
to go upon and something to lose, they stick
a little behind. It does seem to me, that, if it's them
you're asking for, you'll find a smart chance of them
between the Yazoo and the Big Black, mostly along
the edges of the Big Black, and not often west of the
Yazoo. A heap of little towns are growing up along
the Black. I could name to you a dozen, but it's no
more use naming little towns than little chickens,
there's so many of them, and they all look so much
alike.
And the gamblers, Mr. Horsey, where do they
keep?
Nowhere in particular, and that's the same as
saying every where. ButI needn't ask you,
seeing
you're Ben Carter's friendI was going to say
I hope you wasn't looking after company among
them.
No, no; but are they numerous? demanded
the youth with interest.
As peas in a fair season.
They are audacious, too?
Dd infernal impudent, if you let them. If
you go up in those parts it's my advice to you to
keep finger on trigger and use your pistol at a word.
It's a'most always the quickest hand that gets off
with fewest scratches, and to stand palavering with
a scoundrel, that you know to be a scoundrel, about
what's right, and what's not right, is, to my way of
thinking, little better than begging an ass not to kick
you, while you make a slow journey under his heels.
But you're not always sure that it is a
scoundrel
Sure as a gun; there's no chance of a mistake
if you keep your senses about you. But that's the
trouble. It's how to keep your senses about you,
Harry Vernon, that's the greatest question. Now,
I'm clear to say, that it's only by getting drunk,
being put in a passion, or having soft soap poured
down their backs, that men lose their senses, and
afterward
lose every thing beside. If they wouldn't
listen to smooth words from every stranger they
meet; if they wouldn't stop to hug the whisky
bottle
,
instead of taking a quiet kiss and walking on;
if they wouldn't get into a passion about every fool
speech they hear, then I'm clear, they'd never get
cheated out of their money, and knocked on the
head, like a blind puppy in a dark night. Now,
Harry, you see the danger before you. So long as
a man keeps his senses, there's not so many dangers
in life, and they may be all got over by a quick head
and bold heart. But it won't do to believe in
sweet-spoken
strangers, and it won't do to quarrel about
a fool jest, and it won't do to get drunk. I wouldn't
advise a lad to go up into the Yazoo, now, while its
unsettled, as I may say, and none but scatterers
about; but if you must go, mind your own business,
make no more friends than you can help, and keep
sober as a judge. Come, sir, you've been talking
long enough, let's have a toddy.
Thank youno more, Mr. Horsey; and let me
correct your errors as we proceed. It is you and
not I, who have been doing the talking for the last
half hour; and to say truth, I am so well pleased
with your eloquence, that I'm for having more of it.
No gammon, my lad, none of that. But I'm
willing to tell you all I know, so long as you don't
ask for it all. What's next.
What officers of the law may be found in those
parts, in the event of my being in want of them?
Lord keep you from law officers in your own
case, my lad, though as a lawyer, it's like enough,
you'll be making them toil hard enough in the
business
of other people. But what makes you think of
themdo you calculate on any trouble?
Nay, that matters not, my friend. Should I
have any trouble, which a man of the world, who
lives in the world, must always look for, I should
like to know in how much I may depend upon the
countenance and protection of the law in the places
to which I'm going.
Depend upon a hickory sapling and your own
teeth rather. Depend upon steel and bullet, Harry
Vernon, when you're on the Yazoo. What the
dl would a man expect to find, out, away on the
very skirts, as I may call it, of civilization? Would
you have gentlemen and Christians in a part of the
world where there's no timber cut, no lands cleared,
no houses built, nothing done, but what's done by
the squatters and that sort of people? No, no: your
only chance is a keen eye, a quick hand, and a
steady head. Trust to these in the Yazoo; there
are few better friends any where.
The counsel of one who has certainly done more
by their help than most men; responded Vernon,
with a compliment that was not displeasing to the
veteran, and showed a degree of intimacy with his
history on the part of his guest, which proved him
to have been no inattentive auditor of himself and of
his friend Carter;but, continued the youth,
what can you tell me of the `Braxley settlement.'
Not a syllableI know nothing good of it,
however
;
though I couldn't say, more than from general
report, any thing bad agin it.
What of `Ford's camp?'
Nothing.
Georgeville?
That's sprung up into a village since my day.
I believe it's a poor affair:but two or three stores
or thereabouts. I never saw the place but once, and
then there was but one; I didn't stay in that longer
than to take a sup of whisky. If there's nothing
better in it than the whisky, don't go there. It's a
place to shun, Mr. Vernon.
What of Lexington?
Don't know the place.
Squab Meadow?
Never heard of it.
There's a little village called Lucchesa, that lies
somewhere upon Green Briar Creek in Carroll
County. Do you know any thing about that? it's a
new village.
New to me, yet I think I have heard the name;
there are several little villages grown up since I've
been in those parts, and, for that matter, they grow
up every day. I know the country well enough, but,
bless your soul, Mr. Harry Vernon, it's no sign of
ignorance in Massissippi, not to know the towns by
their names. We can't find names for half of 'em.
This was said with some signs of impatience, and
the youth, though still seemingly desirous of pressing
for information which was yet desirable to obtain,
was compelled to rest contented with the imperfect
statistics already gleaned, which, perhaps, no
continued
examination of the old man would have
rendered
more complete.
I am afraid I have wearied and worried you,
Mr. Horsey, without much help to myself. What I
get from you is to the full as satisfactory as the
comparisons of that categorical personage, Captain
Fluellen; `There is,' says he, `a river in Macedon,
and there is also, moreover, a river at Monmouth,'
&c.
The youth gave in full the passage which has been
4*
prefixed as an epigraph to this idle chapter, and
which we care not to repeat again. Portions of the
quotation, however, and the authority referred to,
seemed to disquiet our landlord.
Fluellen, said he; where was he captain?
There's Captain Fenelon, I know, that heads the
`Buck Swamp Rangers,' and that's the nearest name
to it, I can think of. I know Fenelon, and a mighty
clever fellow he is; a little too fond of the girls
perhaps; but that only hurts himself. It isn't him,
you mean.
No, noFluellen is a captain far more famous,
I think, than Fenelon will ever become. He is one
of the honoured names of Shakspearethe world
renowned
That dd player-man! cried the impatient
landlord, interrupting the eulogy which our hero had
begun, of the merits of the divine bard. Look
you, Mr. Vernon, if you want that we should keep
friends, and part friends, say no more of that
player-fellow
and his cursed books; don't I beg you.
The youth was silent from wonder for a few
moments
,
to behold such an earnest countenance as the
speaker wore while he uttered this serious
remonstrance
.
When he recovered breath, it was to
expostulate
.
In the name of wonder, and all the wonders,
Mr. Horsey, but how is this? How is it that you
are so hostile to a writer whom all the world joins
to honour and applaud?
The world, Mr. Vernon, may honour as it
pleases, and it frequently gives honour where very
little is due. But it's the honour which the world
gives to this same player-fellow, which has done
more to make me an unhappy man, than any thing
in the world beside.
The wonder of the youth increased, and a single
word conveyed his farther interrogation:
How?
I have a son, Mr. Vernon; you haven't seen him
in my house; nor, till this minute, have you heard
his name from my lips; nor, perhaps, from the lips
of Ben Carter, though you may have got a good
deal out of him. Well, sir, this son of mine, got in
with some of these player-fellows at Mobile or
Orleans
,
and they carried him to their blasted
stage-houses
,
where he got possession of these Shakspeare
books, and he's never been worth a picayune since
that day. He took up with the stage-fellows, got to
making a dd fool of himself before the Mobile
people, and had the impudence to send me a paper,
a printed paper with a great heading, and his name
among the rest to play some pieces out of
Shakspeare
.
Sure enough, that very time my neighbour
here, Major Mandrake, that keeps one of the taverns,
being down on a visit to Mobile, saw Tom Horsey,
with his own eyes, come out in front of the whole
people, with a gold crown upon his head, and
covered
with spangles, and dressed up, in a most
ridiculous
way beside, jist for another chap, who come
out afterwards, to stick him with a sword. And
there he rolled about over the floor, until he died,
and the people shouted and clapped their hands, as if
he had done some great thing, and it was jist that
dd stupid shouting and clapping, that led the
fellow
to make such a bloody fool of himself. But
mind you, I don't mean to say that he died in airnest
it was all pretenceall make b'lieve; but, by the
Eternal, Mr. Vernon, I'd rather a thousand times he
had died in raal airnest in a fair fight, than to have
fallen into such a folly, and brought disgrace upon
his family.
A playful commentary upon this speech rose to
the lips of Vernon, as the old man concluded; but
the youth saw that the grief was too serious and
sacred, to suffer any light or irreverential remark.
He contented himself with inquiring into the fate of
a lad in whom he began to take some interest, the
rather, perhaps, because he saw the matter in a less
severe light than the father, and possibly because he
thought that the backwoods boy, wanting in all the
advantages of education and city life, who could
relish Shakspeare to so great a degree, must be of
something more than ordinary metal.
And where is your son now, Mr. Horsey?
The saints know best, Mr. Vernon. Tom
Horsey
has not darkened these doors since March gone
was a year.
But you hear from him?
Ay, sir, and of him. I hear from him when he
wants money, and of him when he has it. He makes
me hear when he's out, and makes every body else
hear when his pockets are full. The misfortune is,
that this Shakspeare fellow never comes alone. He
brings with him late hours and strong drink, and
damned bad company, Mr. Vernon; and what with
him and them, Tom Horsey is in the broad road to
destruction.
But do you provide him with money when he
demands it for such indulgences.
Fill your glass, Vernon; let us drink, and say
no more. I'm a surly, crabbed sort of creature;
they will all tell you so; and yet, they all wonder, and
I wonder at it myself, that I have so little strength
to do the things that I resolve upon. The boy's my
only boy, bad as he is, Harry Vernon; and he gets
more money from me than I ought to give him.
But, what's that? Did you hear nothing, Mr.
Vernon
?no
voicesnonejust below the window?
The old man trembled with sudden agitation,
while bending forward to listen, as indistinct accents
fell upon his own and the ears of his guest. In
another
instant, the room rang with a loud burst of
declamation
from without, in which Vernon detected
some lines from the bard whom the old man had so
terribly denounced, but which now seemed to awaken
in his mind any other than hostile feelings.
Meanwhile
the voice proceeded, and the passages spoken
seemed not inappropriate; and, perhaps, were chosen
from their partial fitness, to those relations between
father and son, which had formed the subject of the
previous conversation. The passage was from the
speech of Bolingbroke, third scene, fifth act of
Richard
the Second.
Can no man tell of my unthrifty son?
'Tis full three months since I did see him last:
If any plague hang over us, 'tis he.
I would to heaven, my lords, he might be found;
Enquire at London, 'mongst the taverns there,
For there, they say, he daily doth frequent,
With unrestrained, loose companions, &c.
The eye of the father caught the glance of his
guest earnestly fixed upon him, and in that instant
he recovered his composure.
Now, out upon the scrub! he comes at last, with
his player-verses in his mouth
Ay; but how truly do they suit, Mr. Horsey!
was the reply of Vernon.
Yes, indeed, well enough; but will they cure the
mischief that they tell of? No, sir; this graceless
rascal thinks it handsome to swagger with a belly
full of whisky, and a brain full of Shakspeare, at
the lowest tavern in the city of New Orleans. By
the Lord Harry, but he comes not in my door!
A loud knocking from without answered this
resolve
;
and, following the glance of the father's eye,
Vernon rose quietly and opened the door to the son.
CHAPTER III.
This fellow I remember
Since once he play'd a farmer's eldest son;
'Twas where you wooed the gentlewoman so well;
I have forgot your name; but sure that part
Was aptly fitted, and naturally performed.
Shakspeare
.
The
prodigal waited for no invitation to enter, but
bounced in, the moment the door was opened.
Seeing
the stranger, he stopped short for an instant, his
deportment bearing equal marks of confident
assurance
,
and a reasonable consciousness of his own
demerits. The habits of the player-men, however,
got the better of his misgivings, and, without
yielding
any farther notice to Vernon, after the first
glance, he advanced towards the father, prefacing
his movement with a hearty rowdy salutation, which
made the old man wince in his seat, at the gross
disregard
of his dignity which it betrayed.
Ha, dad! there you are, prime and hearty, as
though you never had a son, to `bring you cares for
inconsiderate youth,'and how's the old lady, `our
venerable mother, keeps she well?' gone to bed, I
reckon, and fast; so I take it for granted she's as she
should be, and you, sir, you and
Here his eyes wandered to the seat which Vernon
had re-occupied.
Puppy! exclaimed the father, can't you leave
off your cursed player nonsense, Tom Horsey, when
you're in a gentleman's presence. That, sir, is my
friend, Mr. Vernon, Mr. Harry Vernon, of Natchez,
or New Orleans, or elsewhere.
Sir, Mr. Vernon, of elsewhere, I am glad to
know you. `If I mistake not, thou art Harry
Monmouth
,'
was the prompt address of the actor,
extending
his right hand, with an air of princely
condescension
.
Monmouth, no! cried the more literal father;
Vernon, I said, Tom Horsey,Mr. Harry
Vernon
.
The samea good name, I think, sir, a very
good name, and I'm glad to know you. Mr.
Vernon
,
as I said before, `there's matter in this;' and,
some allowances must be made for the prejudices of
age, and a hard school, sir, against the drama. It
is only in the presence of gentlemen, sir,to his
father,let me tell you, that players should speak.
The very element they live in, sir, is in the applause
of the gentle and the wisetheir pursuits are `
caviare
to the general;' and let me tell you, sir, that
you risk not a little when you give way to this harsh
and most unjust manner of speech, in respect to a
profession, whose ill report while you live, it is said,
will do you more harm, than a bad epitaph when you
die. You will find the passage in Hamlet,for the
rest, sirhave you any thing to drink.
This speech was pretty evenly divided between the
father and his guest. When it was concluded, he
turned to the little table that stood between the elder
Horsey and Vernon, filled a glass for himself, and
drawing a chair from the corner of the apartment,
placed himself, with a show of
sang froid
, which was
not altogether felt, directly beside the father. The
old man could no longer restrain his indignation.
You dd conceited squab, where have you
been these eight months? Put down your glass, sir,
until you answer me.
Dry throats must needs make short speeches, sir
I have been at school.
Do not mock me, Tom Horsey!don't go too
far, boy, in playing your dd theatre stuff on me.
I can't bear it much longeryou'll put me in a
rousing passion.
We'll have a rouse to-night, sir,Mr. Vernon,
`the king drinks to Hamlet.' Don't think, sir,
addressing
his father, don't think I shall forget you`
dad, but your glass remains unfilled. Shall I help
you?
Help yourself and be dd. Answer my
question
.
Where have you been these eight months?
Egad, sir, that's the most puzzling of all questions,
and the most correct answer that I can make you is
that which I have made already. At school, sir! In
the great school of the world, sir, I have been
acquiring
my humanities or getting rid of them. Don't
you think me reasonably improved?
What have you done with the money I sent
you?
Paid my schooling with it, sir.
That is to say, you drank it out at taverns upon
your roaring companions, your drunken actors, your
bully gamblers, and all that strange sort of cattle that
you herd with in Orleans.
Alas! my father, revile not thus. Wherefore
will you speak of things which you know not. Have
more charity, I pray you. As for the poor sums of
money which you sent me, they were as nothing to
the good which they procured me. They brought
me to a knowledge of the fine generous spirits, who
are as much above the dirty wants and slavish
necessities
of common clay, as the divine Shakspeare
is beyond all the thousand priests and pretenders that
officiate at the altar of the muse. Had you sent me
ten times the sums you speak of, I had freely shared
them all with the noble fellows whom your
parsimony
has chiefly compelled me to leave.
Ay, and where would their generosity have
carried
you, you ridiculous spendthrift. To the
Calaboose
to
the Calaboose, you rascal. If it has not
already carried you there. Pitiful sums indeed!but
you shan't impose on Mr. Vernon. You shall say
what these pitiful sums are; you shall tell him what
money I sent you, and let him say whether I have
not been almost as great a spendthrift as yourself.
No doubt, no doubtI make no question, dad,
but that your extravagance has always exceeded
mine. I am but a chipa small chip of the old block;
and
Why, you impudent rascal, my spendings have
been altogether on you. If I have to reproach
myself
with any extravagance at all, it is only in having
given you the means to make a fool of yourself.
`Wisely, indeed, and worthily bestowed'you
do not repent, sir, of having provided for my
subsistence
?
I have done more, sir. What amount did I send
you by Bill Perkins?
Some fifty or a hundred dollars, as I think.
As you think! as you think! Tom Horsey, will
you lie too? Have your player-fellows taught you this
among their other accursed lessons. Speak, are you
in earnest!
The old man's voice trembled, and passion seemed
to be succeeded in his choking utterance by a fear
that falsehood was to be included among the other
profligacies of one whom his own tenderness had
rendered somewhat incorrigible. Vernon watched
the scene with curious interest, and he remarked the
sudden flush which mounted up into the son's cheeks
at the accusation, as if conscious innocence revolted
within him at the injustice. Such was the
impression
VOL. I. 5
of the spectator, and it was confirmed by the
effect which it seemed to produce in the youth's tone
and general manner.
You are a little too hard with me, sir, was his
reply. I admit that you sent me some money by
Perkins.
Three hundred, not fifty, sirnot fifty or a
hundred
,
but three hundred dollars, Tom Horsey.
Right, sir; Perkins brought me that sum, which
I trust you did not really think me base enough to
deny. When I said less I simply meant to compute
it by the time it lasted. It was the very sum you
name, sir, but it might just as well have been the
fiftyit was very short-lived.
Very well, sir, said the father, glad to have an
excuse to forbear reproach and harsh language.
And had it been fifty times as much, do you think
it would have lasted much longer with such
company
as you keep? No, sir, they would have spent my
gains and your gettings, and counted my thousands
as you have learned to do by fifties and hundreds.
But that's not all. You got money from my factor
in Orleans. What sum got you, for to this day I
have never learned.
I sent you two thousand dollars by Major
Mandrake
.
I got it, but the crop sold for more, sircotton
was selling at sixteen; I had the price current of the
week, and have it now. What did my cotton bring?
You sent me the money but no account of sales, what
was done with that?
'Gad, sir, I know not, unless we used it to make
snow one night at Cdwell's when the storm gave
out. I remember, we were rather short of snow.
Tom, Tom, don't rouse me, don't put me in a
passion. I'm sick,I can't bear it easily; and
besides
,
I don't want Mr. Harry Vernon to see what a
dd fool I am to let you treat me as you do. What
did you get from my factor in all? let me know that.
You sent me two thousandwhat did you keep?
Well, sir, as nearly as I can remember, about
seven hundred
Seven hundred!'
There may have been a forty or fifty tacked on
to it; but it certainly was not more than that.
Suppose
we call it seven hundred and fifty dollars`the
very head and front of my offending, hath this
extent
,
no more.'
And enough too, in God's name, to ruin any
man that's got so little to go upon as I, responded
the father; but there is more, Tom Horseyyou
took a hundred and seventy dollars with you when
you went; you collected ninety dollars from Michael
Hopper for so many bushels of corn; and what
have you done with Martin Groning's note for
sixty-seven
dollars. If you got that, it makes
But I haven't got that, dad. Groning's a great
rascal; `there must be lawings ere you get that
gold'we shall have to set Master Phang upon him,
dad, before he settles.
No, let him go. It's but a poor sixty-seven
dollars
,
and I shouldn't miss so small a matter, if my
own son didn't help me to the loss of a great deal
more. But now count up, count up, Mr. Vernon,
these moneys as I call them out to you, and then say
whether I'm parsimonious, or whether there's a
spendthrift in my family, that'll let out at a thousand
mouths what his father was compelled to take in at
one.
Nay, don't count up, I beg you, dad, cried the
profligate; why will you bother Harry Monmouth
with these `small chores.' To count up money that
you have not, is to impoverish memory most
cursedly
.
The very thought of my spendings is a misery,
since it only the more forcibly reminds me of the
little that is left to spend. Wherefore have I left my
company, `my comates in exile,' but that the candle
was at the last snuffwherefore have I trudged
homewards `on weary legs'
You don't mean to say that you walked from
Orleans here, Tom Horsey? cried the father, to
whom the last fragment of a quotation uttered by
his son suggested a new cause of apprehension.
Not all the way. I had a cast in a steamboat
as far as Monticello, and a fling in a wagon for some
twelve or fourteen miles above; but, by the Lord
Harry, the widow's mare did the rest.
Why, where's your horse?
Gonegone the way of all flesh.
Deadhow was thatthe botts?
Ay, botts enough to take off a dozen horses.
The sheriff suspected I was out of money, and not
able to keep him any longer; and so relieved me of
the charge.
Seized for debt! exclaimed the father aghast;
a colt of my own raisingseized for debt!eat his
head off in a livery stable!ah, Tom, Tom! you'll
kill me yet!
At the suit of one Stubbs, a tailor; a fellow that
helped me to fit up my wardrobe, and brought suit
for all his suits. Thus was I nonsuited. But I
punished the scoundrel, you may be sure. I basted
him with his own yard-stick the night I left Orleans,
till there wasn't a seam in his carcass that couldn't
count stitches. You shall hear particulars some
day, Mr. Monmouth; a devilish good story
but
Look you, Tom, this gentleman's name is
Vernon
,
and not Monmouth. None of your tricks, I
tell you.
Vernon, is it? I ask pardon, but I thought it
was MonmouthHarry Monmouthit was Harry
you saidI'll swear to that.
You've a free tongue to swear, Tom Horsey;
but how would you like an oath of mine to cut you
off with a shilling, and leave you to the miserable
life you have so miserably begun. Answer me that,
sir: what would you think of such an oath? and
wouldn't it be justly deserved, Mr. Vernon?
Nay, father, do not bother Mr. Vernon any more
in this matter, and above all matters eschew the sin
of swearing. Oath taking is a bad business, and
unless you take some such rash oath as that you speak
of, I think I may promise you with safety to do
nothing
again rashly as long as I live. I am come
home to be a sober fellow, follow the plough, drive
the wagon, bleed horses, and kill bacon. In short,
do just whatever is needful to make money, and keep
it afterwards.
Can you keep to this? cried the delighted
father, who desired nothing more than such a
concession
on the part of his son, as should save his
dignity, and obviate the necessity of more scolding.
I think soI'll try, sir.
Ah, Tom, for awhile only, I'm afraid. You'll
be reading in the newspaper about some new
play-house
or some new actor, and then, nothing will
suit, but off you must go to see for yourself; as if
the reading of it wouldn't do as well.
It shallit shall in future, dad. Don't be afraid
of me. I think I shall keep my promises this time,
for, do you see, whatever might be my own desires
to go to Orleans, the drubbing I gave the tailor,
Stubbs, will stand against me in the black books of
the law, and I have too great a respect for that
stately dwelling, the Calaboose, to risk the chances
of admission. As for the theatre itself, by my fears,
I have just as little reason to venture near it. My
5*
chance is all up with the American, and my hopes
with Cdwell; but for that, dad, it might have been,
that you hadn't seen me home to-night.
Well, whatever it was, I'm glad it happened so;
but you don't mean, Tom, that you quarrelled with
the actors.
Ay, with the very chief of themthe
manager
.
Well, the stars be thanked, I'm a great deal
gladder than before. There's no hope of making
up the matter, Tom, is there?
But little, unless you lend your help.
God forbid! I lend my help!I'd burn down
all their establishments, if I could. But how was
it, Tomwhat was the quarrel? You didn't lick
him, too, as well as the tailor?
Egad, no! The boot was on t'other leg! It
was because I didn't lick him, that we quarrelled;
it was, by my soul!
Come, come, Tom, don't, now; none of your
dd nonsense. We know it's all gammon that!
No man would quarrel with another because he
didn't lick him.
True as gospel, dad, professionally speaking.
An excellent adventure, by the way, Mr. Vernon,
and I must tell it. Dad, fill your glass!an
excellent
jokefill, Mr. Vernon! You shall hear how I
came over the managerhow I struck him, even
when `soaring in his pride of place.'
I thought you said you didn't strike him, Tom?
demanded the matter-of-fact father.
You shall hear, sir. Understand, you are at the
American Theatre in New Orleans, Cll,
manager
;
and your humble servant doing third and
fourth-rate characters at tenth-rate prices. Ten
dollars a week is scarcely enough for gentlemen of
my cloth; and just at this time Stubbs was writing
to me in the very language of Master Shallow, `I
beseech you, Sir John, let me have five hundred of
my thousand,' in other words, of less classical grace,
`let me have but half of my bill.'
Drop the theatre talk, Tom, whispered the
father
;
drop it, dn you, if you can.
It was necessary to remit, to raise the wind.
This was the difficulty. I had got rid of the seven
hundred, and the three hundred, and the other odd
hundred; and I had even drawn the week's salary
in advance. I had the horse, it is true, but the colt
was a favouriteI had helped to raise it; and, by
Jupiter, I had much sooner have parted with my
velvet plush breeches, than with Corporal.
The old man gave an approbatory chuckle as
this show of proper feeling escaped his son in his
narrative.
But you should have gone to the factors, or
wrote to me for the money, Tom, and redeemed the
nag. I'd rather than twice his value that you had
not lost him.
The son winked to Vernon, as he replied
Ah, dad, Stubbs is not the only tailor in Orleans;
and one suit is not all that a poor devil actor has to
suffer before his wardrobe's complete. As I was
saying, I knew of no present mode of raising the
wind, and I had but one mode left me. I went to
the manager, implored him for a loan, on the strength
of future services. He denied me; `but was I to
be denied?' You shall hear how I fixed him.
That very night I was to play Richmond to his
Richard. The manager had a very strange notion
that he was a tragedian, and was, therefore,
continually
going out of his element, to try waters which
were quite beyond his depth. He did well enough
as a genteel comedian, but that did not satisfy his
ambition; and among those who knew nothing
better
,
he did monstrous well. I remember the first
time I ever saw him was in tragedy. I went to
Orleans, dad, if you remember, with uncle Wat
Stevens
,
and he treated me to the show.
Damn him for it, was the fervent ejaculation
of the father. The son proceeded without heeding
the interruption.
Like the rest of the gaping countrymen around,
and the house was full of them, I thought him a
wonderful
man, though I soon learned other things when
I looked a little more into the matter. But the opinion
of the manager himself underwent no change. He
was still ripe for tragedy and nothing else, and was
that very night, when Stubbs sent me his impudent
letter, to play RichardI, Richmond. We went
through the piece very well, till we got to the death
scene. Then Richard tried his best, and I buckled to
him. I had wounded him, and he had fallen; but that
was nothing to a man determined to outdo Kean, and
make the ghost of Garrick gape with astonishment,
and shiver in his shroud. He rolled and writhed
about the stage, keeping up the fight as he did so,
and striving to show his skill of fence while in the
death agony. It was then that the thought seized
suddenly upon me to avail myself of the particular
predicament in which he stoodlay ratherto bring
him to an accommodationto compel him to my
own terms. What do you think I did, Harry
Monmouth
Master
Vernon, I meanhow do you think
I fixed him? A thousand to one you can neither of
you guess.
Vernon confessed his inability, and the father,
now an attentive auditor, and a pleased one too, as
he beheld the evident attention of his guest, and
observed
the more modest demeanour of his son,
disclaimed
with equal readiness any ability to
conjecture
the
ruse de guerre
made use of by the debtor
to extort from the dying actor, the loan he found
necessary
to keep him from his tailor's clutches.
I knew itI knew it was beyond you both,
was the chuckling response of Richmond to these
admissions. It was a thought of my own, and my
own only; and what was it, you will ask. Hark
ye then in your ears; it was simply to forbear
killing
him. I began to play slowly to evade his strokes
and avoid pursuit of him. You may imagine the
predicament of Richard, half-dead, and inviting the
fatal blow. He called to me in a hoarse whisper,
while twisting and writhing after, and sticking at
moments, when, in order to keep up appearances
with the audience, I suffered our swords to mingle.
`Why the devil don't you play, Horsey?'
I answered him in a suppressed voice, speaking
in the gorge of my throat, so that he could
distinctly
hear the emphasis which I employed, and
supposed
that it could not altogether escape the
hearing
of the audience. Yet, such was not the case.
It is an art of speech which I possess, and of which,
Mr. Vernon, you shall have a sample some day.
`Look you, Richard,' said I, `it was only to-day
I asked you for a matter of seventy dollars to pay
off a dd tailor that was troubling me. You
refused
me, was that done like Richard?'
`Strike on, you dd fool,' said he, `or I'll
strike you off. What are you talking about? Strike!'
`Never till you consent to let me have the money.
You sha'n't die by my hands to-night, Richard. I'll
leave you half-dead upon the stage, and for once
there shall be no catastrophe. Will you let me have
the money?'
`Yes, yes, any thing,' was his answer; `but strike
on, the pit is getting impatient. Strike! strike!'
We tugged away quite heartily then for a few
seconds, the house roared with applause, and some
of the groundlings, after he had received the
coup de
grace
, actually
encored
the performance, clearly
signifying
a desire that he should do the death over again.
But, would you think it, the ungrateful tyrant
refused
to let me have the money the next morning,
and added to the enormity of his conduct by giving
me my walking ticket. Was it not shocking, Mr.
Vernon? Did I not merit the money for the humour
of the thing? But he had no soul to feel itnone,
none!
Before Vernon or the father could answer the
question, or comment upon the transaction, another
person entered the apartment and interrupted the
dialogue. The introduction to the new-comer must
be reserved for another chapter.
CHAPTER IV.
It tastes
Of rank injustice, and some other end
Time will discover; and yet our grace is bound
To hear his accusation confirm'd,
Or hunt this spotted panther to his ruin.
Shirley
.
The
new-comer was one of whom the reader has
already heard. The quick eye of Vernon
distinguished
his friend at a glance, nor was that of
the other less observant. The warmth of their
embrace
,
when they met, spoke for a deep mutual
regard
between the two, not only superior to that
which belongs to ordinary friendships, but something
more than could be expected to appear in the case
of persons so unequal in years. Mr. Carter could
not have been less than forty-five; a tall, well made
man, with a fine, full, but dark countenance; an eye,
black and lively, but of benevolent expression; and
a look of amenity and kindness which denoted a
degree
of soberness and subdued thought, in which the
buoyant spirits of the youth of twenty-five, could
scarcely find much that was congenial. Vernon
could not have been much more than twenty-five;
his temperament was evidently lively, if not rash;
and good humour and a playful spirit, seemed to
predominate in his disposition. The gravity, the
almost
sadness, of Carter's countenance, was
unreflected
in his own; and yet, it may be added, the
sympathy was quite as close between them, as could
be hoped for under any circumstances; and
whatever
might be the difference of their moods and
wishes, under the influence of unequal ages, there
was none of that exacting severity, on the part of
Carter, or of that distaste to discipline, on the side
of Vernon, which might endanger the relation. If
Carter was grave, even to melancholy, he was, at
the same time, benign and indulgent. He could
make allowance for the impatience of youth,
esteeming
it, perhaps, a fault that was not without
its virtues, in a country which calls more
imperatively
for boldness and adventure, than any
other more sober qualities. If he smiled at the follies
of youth, it was the smile of indulgence, or, at most,
of pity, and not the ascetic grin of scorn and
male-volence
.
Vernon, on the other hand, warm,
impetuous
,
and lively, never once forgot the superior years
of his patronfor such was Carternor suffered his
veneration to undergo diminution, because the latter
sometimes encouraged him by the familiar freedoms
of the companion. The utmost confidence prevailed
between them, the result, possibly, of a mutual and
perfect
knowledge of their several claims and character.
The observation of Carter had taught him that his
proteg was a man of the strictest honour, the nicest
sensibility, the most fearless courage, and the finest
talent. Vernon was no less assured of the high
virtues
of one who had been to him a protecting and
wisely indulgent parent, in the place of all others,
from his very first moment of reflecting
consciousness
,
to that in which they meet the reader.
The entrance of Carter was the signal for the
flight of the
soi-disant
actor. His genius quailed
before
the eye of the new-comer, in whom he
recognized
a well known monitor, who did not spare his
rebuke, and whose influence upon the father, had
tended in no small degree to restrain his
eccentricities
,
by diminishing the money, which the old man
was but too ready to yield to his requisitions. Still,
the deportment of Carter was kind and gentle to him,
as to all the rest, and as it was, habitually, to every
body. His salutation differed not from his wont,
when he shook his hand, and bade him welcome
home, after so long an absence. But this
forbearance
in no wise encouraged the erring Master Tom.
From a dashing,
nonchalant
personage, he became
suddenly subdued to the awkward country lout, only
anxious to know how best to effect his escape
without
challenging attention to his movements. This he
was soon enabled to do, when he found the regards
of Carter chiefly bestowed upon the youth, and his
shoulder turned upon himself. He stole away, and
was followed after a little while, by old Horsey,
whom a sturdy negro assisted to his chamber. It
was there that he again found Young Hopeful, and
renewed the various dialogue, a sufficient sample of
which the reader has already had. We will not
distress
him by a repetition of the dramatic slang, with
which Tom replied to, and annoyed his father; whose
chief objection to the quotations, lay, perhaps, in the
difficulty which he found to comprehend them. Our
present purpose carries us back to the apartment
which we left. There, the two, apparently resuming
a subject already partially considered, were earnestly
engaged in the adjustment of topics, the business of
which will form no small portion of the ensuing
narration
.
It may serve us, therefore, who design to
trace its progress to the end, to give some heed to a
conference which will, perhaps, the better enable us
to understand some of its objects, and of the
histories
of those who are most conspicuous in its
details
.
You are resolved then, my son; you know all
VOL. I. 6
the adventureits troubles, its dangers and the
numberless
difficulties that surround it. These, you see,
at least, if nothing beside; and with a perfect
knowledge
of these, and with the farther prospect of
incurring
these risks and difficulties without effecting
your purpose, you freely and voluntarily determine
upon the journey?
Freely, willingly, my dear sir, and with a
satisfaction
,
not easily expressed, that I find you willing
to confide to me a charge of such importance, was
the unhesitating reply of the youth.
The other squeezed his hand in silence for a few
moments ere he resumed.
Perhaps, Harry, since such is your resolution, it
is due to you that I should unfold myself a little
more. Your confidence in me deserves it, and were
it not so, the confidence which I have in you leaves
me without fear that I incur a risk in giving you my
nearest secrets. From this I can suffer no harm,
now, not even in feeling, by its revelation. But a
few months, nay, a few weeks ago, it had been
otherwise. I am now free to relieve myself from
the accumulating pressure of a griefa grief of
youth, that I have learned to silence, if not subdue,
but which at length breaks from all restraints
when I am no longer young. You have seen this
man?
I have, sir.
Ay, but not to know him. He is my senior by
five years, but he was my associatemy friend
when we were both young. Boyish friendships are
of little value at any time, and in most cases they
are of evil consequence. The name is perverted,
the tie is not an enduring one, and, even if other harm
does not come of it, the effect is evil in teaching us
lessons of distrust, when genuine worth implores our
confidence, and true friendship might be had by
kindred
worth. But I will deal in facts and not in
maxims
.
William Maitland was my habitual associate
from boyhood. We came to Mississippi together,
and for several years I had no reason to regret my
confidence in him. We lived together harmoniously,
sought the same sports together, made the same
journeys
in company, and took pleasure in the same
society
.
My labours grew prosperous, however, and
his did not. This made him discontented. He left
me and went down to Orleans, where he invested
his capital in trade. Two years elapsed before I
again saw him. I had in the meantime become
acquainted
with the family of Col. Ralph Taylor, of
Pearl River. He was a worthy old gentleman, but the
chief attraction of his household in my eye, was his
youngest daughter Ellen. I loved her, Harry, with
all the ardour of a heart as purely unselfish in its
pursuit as belongs to mortal; but I told her not my
love. I feared to do it, as I saw nothing in her
deportment
which, to my watchful eyes, held forth any
encouragement to my hopes. Perhaps it was, that,
with all the doubts and timidity of a true affection,
estimating its own claims at the humblest rate, as
sincere affection is most always apt to do, I shrunk
from pressing upon her those regards which I felt,
and occasioned a kindred doubt in her mind of my
real purposes. I had reason to think afterwards that
I deceived myselfthat she really loved methat
but this is needless. Enough, that at this moment I
received a visit from Maitland. He came to borrow
money, and finding me not at home, and his wants
being pressing, he followed me to the residence of
Col. Taylor. There he saw Ellen; and, to shorten
a story already quite too long, there he won her.
But not at this first visit. He came back with me to
my residence, which was then at Woodville, and
procured the money which he required. But while
with me, he artfully procured from me all necessary
information with regard to the Taylor familyits
character, connexions and resources. I did not
reveal to him my feeling for Ellen, but he must have
seen it. A short time after this, while on a visit to
Natchez, I was seized with the yellow fever, which
nearly brought me to the grave. For days I
remained
without consciousness of what was going on
around me; for weeks without strength to leave
my chamber. In this time Maitland prosecuted
opportunities which I had seemed to neglect. He
pressed his pretensions upon Ellen, and in a
moment
of wilfulness of heart, such as seizes upon the
best of us at times, she accepted him. I had reason
to know afterwards that she had not been insensible
to my attentions, and that she was taught to believe
that I had trifled with her. William Maitland knew
of my illness all the while, but studiously withheld
the utterance of what he knew. The first knowledge
I had of my loss was the notice of their marriage in
one of the Orleans papers, to which city he removed
her a short time after the event. Since then I have
but once seen her, and then
Carter paused in his narrative as if struggling with
the climax of those emotions with which he had
evidently
striven earnestly, for some time before. He
rose from his chair and paced the room a while, the
eyes of Vernon in the meantime being fixed upon
the fireplace.
I had thought myself too old and too strong for
these weaknesses, Harry, but the affections which
grow up in solitude seldom become obtuse. Were
I a citizen, now, I could deliver you this narrative
with a smile; but, as I am, I almost regret that I
have begun it.
Do not, then, pursue it, sir, I beg you,at least
not on my account, said Vernon.
Nay, nay, Harry, it is begun, and the beginning
is half the battle always. I must now finish it, or
never. I trust, having opened my bosom to you, to
be better able to preserve silence on this subject for
ever after. The affair staggered me in regard to
Maitland's sincerity and faith. I was puzzled to
determine
upon his conduct; and my chief suspicions
arose, not so much from his having married, as from
the studious secrecy which he had observed towards
me on the subject. I got no letter from him; I
heard of no inquiry or invitationnothing, indeed,
of him or of his business, until he had removed her
to Orleans. He had need of me again. He became
the candidate for an office of great trust, and applied
to me to be his surety. It was then that I saw Ellen
Taylor for the first, and, I may almost say, the last
time, as the wife of another. She is in her grave
now; but it will not disparage her memory, with
you, my son, when I tell you, that it was from her
but half conscious lips, that I was taught to believe
that I might have been the happy possessor of her
hand, as, to the last, I was the possessor of her heart.
Do not attach blame to the pure spirit of her from
whom this confession came. It was while her mind
wandered in the delirium from which she never
recovered
,
that her sweet lips told me this blessed truth.
I kissed them, Harry, in a fond requital, when the
angel had left the tenement in which it had been so
troubled! I kissed them, Harry, when, colder than
the marble which was so soon to cover her, I well
knew that there was no danger that
his
lips would
remove the sad and sacred seal which mine had set
upon them!
The struggling tear of Harry Vernon soon
followed
that of his patron. His silence was the best
show of sympathy that his good sense suffered him
to make. The other after a brief pause proceeded.
6*
The surety I then gave is the cause of our
trouble
now, as you may readily suppose. But for her,
Harry, I had not given him my name, for I had
sufficient
reason then to distrust him; and, but for her
but that I still loved, rashly enough for any sacrifice
I had not been guilty of the greater folly of
persuading
our friend Gamage to a similar risk. The
defalcation of Maitland will nearly ruin Gamage as
well as myself. But this I cannot suffer. As it was
because of my entreaties that he consented to sign
Maitland's bond with me, I must save him harmless
as far as I can. To this point then, your commission
extends. Let Maitland give up the money which he
is known to have taken from the Bank, and we will
pledge ourselves not to prosecute, and I will secure
to his children,he has but twothe amount of
twenty-five thousand dollars, in any form of
investment
which he may prescribe, so that it be under
any disposal but his own. Nor shall he be left
otherwise
unconsidered in the matter. I will give him
my bond, stipulating the annual payment while he
lives of three hundred and fifty dollars, being a sum
quite sufficient for his wants in that privacy to which
he must, for his own and the sake of his children,
for ever after confine himself. He will see from this,
if he be not besotted and ripe for destruction, that I
have no disposition to pursue him with malice. But
my forbearance is no tribute to my regard for him,
any more than to his worth. But he is the father of
her
children, and I would wish to save them from that
shame and sorrow which justice might, without
compunction
,
freely visit upon him. You now
understand
,
precisely, the relation between us, and will
thus be better able to exercise that discretionary
power in any arrangement you may think advisable
to make, which you could not so well have done
without this knowledge. I am guilty of no
ill-advised
or idle flattery, my dear Harry, when I declare
my perfect willingness to rely upon your judgment
and to abide by any course which you may resolve
upon. I have found you always worthy; I doubt not
that your ability will keep pace with your worth.
But you have no easy task, and your hope of
success
will depend very much upon your being
unknown
to Maitland. But for the risk of spoiling all,
you should not go alone upon this mission, nor,
perhaps
,
should you have gone at all. My appearance
would alarm his fears and prompt his flight, and
indeed
,
the appearance of any stranger will have a
tendency to awaken his fears and compel his
caution
.
He, no doubt, wherever he may be, will have
his creatures on the watch, and be himself watchful.
Your genius must contrive its own modes for
disarming
his fears, and appearing in his
neighbourhood
as an ordinary character. I can give you but
little counsel that is not general. One rule is a good
one always among strangers in our country, and
that is to be secret, yet have no secrets. Utter
yourself without reserve, yet say nothing which had
better be reserved. Have no mysteries to your
neighbour, though every thought be hidden. This
is enough, your own reflection must do the rest. I
have wearied out your patience, Harry, but I have
now finished.
You spoke, sir, of his connexion with gamblers:
Is this certain?
Yes; he is known to have lost a part of the
property which came by his wife at faro in
Orleans
.
He is also known to have frequented places
of habitual resort by the blacklegs of that city. What
connexion he may have with them now, is simply
conjectural, but there is great reason to fear that his
separation from them will never be complete while
he lives. He had a passion for play which has
probably
grown upon him, and which will no doubt
lose him his ill-gotten spoils, unless he is very closely
and suddenly pressed for them.
May he not have lost these moneys already, sir,
may not his defalcation and flight have resulted
from his losses.
I hope not, and think not, for we happen to know
that the particular parcels of gold and paper which
he took, were in the Bank up to within three hours
of his flight.
That may be, sir, yet he may have appointed
the sums taken, for the payment of previous losses.
This is probable in part. I make no doubt that
he was compelled to appropriate in this manner, but
it seems scarcely probable that he would have
fore-borne
supplying himself with the means of future
indulgence
or support. That he did not appear at the
tables after the robbery, we know from those whom
the Bank set as spies upon them. Suppose,
however
,
that ten thousand dollars be already gone,
which will be a liberal allowance, we can afford
that,we must, indeed, and something more,but
let us struggle for the rest. I make no secret to you,
Harry, of the fact that my own responsibilities to
the Bank, and the resolve which I have taken that
Gamage shall go harmless, will leave me destitute,
utterly destitute,unless we recover something of
this loss.
My efforts shall not be wanting, was the simple
assurance of the youth; you have provided the
necessary papers, sir?
I will do so, and expect the other documents from
Orleans, by Friday next. You will be compelled
to defer your departure until then. Meanwhile, it
may be well if you attend upon the court. It will
help to conceal your present object,which it is
important
that you should conceal here as elsewhere,
if you should appear like the rest of your profession
seeking its usual opportunities. I doubt whether
you'll get business, but that lack is too general among
beginners to occasion wonder; and it will be quite
enough to show that you want, and would not refuse
it, if it were to offer. But let us take a breathing
spellyou have ridden well to-day, and so have I.
A good night's sleep will freshen our minds, and
probably
help us to new ideas. You saw the youth,
the son of Mr. Horsey,had he been long before
me?
An hour, perhapsnot more.
A thoughtless, improvident lad, with some
capacity
,
but little ballast. With his own turn of mind,
and his father's indulgence, he will come to nothing.
Caught young, and in other hands, he would have
done well. It is too late now. I need not counsel
you to say nothing that he should not hear; but,
keep your papers close; make no memorandums
that he may read. He is honest, I believe, but has
a prying, curious disposition, as much the result of
an idle, restless mood, as of any thing else. Let
him not feed it at our expense, when a little timely
prudence may save us any risk. And now to bed,
Harry, as Master Tom would phrase it, with what
appetite we may.
CHAPTER V.
Clack
.
But are there players among the apprehended?
Scentwell
.
Yes, sir, and they were contriving to act a play among
themselves just as we surprised them, and spoil'd their sport.
Clack
.
Players! I'll pay them above all the rest.
Richard Broome
, 1632.
The Merry Beggars
.
When
Harry Vernon entered the hall the next
morning, the first person he met was Master Thomas
Horsey, who encountered him,
selon des rgles
, in
the most approved fashion of the theatrical world,
with a fitting quotation, to provide himself with
which, he had, no doubt, groped half the night
through his pocket Shakspeare.
`My cousin Vernon! welcome, by my soul!'
I've been waiting for you, sir, with the impatience
of a thirsty throat, to which any thing like delay in
the antifogmatic, is almost certain bronchitis. Here,
sir, is garden mintfresh, sirI pulled it myself; or,
if you prefer the animal julep, here is an eggI did
not lay it myself, but will warrant it quite as fresh as
the mint. The whiskey is at your elbow, the peach
at mine, and the sooner we fall to, the better. `A
good sherris sack hath a two fold operation in it.'
Which take you?none!
Horsey put down his own glass in wonder. The
idea of refusing a morning dram had never entered
his brain.
You are not serious, Mr. Vernon?you will
surely take one or t'otherthe peach brandy?
Neither, Mr. Horsey. You must excuse me; it
is not a habit with me to drink in the morning.
It is not, eh? Well, I'm sorrysorry for your
sake not less than my own. The habit were not a
bad one, Mr. Vernon, nevertheless; and I commend
you to better examples in this particular than it has
been your fortune to fall upon. I drink, sir, to our
better acquaintance. I should have relished much to
have had some conversation with you last night, but
that `learned Theban,' Master Benjamin Carter,
making his appearance, sent me off in a jiffy, and
dammed up my ideas quite as effectually as if he had
run the great raft of the Mississippi-bend into my
brain. He's a sober old boy, that, Harry
Monmouth
likes
not my merriment`he loves no
plays,' and still less players, `and smiles in such a
sort.' I tell you what, Master Vernon, though no
man can think of Ben Carter more worthily than
I do, yet, by the faith that is within me, I fear
him, somethingthat is `I rather tell thee what is
to be feared than what I fear.' He hath ever been
a sort of curb upon me; he sees through my follies,
when dad is about to reward them as virtues; and
the tricks which would triumph over every body
else, he seems to unravel as easily, and trace home
to the true author as certainly, as if he had a gift
of divining. He's a relation of yours, Master
Vernon?
No, sirnonean acquaintance of my father
and friend of the family.
You're from below?left the old people?
'Egad I had almost asked if you had not left them
with light heels and lighter heart. I've been so
much used to doing that sort of business myself,
that the suspicion was natural enough, though,
seeing you with Ben Carter, such a conjecture
would have been very foolish. You're a lawyer?
Come to plead at Raymond?got any business to
go upon yet? &c.
Young Horsey resembled his father in one respect:
he had all his curiosity. We have thrown into the
compass of one paragraph the hundred questions
which he contrived to ask before the rest of the
family made their appearance. In the sight of
Carter his ardour was something restrained, though,
in the mild, benignant countenance of the latter,
one would seek in vain for that sign of power to
which the young actor ascribed so much potency.
He finished his breakfast before the rest, and, as he
left the room, catching the eye of Vernon, he put on
the aspect and manner of an awkward clown,
terrified
at finding himself in so solemn presence, and
striving to leave it with as little noise as necessary,
by moving on tip-toe and backward to the entrance.
Once there, he bounded from the steps, and by a
single agile movement was in the middle of the road.
The next moment he might be heard, spouting a
favourite passage at the very top of his voice.
If Tom would only leave off that dd
player-book
,
began the father apologetically to Carter.
It is a folly that will do no harm, my good
friend, unless you stimulate it by harsh usage. The
book is innocent enoughit is not that, but the love
of praise, which turns your son's head. Listen to
his speeches patiently, and he will think you the best
audience he ever had; and if you can sometimes
contrive to clap your hands together in this manner
when he has concluded his speech
As they do at the theatre-houses? demanded
the father with some eagerness.
Ayeven so.
Well, Carter, what thenwhat'll be the good
of it?
I think it not unlikely he will be content to stay
at home with you and mind his business.
But he promises to do so now, Ben Carter. He
says he's done with Orleans and the play-houses.
He has good reason for it, I can tell you. He's
grazed upon the sheriff at Orleans, and had a queer
bout with the head man of the theatre. He told us all
about it last nightI didn't quite see into the fun of
the thing, but Tom says it was deused funny, and Mr.
Vernon was mightily tickled at the story. I think
there is a change in Tom, and as he promises so
fair
Don't rely too much upon his promises. He
cannot
so soon break away from his old habits, and must
be allowed some little farther swing before he
dismisses
his levities sufficiently to suffer him to come
home and go to work. Only do not by unnecessary
harshness drive him into them. Notice his follies as
little as may be, and tolerate his speeches even where
you do not exactly understand them. The scorn of a
father, not unfrequently drives a son to defiance;
when some little indulgence to his idle tastes, might
leave him free to see into their absurdities himself.
Let me warn you, however, to give him as little
money as possible. He wants but little in the
country
,
and where he asks for much, it is a sure sign of
profligacy. Do not expect to see him sober on a
sudden. I would rather he should not become so.
I should suspect him of a worse offence still, than
any you have against himhypocrisy. The best
sign in his favour, since his return, is that he still
continues his spouting, knowing your hostility to the
practicethough it may prove him wanting in proper
reverence, it saves him at least from the suspicion
of disingenuousness. Give him employment as soon
as you can, and let time do the rest. A sudden
change is seldom to be relied on; and a transition
VOL. I. 7
from one extreme to another, is almost always the
practice of a rogue.
But Tom is honestTom's no rogue, Ben
Carter.
I believe it, Horsey. Do you take care that
you do not make him one. It is not uncommon for
you to denounce him as a rogueto call him rascal
and scoundrel, and such abusive names as these. To
give him the rogue's reputation, is to take from him
one of the great inducements to be an honest man.
Beware that you do not this.
Meanwhile, the subject of this discussion was
pursuing
his walk, with all the heedlessness of a
wayward
mind, through all the nooks and crannies of
the village. He was busy seeking out old haunts
and old associates. Tom Horsey was popular with
every body in Raymond but his father. His
pompous
declamations, his noisy humour, the readiness
with which he joined in a joke, and the steadfastness
with which he pursued it, commended him naturally
to all the younger portions of the community; and
now that he re-appeared among them, there were
salutations on every hand. Smiles and pleasant
speeches, that inflated the vain heart of the youth to
the utmost, encountered him at every corner, and he
swaggered along the main street with the air of one
conscious that his movements were witnessed by an
audience far more indulgent than ever Richmond
found at Orleans, even when he bestrid the tyrant,
and commanded his own terms from the prostrate
and ungenerous manager.
There was a miserable little rookery that stood at
the western entrance of the village, where a still more
miserable sort of business was carried on by a man
named Hawkins. This man was an idle, worthless
creature, and his obvious pursuits were supposed by
many persons to be only a sort of cover for other
objects
which were, possibly, far more profitable, though
not so legitimate. In his shop might be seen a
barrel
of whisky, a kitt of tobacco, a few knives, pipes,
candles, and 'coon-skins; seldom any thing more;
but there were shed-rooms to his dwelling, and upper
chambers, which were asserted to be very well fitted
up, in which no limited profits were made out of the
ignorant and the unwary. Public justice had her
eye upon this establishment, but, up to the present
time, nothing had transpired of sufficient importance
to justify her in setting her hands upon the lintel.
The proprietor kept a closer watch upon her
movements
,
than her emissaries maintained over his; and
whatever might have been the suspicions of the
neighbours, Hawkins met them with a bold front, and
challenged their inquiries.
To this house the actor drew nigh. His approach
was watched by the proprietor and another man,
who stood with him at the entrance.
Here is the very chap himself, said Hawkins.
This is the younger Horseythe crazy actorwho
run away to Orleans, and paid the manager, it is said,
for permission to appear and spend his father's
picayunes
as fast as they are made. Yet the old fool
dotes upon him, and will leave himself bare to give
the youngster his buff breeches. By a little
management
we may get out of him all that we want to
know, or, at least, all that he is able to tell. He is
vain of his abilities as an actor, and by feeding his
swallow, we may easily pick his teeth.
Is it he that struts so? demanded the other.
The same. This stranger Vernon, lodges with
his father. It is known that he inquired for Carter
on his first arrival, and received directions to the
house of Horsey.
And what can this silly fellow know? If he be
the man you speak him, would they be fools enough
to trust him with any of their secrets?
ScarcelyI do not hope for that. But Tom
Horsey is one of those restless, fidgetty sort of
persons
,
who are continually meddling with the affairs of
other people. He will glean from his father all that
he knows of Carter and Vernon, and if they are not
exceedingly sly, he will see into their concerns as far
as themselves.
It can do no harm to sound him. He draws
nigh.
Hawkins advanced from the doorway, and
addressed
the actor in a fashion of his own.
`Horatio, or I do mistake myself.'
`The same,' Mr. Hawkins, `and your good
servant
ever.' How does the world use youstill in
the old stand, I see.
Ay, Tom, and at a stand. But where have you
been this year of Sundays. I haven't seen you `since
the gander's neck was last soaped.'
`No more of that, Hal, an thou lovest me,'  was
the reply, followed by a hearty laugh from both, as
the phrase, which may seem somewhat mysterious
to any but southern readers, reminded them of one
of those practical jokes, in which it was Tom
Horsey's
misfortune too frequently to indulge. No
more of that, Hawkins, I pray youlet that story
be forgotten.
Forgotten, indeed!impossible; the story's quite
too good, and I must tell it to my friend here, Saxon,
Mr. Thomas Horsey, Tom, my friend Ellis Saxon, a
gentleman from the Yazooa glorious fellow like
yourself, loves a joke from the bottom of his heart,
and will die some day in a frolic
In a ditch! cried Horsey, concluding the
sentence
.
Pardon me, Mr. Saxon, the prediction is
just as like and more like to fall upon me than upon
you; and it's an old rhyme of a song that the Western
boys sing when they're boating down to Orleans;
and he repeated the lines that follow:
Though we be not wise or rich,
Yet what mattertouch the snag,
We can frolic in a ditch.
A good songI've heard it a hundred times,
though not lately. The boatmen are done up now.
These steam-sturgeons have cut up as pretty a branch
of business as ever needed a long pole, and deserved
a glorious frolic. But what of that, Tom Horsey?
Is there to be no pleasure in the world because we
can get to Orleans now in ten days in place of forty?
If the steam-sturgeon does up the `broad horn,'
there's a long horn that raises the steam. Come in,
my son, and take a sup of whisky while I tell
Saxon
about the goose's neck.
No, no, Hawkins, let that dog sleep. I'll come
in and join you with the whisky, but no scratching
old sores, say I.
What, you're not afraid of consequences now
don't you know the old Squire's done upgone to
his long nap. He'll never trouble you about it,
sonny.
No matter, I've sworn off from these tricks, Bill
Hawkins!I've promised the old man to put on a
straight coat, crop my hair and go to meeting o'
Sundays
And be at all the love-feasts!what of all that,
Tom?do you think to keep your neighbour from
being
happy because you have grown sour. `Because
thou art virtuous, shall there be no more cakes and
ale?' Come in, thou reluctant saint, who would put on
two faces of tragedy and comedy at the same time
come in, and Saxon will tell you of a splendid
blowout
on the Georgiana steamboat, going up the river
last month. They had a play on board, Tom
Horsey
an
amateur playand played Julius Csar to
more than four hundred persons, the part of
Brutus
by an old friend, Hugh Peters, the limping
schoolmaster
at Clinton.
7*
Hugh Peters play Brutusthe impudent
pedagogue
!
You don't say so, Mr. Saxon, do tell me
all the particulars. Hugh Peters, indeed! What
could have put it into the leatherhead to think that
he could play Brutus?
What, but hearing us spout the dialogue at
school,`That you have wronged me,' &c. But
come inthe water's on the fire, and the whisky
on the stand.
The news of the amateur performance was quite
enough for the mercurial Horsey. His good
resolutions
were forgotten in an instant, and in two minutes
more he was sitting between Hawkins and Saxon, in
a little cupboard-like apartment, back of the house,
a kettle upon the fire, glasses upon the table, and
every thing in preparation for one of those regular
rounds to which the young actor was already but
too much accustomed.
These steamboats have their advantages after
all; and so, Mr. Saxon, the chaps on board the
Georgiana got up a tolerable piece of work, did
they?
Ay, on the upper deck, Mr. Horsey; and
considering
the short preparation they had, the thing
was really well done. There was one chap, an
actor from Orleans, named Tilton
Tilton, I know hima mere candle-snuffer
what the dl did he pretend to do? demanded
Horsey, interrupting the speaker.
He played Csarplayed the ghost rather, and
did it so well, that he scared the women half to
death. His face was so paleI can't conceive how
he could have brought himself to so death-like a
complexion.
Psha, sir, the easiest thing in the worlda
little chalk or magnesia does it,and as for the
whiskers, the mustache, the imperial, and such small
matters, they lie, sir, at the end of a burnt cork, and
may be had at a moment's warning.
Ah, indeed! was the response of Mr. Saxon,
made with the utmost seeming simplicity.
The conceited Thespian continued:
These are the arts, sir, of the actor; and, though
not absolutely essential to the artist, yet you cannot
conceive how much they help the imagination of the
spectator; in the arousing of which lies, probably,
the great secret of the good dramatist and perfect
actor; but what you tell me of `Little Bowlegs'so
we used to call Hugh Peters,`Ye gods it doth
amaze me!' to think that he should presume to play
at all, and then to play Brutus'twas a test part
a fellow that talks through his nose, and swings his
arms about like a windmill;that walks, for all the
world, like a strutting gobler, and has a face like a
squash. Ha! ha! it must have been very ridiculous,
Mr. Saxon.
Not at all, was the reply. We were all too
dull, and wanting something to enliven us, the thing
did well enough; and there were some present, who
thought Csar was done quite as well as Cwell
himself could have done it.
Cwell be dd! was the irreverent response
of Horsey to this opinion.
Pardon me, Mr. Saxon; I mean no offence, but
it agitates my bile, when I hear Cwell spoken of
in tragedy. I should think better of Herr Cline, the
rope dancer. `I'm a soused gurnet,' sir, if Cwell
is any thing but a comedian,a devilish clever
comedian
,
who spoils himself by attempting any thing
else; and as for these folks in the steamboat, being
pleased with such performers as Tilton and `Little
Bowlegs,' they must have been most cursedly tired
of the boat, or must have had the smallest possible
particle of good taste and good sense among them.
`Brutus, Hugh Peters,' `Julius Csar, Jim Tilton,'
candle-snuffers in extraordinary for the American
Theatreit's very ridiculous. Hawkinstrouble
you for that spoon and the sugar.
A quiet smile of contempt played over the cold,
dark features of Saxon, as he saw the importance
which the youth annexed to the matter, and beheld
the swelling indignation with which he spoke of the
despised amateurs. As if disposed to humour the
folly and conceit of the youth, he continued the
topic.
But are you not exceedingly aristocratic in your
notions, Mr. Horsey? Because a man has been
forced to snuff candles, does it follow that he is
incapable
of something better?
Surely not, sir, surely not. The fates forbid
that I should deal in such a pernicious doctrine.
What was Shakspeare himself, my masters;his
early career is enough, without other authority, to
prevent me from such sheer folly of opinion; but
Tilton is no Shakspeare, nor no Garrick; and how
ever he may have played the ghost of Csar, I tell
you, he will be nothing but a miserable candle-snuffer
all his life. Look you, I reason thus, Mr. Saxon. I
have seen our friend Hawkins jump for a wager, and
know his best pitch to a feather's width. Shall I not
be able to say, thus far can Bill Hawkins jump, and
no farther? Even thus do I tell you that Tilton was
born to be a candle-snuffer, and nothing better
unless
it be a call-boy on the stage.
Yet was it said, remarked Saxon quietly, that
he was going to open the theatres at Vicksburg and
Natchez.
`Gods, grant us patience!'but it is scarce
possible
!
I heard as much myself, was the confirmatory
statement of Hawkins.
The dd fool!He's madutterly mad. On
the word of a gentleman, Mr. Saxon, this fellow has
no sort of rankno reputationno ability. Were
I a manager, he should have no employment at my
hands. The fellow is perfectly incapable.
He is going to have a roaring company,
nevertheless
,
said Hawkins. He's engaged Peters for
third-rate characters, and is getting up recruits from
every quarter.
`I shall forget myself!' Was there ever such
an insolent pretender!
The amateur was almost furious. The moment
had arrived when he could be best practised upon;
and the game was continued.
They say he has taken up actors even here in
Raymond. Was not this young fellow Vernon, one
of his men? was the inquiry of Saxon, urged with
a manner of the most perfect indifference.
Yes, I think that was the name. He came into
town last night, replied Hawkins.
Who? what? HarryHarry Vernon! Psha,
Hawkins, I know all about that. He's none of them
he's no actornothing but a lawyer riding the
circuit. He's a sort of relation of sour Ben,so we
call Ben Carterand I 'spose the old boy's got
him some cases. He stayed with us last night, and
I took a julep with him this morning. Told me all
about it himself.
Indeed! He's a relation of Carter, and no actor,
then? demanded Saxon.
No!he's no actorhas no notion of it. As
for his being a relation of sour Ben, I don't know
whether I'm right to say thatindeed, for that
matter
,
I think he told me he was not,only an
acquaintance
.
No, he's no actor, I assure you; and if
all your information about Tilton and Bowlegs be
no better founded than this, I wouldn't give much
for the new theatre.
You may be deceived even in this, Mr. Horsey,
said Saxon. This young man Vernon, they say,
is going up into the Yazoo. Did he tell you that?
Lord, no! There's no truth in it, I'm certain,
and sour Ben is too strict a chap to be very close
with an actor. If he only once dreamed that Harry
Vernon had such a notion, he'd throw up his hand
in a minute. I know sour Ben too well: he'd cut
loose from the young 'un, and leave him just rope
enough to hang himself.
What you say rather strengthens the report. If
Vernon knows this of Carter, as without doubt he
does, would not this be reason enough why he should
keep his secret while under the old man's eye,
particularly
,
if he has any favour to look for at Carter's
hands, as it is said he has. Now, they do say, and
I may as well tell you, I heard it from Tilton
himself
on board the Georgiana, that Vernon was
engaged
secretly to play first characters.
The devil, you sayfirst characters! was the
exclamation of the astounded amateur. Who
could have believed itthe fellow was so sly.But
I needn't wonder at that. Egad, I played a sly
game at first with Ben Carter myself. But, Harry
Monmouthwell, to confess a truth, the chap played
the sly one cleverly, if what you tell me be indeed
the truth. But I am not certain yet.
Look into it, said Hawkins carelessly; and so
sure am I that Saxon has good authority for what
he says, I'll go a quart, and a dozen cabanas upon
it.
Soh! it's a bet, replied the amateur. Our
hands upon it, Trojan, and it will be a close tongue
that can keep my worm from getting under it. I'll
through Harry Monmouth's knapsack before he takes
his crumbs out, or may I never look down upon the
footlights again. Mr. Saxon,drinkingthe
stage, sir, though it be carried in a steamboat.
Very gooddevilish good, Tom, cried
Hawkins
,
apparently delighted with the modest play upon
words which the actor had attempted. You were
always clever at these things, but your frolic seems
to have freshened and improved you. But what did
the old man say, Tom, when you came back? The
story was that you had made his factor hand over
to the tune of three or four thousand dollars, which
you lost at faro in one night.
Not so bad as that, Hawkins, though bad enough
still. I have worried the old man something too
much, but I have promised him reformation, and
Will keep your promise, if you can.
Well said, Hawkins, responded the youth with
a sigh; if I can. The task is a very difficult one;
for this dd stuff you've been telling me of Tilton
and his floating theatre, has put me in a most
inconceivable
state of combustion. I should think well of
the plan, if that wool-headed candle-snuffer had
nothing
to do with it. In good hands a theatre at
Natchez
Under the hill, said Hawkins with a sneer.
No, no! there's too much hell broth there; the
gruel is slab, but not good enough in that quarter,
unless in playing Tom and Jerry, to which I do not
much incline; but for a respectable establishment, I
doubt not that we should be able to keep it up, and
put money in our pockets, at least four months in
the year. We could then shift our quarters, as the
old players did, from one barn to another. We could
go to Vicksburg, Grand Gulf, Manchester, Port
Gibson, and all about, and drive the prettiest and
merriest gipsy business one could desire. `By the
Lord, our plot is a good plot as ever was laid!' but
it would spoil the best plot, ay, and the best play too,
to have such a botch as Tilton in the management.
Tilton, or no Tilton, Tom, remember the bet.
We must satisfy it before this youth, Vernon, leaves
Raymond.
My hand on't. But are you for court now
what's to be doneany murder cases. I like to
listen
to them; they are so many eggs for tragedy,
which unborn Shakspeares may hatch. What say
you, men,go along with me.
Time enough; the court won't open for an hour,
and there are only a few cases of assault and
battery
;
nothing of interest. Stay awhile and sup your
whisky, and we'll go with you then. Saxon, your
glass waits.
Let us leave the trio for awhile.
CHAPTER VI.
See, where he lies, slaughter'd without the camp,
And by a simple swain, a mercenary,
Who bravely took the combat to himself.
Rob. Greene
, 1560.
Vernon
, meanwhile, accompanied by his friend
and patron, proceeded to the court-house, in the area
in front of which he encountered the curious gaze of
all the natives to whom the face of a stranger is
instantly
obvious, and in the examination of whom
they do not always content themselves with the keen
scrutiny of the eye. Whar' are you from,
stranger
?
and whar' are you guine? and what's
your business here? and what do you do there?
are the ordinary questions by which the forest-born
contrive to obtain possession of that intelligence for
which the Atlantic citizen has his morning gazette.
The crowd was fast assembling, and Vernon left
alone by Mr. Carter, who was required to attend to
some pressing business elsewhere, was, of course,
compelled to go through his examination like all the
rest, and bore it with the most becoming fortitude
and good nature. Not that he answered his
inquisitors
with a strict regard to the truth; this might
have exposed him to defeat in the purposes which he
had in view; but with that ready adroitness which
is the sign of keen and quick imagination, and which,
by the way, is one of the very first requisites in a
country circuit lawyer; he answered them in such
VOL. I. 8
a way as to reveal nothing, and yet satisfy them that
he had nothing more to reveal. When asked about
New Orleans, he could tell them a long story about
the new big steamboat of which they had heard
wonders; and by conversing freely with Tom, Dick
and Harry, about matters with which neither
himself
nor Tom, Dick or Harry had any thing to do,
convinced all around that he was no starched,
stiff-necked
upstart, so solicitous of his own birth, family
and fortune, as to dread the effect of their contact
upon his nobility.
A 'cute chap, said one, that fellow, Vernon;
knows all about that Orleans railroad and the big
steamboat; says Madame Lalaurie, she that licked
her poor niggers to death, and tied 'em week after
week without hog or hominy, will get mightily
smashed among the Orleans lawyers.
He's an Orleans lawyer, then? demanded
another.
I rether reckon so, was the reply, though, by
the powers, he didn't tell me that.
Well, but now he's moved into Massissippi, or how
could he come to plead here in Raymond.
That's trueI'll go and ax him where he lives
now; I rather like the chap, was the opinion and
resolve of the baffled inquisitor, whom Vernon had
contrived to lead from himself by freely enlarging
upon other matters, which, for the moment, amply
satisfied the hearer's curiosity.
But the youth had disappeared from the spot, and
was then in the rear of the court-house where he
had been called by Carter who held him in close
conference. Meanwhile, the court was convened,
his honour had taken his seat, and the crowd,
hurrying
with that strange curiosity which is never so
well satisfied as when it hears of the misdeeds of its
own nature, and which is never so active and
apprehensive
as in a secluded country village, soon forgot
all concern for the interesting stranger, and gave
itself up, soul and body, to the clamours of officers,
silencing clamour; the calls of jurymen and
witnesses
;
the small wit of small lawyers, and the
sapient
wisdom of the judge, whose oracles, generally
monosyllabic, are accompanied by a shake of the
head, worse-wise than Burleigh's.
Carter, having concluded the relation of a matter
which belonged to the expedition of his proteg, was
about to withdraw with him to the great moral
bullring
,
when one of those little and most amusing
incidents
took place, which could only take place in a
country such as ours, where a bold decisive
character
is formed by the adventurous life which it makes
prominent, if not necessary; and where a free spirit
and genuine humour seem absolutely to result from
the absence of any of those educational restraints,
which, in New England, graduate all intellects to an
interesting level, making them as completely the
creatures of mould and measure, as if God had
decreed
them, even in morals and expression, to the
exquisite republican equality which they deny to
nonewho have a money qualification and are not
Irish and Catholic.
A broad-faced, brown-cheeked, good-humoured
looking farmer approached the two, and addressing
Carter by name as an old acquaintance, turned from
him to his companion, and slapping him upon the
shoulder with all the familiarity of an old
acquaintance
,
spoke to him in some such language as the
following
.
Look ye, now, stranger, they tell me your
name's Varnon, and that you're a lawyer, and I
reckon it's true what they tell me. You're a friend
of his, Ben Cartereh?
Carter answered by introducing Vernon more
formally to the interrogator, whom Vernon himself
satisfied on the subject of his other interrogatories.
Well, Harry Varnon, said the old man in
continuation
,
I like your faceby the hokey but I do
and without meaning to praise you to your teeth, I tell
you you're a dd smart-looking fellow; and I want
to give you some law business to do for me now,
before the court's over here in Raymond.
Your business is his, Mr. Shippen, said Carter,
anticipating the reply of Vernon, and I think that
my friend will do justice to himself and you at the
same time.
Let the boy talk for himself, Carter. I want to
hear him talk since I'm going to hire him, you see,
to talk for me in the court-house. By his face, he
ought to have a mighty free speech, and that's the
sort of thing you see that will best suit me at this
present. What say you, Harry Varnon, are you
willing to argify a little business for me in a mighty
bad case.
The other professed his willingness to do what he
could for his client to the best of his ability, and in
such a style as to satisfy the old man that he was
not likely to prove a bungler in his business.
That's your sort, said he; and now look ye,
Varnon. The law is agin me here for licking a
dd Yankee trader, that said something sassy to my
darter Nelly. She's only a child, Master Varnon,
a leetle over thirteen years old, and couldn't 'a
meant any harm in what she did; and if there was
any harm in it, d'ye see, why I was the only one to
blame in the matter. I gin her a five dollar bill to
go to Watson's store to buy some little truck, and
he said the bill was a false one and a counterfeit,
and spoke so to the child as if she meant to cheat
himand she a gal toothat I got angry as a
buster
,
and went straight off and mounted him. I
pulled him out from his shop, and it wasn't at all
gentle, the way I handled him. I made his sides
ache, I tell you. Well, the long and short of the
business, then, is this: instead of coming out and
making it a fight after his own fashion, with any
weapons, jist as he might think best for himself, he
goes a-lawing me about for damages, and he's put
down his bruises and black spots at five thousand
dollars; as if his laying up a week, and putting a
mush poultice on his shins, and a piece of raw beef
to his eyes, should have cost him so much money.
Well, you're right to laugh, for that's the true state
of the case, and now what do you think you can
do with it?
You have counsel already? asked Vernon.
Oh, yes; one Graham, here, that comes from
Monticello; a mealy-mouthed chap that don't please
me at all; but he was the best I could get to do the
business when I wanted it. He answered Perkins,
who is Watson's lawyer, step by step, in the
law-papers
he put in; and I s'pose did that part of the
business tolerable well; but then, he can't talk,
Varnon
;
and he trembles and looks afeard when the
other lawyers talk, and that vexes me, to have a
lawyer that's afeard to open his mouth in my
business
;
and I wo'n't have him talk for me if I can
help it.
But, Mr. Shippen, I cannot think to supersede
Mr. Graham in this business; it is against the
courtesy
of the bar.
There's no superseding at all. Graham's quite
willing to get somebody to help him; for, look you,
he says that he knows nothing that he can say to
help me. He says they'll prove every thing agin
me, and there's no sort of defence that he can make.
Now, he says, if I had only let Watson give me the
first clip, he could defend me very well; but wouldn't
8*
I a been a blasted fool to ha' let him, when every
body knows that a first clip is half the battle? No,
no! none of that stuff for me; it may be law, but
I reckon there's no reason in itnone, that'll sarve
a man here in Massissippi.
I don't know that I can do much more for you
than Graham, said Vernon, modestly; you, at
least know, Mr. Shippen, that the law favours him
most who suffers the first injury.
You can talk, Varnon, and that's something more
than Graham can do. You can tell the people what
a darned skunk of a fellow that Watson is, to go and
scandalize a childand she a gal tooto call her a
cheat and vilify her in front of his shop; and by the
Eternal, if that a'n't provocation and injury enough to
justify any father for licking the rapscallion that
does it, then I don't know any sense in our having
laws at all. Well, then, all I want is that you should
talk your mind freely to the people about these things.
I know well enough, that by the law-books, a man's
not to lick his neighbour for bad words, generally
speaking; but then, you see, here's a case different.
Here the bad words is spoken to a gal child, that has
a character to lose, and there's no such thing as
standing that; and it does seem to me that it's right to
make a monstrous difference between blackguarding
a man himself, and blackguarding his darter. Well,
Varnon, you're just the man now, to hit the skunk
hard on these p'ints. Do you score him now, up and
down, hip and thigh, for half an hourhalf an hour
by the watchand there's a clear fifty dollars in
your pocket. Say the word,only half an hour
now,I don't want a minute more; and it's a
bargain
.
Vernon laughed at the humour of the proposition,
but seemed disposed to hesitate, when Carter, fearing
that some nice point of objection might suggest it.
self to the youth, and knowing the importance to his
present object of his appearing in Raymond only as
a lawyer seeking practice, immediately closed with
the offer on the part of the youth. The old farmer,
however, was not so well satisfied.
Let Varnon talk for himself, Ben Carter; he's
got a tongue of his own, and it does me good to hear
him use it. Come, Varnon, my boy, say what you'll
do. I've spoken to Graham a'ready, and he says
he's willing. It mought be that you think he a'n't;
but between us, he's mighty glad to get the trouble
on to some other body's shoulders, for he's plainly
told me that it's a darned black and blue case, all
agin me, and he's no notion of any way to turn it
about to my benefit. I'm candid you seeI don't
hide nothing from you. I expect to sweat a little at
my fingers' ends for this beating, but, by the hokey,
five thousand dollars will swallow me and all my
substance, and you must rub that down to a mere
circumstance. I'm willing to bleed five hundred, but
the other is quite too digging. It'll plough me out of
the ground to raise it; and root and branch must go
along with it. A good talk now, that'll show what
a skunk Watson is, and what a shame it would be
to let a child,a gal child too,be abused by such
a varment, and called a cheat, and vilified as if she
was a bad woman at the foot of Natchy hillwill
help me mightily, and I don't think the jury will mind
the law so much, when the reason and the right of
the thing is so clearly in my hand. Do your best,
my chicken, and the money's in your pocket.
Did I understand you that Watson made no
defence
?
Took his beating like a holy mortyr.
What! did he not strike a blow?
Not the breath of one; he jist called upon the
people to see how I handled him, jist as if he had a
liking for it. That's the worst part of the business
for me, so Graham says.
I'll close with you, Mr. Shippen. I'll plead for
half an hour.
Jist half an hour, Varnon; do it well and stick
to him for that time, my chicken, and by the hokey,
I don't want a minute more.
I will do it, repeated the youth, rather amused
with the aspect of the affair, and the requisition of
the farmer; and not so hopeless of his cause as Mr.
Graham had been. From that very feature, last
related in the case, which Graham thought the most
unfavourable, the quickwitted Vernon argued the
very best results; and having appointed to meet
Shippen within the hour, to make the acquaintance
of Graham and confer with him on the business so
far as it had gone, the stouthearted defendant left
him for awhile, as fully satisfied with the
proceeding
,
as if his case was already won. He was
one of those worthy republicans who was not
unwilling
to pay for his liberties; and the right to speak
his mind, though it might be only through the lips of
another, was one of those rights which he esteemed
cheaply paid for with fifty dollars at any time. When
he had gone, Carter resumed his conference with
Vernon, which related, we need scarcely say, to the
projected mission of the latter. Other items of
intelligence
had reached him,which furnished additional
clues to those already in possessionof the course
taken in his flight by the faithless friend and
absconding
debtor; but as these matters are destined to have
their distinct development in the regular progress of
the affair, they demand none of our attention now.
When Vernon entered the court-house he found
his new client awaiting him with the
mealy-mouthed
lawyer Graham. A few moments
sufficed
to put Vernon in possession of all the facts so
far as their litigated character had become apparent
to the attorney on record. During the course of his
narrative, Graham did not scruple, though in the
presence of Shippen, to declare his utter hopelessness
of his cause; a sort of sincerity which is of very
doubtful propriety, since it never yet discouraged a
litigant, and has often ruined a very worthy
practitioner
.
It was amusing enough to Vernon to survey
the countenance of Shippen as these opinions fell
from the lips of his lawyer.How he would lift his
evebrows, and roll his tongue within his jaws, and
then turn away exclaiming
Never you mind, Charley Grahamnever you
mind,there are more eggs to be hatched this week,
than was ever laid by your mother's best hen; and
some of the chickens, let me tell you, will be long
spurred before they chip the shell. Only half an
hour, Harry Varnon; only half an hour, my boy;
but let it be well talked.
At length, in its due place upon the docket, the
long-expected civil case of Watson
v.
Shippen,
sounding in damages for assault and battery, was
called, and the several parties responded accordingly.
With the first sounds of his name, Shippen perched
himself behind Vernon, and renewed his exhortations
and his promises. The plaintiff, Watson, was also
presenta huge, mammoth-feeding sort of person,
half as large again as Shippen, and having the
appearance
of one, who, if he had not utterly lacked
the spirit, could have annihilated, or at least, have
swallowed his assailant. His downcast look,
halting
,
hesitating but sly manner, sufficiently denoted
the cold, calculating and cowardly wretchsuch as
Shippen had described him,who could wantonly
insult the young girl, whose indignant father he
dared not face, and could not contend with. His
attorney, Perkins, opened the case with considerable
spirit, passed slightingly over the provocation by
which Watson had drawn upon him the wrath of
the defendant, and dwelt with proper details of law
and fact, upon the enormity of the outrage which
the latter had committed; described the cruel
manner
in which his client had been dragged from his
dwelling into the public thoroughfare and beaten by
the big-fisted pugilist, whom, in his passionate
exaggeration
,
he made a giant, whilst the plaintiff was
diminished to a feeble and delicate person, whose
Christian forbearance while receiving the injuries
complained of, was the subject of most unbounded,
and, it may be added, most unmerited eulogium.
After this, it seemed something of an anti-climax to
show that a physician's aid was called in to heal his
hurts; particularly as the cross-examination
determined
the extent of this attendance to be little over
three days; and the medicaments employed to be of
little more cost than eye of newt and toe of frog.
A peas poultice was shown to be one of the most
successful applications of Doctor Shinbone, and the
application of the lancet, his most serious operation.
With these proofs and the commentary which he
made with so much unction upon them, Mr.
Attorney
Perkins, was willing to close his side of the case.
You see, said Graham, in a half whisper to
Vernon; it is as I have told you. He has proved
every thing, and our case is to be made out of his
witnesses only.
The words, spoken however slightly, were audible
to the keen ears of the defendant behind, who,
smarting
with the declamation of Perkins, retorted before
Vernon could speak.
And a good case, too, Charley Graham, if a
man had it in him to bring out. Up and at him,
Harry Varnon, and give him enough of it. By the
hokey, Charley Graham, you talk as if your liver
was all cream colour.
A sly twinkle of Vernon's eyes was perceptible to
the court, as, arising from his seat, he coolly took
out his watch, and noted the precise minute before
he commenced his operations. The bargain,
meanwhile
,
which Shippen had made with the strange
lawyer, to talk for him half an hour only, had got
into considerable circulation, chiefly with the
assistance
of the defendant himself; and the curiosity was
general, not less to hear the young and handsome
stranger, than to see what he could make of his
limits.
Vernon did not belie public expectation. Cool in
temper, rapid in reflection, and singularly fluent of
speech, he commenced his task by reviewing briefly
the evidence which had been given. He dwelt with
much more emphasis than Perkins on the gross
insult
which had been offered to a young child, of good
parents, and one of a sex, which needed, from the
delicacy of its structure, the kindness and indulgence
of man; and could not live either in his harshness
or disesteem. This harshness, he proceeded to show,
was quite hostile to that claim which had been so
eloquently made by the opposite counsel, in behalf
of the Christian meekness of his client; this
meekness
being the result of his cowardice, and not his
Christianity; since it was very visible in his
encounter
with the man, and was singularly wanting
to his deportment in his interview with the child.
It is very well, proceeded Vernon, to insist upon
the integrity of the laws, to prevent the brutality of
violence, to compel the strong arm to desist from
strife, and refer to the authorities assigned by society
for such purposes, to redress its wrongs; but there
are some cases, he said, where outraged humanity
becomes a rebel; and when, to wait for the dilatory
process of the laws, might be to ruin her for ever.
In all cases, where the reputation or the virtue of a
womana wife, a sister, or a daughterare at
stake, the sudden blow of the outraged relative is a
blow struck for virtue herself, and in compliance
with laws which are infinitely more sacred than any
that can be framed by man. And, so universal, he
continued, are these laws, that I cannot bring
myself
to believe that his honour, who now sits upon
the bench, and you, gentlemen of the jury, or any
man of proper spirit and feeling, could forbear, in
like circumstances, to do as my client has done. Ay,
gentlemen, even if the place of sanctuary which the
ruffian had chosen for his retreat, had been the altar
of God itself, rather than the counter behind which
he sells his wares, it would not have shielded him
from your honest anger, any more than the latter
place has protected Watson from the just vengeance
of a father.
But I do not rely only on these points, gentlemen
of the jury. There are others scarcely less important
to be dwelt upon. Watson has come into court
clamouring for justice. I should say he has already
had itthat never was justice made so clearly
manifest
as when Shippen punished him for the
defamation
of his daughter. He founds his claim, as every
man must, who comes into court, upon his strict
compliance with the laws. But his eloquent counsel
has not deemed it sufficient to confine himself to this
modest claim. He not only asserts him to have
borne the part of a good citizen, but of a most
becoming
Christian. Look at his meekness under
stripes, says Mr. Perkins, and you have the very
deportment of the old apostles under like indignities.
Gentlemen of the jury, it is a new doctrine to be
taught herethis meekness under blowsthis calm,
Christian toleration of injuriesthis patient bending
of the shoulders to any assault. But the counsel
has himself proved quite too much for his case and
client. He has shown you by the evidence that,
so far from being meek under his suffering, he, at
the very moment, called upon the bystanders to
witness
not
his courage in resenting injurythe
courage
of proper manhood, which always forbears
insult
,
and always repels itbut the blows which he
submitted to, that they might be counted down and
paid for in money. This base creature, gentlemen,
this pretended Christian, had no abhorrence of the
shame to which he was subjected; had no
consciousness
of the disgrace and degradation; had, it seems,
no actual feeling of the blows, while he consoled
himself with the reflection that they were to be paid
for; that he should get money for every stroke; that
his blood was to be weighed in an opposite scale
against five thousand dollars of my client. He
comes into court not for justice, but for money. He
comes not to sustain the laws, for he himself violated
them, when he slandered the innocent daughter of
this old man; but to speculate, like a miserable pedler,
upon what may be made out of another's violation
of them. Does such a man come into court with
clean hands? Does he not come into court with the
basest of all base feelings in his soul? And would not
such a man as this, who thus barters his blood for
money as freely as another Judas, barter his very
God for a far less sum? I have no sort of doubt of
this, myself. I believe, as conscientiously as I do that
I now stand before you, that neither your lives nor
your honours could be safe in such hands, were it
profitable for him to dispose of them, and were the
danger not too great for one endowed with such a
dastard spirit. Let us go back to that chastisement
of which he complains, the dishonour of which he
thinks can be all removed by five thousand of my
VOL. I. 9
client's dollars; and I, too, will pray you to give as
close attention to it, as was prayed for by my
worthy
and eloquent opponent, though with a far different
object. He called upon you to admire the meekness
of this new apostle come down upon earth. Your
Christian feelings were exhorted to take pattern
after this blessed example of Christian
forbearance
.
Behold this lamb under the furious claws of
this lion going about seeking what he may devour.
See how he prays for his cruel assailant. Such was
the picture of my able brother. Let me pray you to
give as much heed to one that I shall draw. See, then,
this miserable poltroon, submitting to the assaults of
one to whom, in physical capacity, he is a giant
hear him how he shouts to the people. He calls upon
all around to see that he strikes no blow himself,he
begs them to take particular account of the number
that he receives. When jeered by the spectators for
such tame and unbecoming submission, he grins,
with a miserable delight, even while his foe is
kicking
him. `Never mind, he shall pay for this,' is the
answer that he makes; `for all these kicks I shall
have coppers!' His enemy wrings his nose`Ah!'
he cries with a miserable chuckle, `that shall cost
him a thousand dollars. Let him kick, he will have
to pay for all!' And this, gentlemen, is the sort of
person, the Christian, of whom we hear a eulogy
that would rank him with any of the apostles that
ever was flayed alive in the cause of God and of
mankind. To my thinking, so far from calling him
a Christian, gentlemen of the jury, I can scarcely
count him human. There is so much of cold
insensibility
about this creaturesomething so utterly
bloodless, yet so malignant, that, were it not at the
same time so very base, I should esteem it devilish,
and worthy of Lucifer himself.
But, gentlemen of the jury, I am not yet done
with this part of my subject. I would like to place
before you the evil effect of encouraging a
prosecution
,
such as the present, sounding in individual
damages
;
and the ground which I take for my
objection
is in the very fact upon which Mr. Perkins rests
his strongest argument, namely, the patience with
which this creature submitted to be beaten. This
very patience under blows, I hold to be disgraceful
to the manhood of the person, as it would be to the
manhood of the nation that submitted to them tamely;
and to pay him for thus submitting, will, gentlemen,
be paying a bounty to the rankest cowardice that
ever degraded man. Every dollar which you give
to this mean creature for this affair, is neither more
nor less than a bounty to the coward; the effect of
which must be to raise a brood of cowards
throughout
the country. We want no cowards in this
country
.
Our object should be to discourage them, to
withdraw from them the countenance of the courts,
and the approval, even indirectly, of all honest men.
We punish the coward in the field, yet give a bounty
to him in time of peace. What a monstrous
contradiction
a
contradiction not to be reconciled by any
resort to common justice or common sense. Let us
punish them alike in every caserefuse them
countenance
in ordinary life and never trust them in the
field. Do not suppose, gentlemen of the jury, that I
am disposed by these remarks, to encourage the
wrongdoer in his violence, and to drive the weak and
unoffending from protection. Had this man,
Watson
,
who is neither weak nor unoffending, made
good fight, and been overcome after an honest
struggle
,
by Shippen, I should have been among the first
to say that he should have had a few hundred dollars
damages; but, under existing circumstances, it is my
firm conviction that you will give him only such
damages as will carry the costs of prosecution, and
dismiss him from the presence of the court with the
unmitigated scorn of all who have listened to the
dishonouring testimony, which he has this day, in
his own case, produced against himself.
The half hour had elapsed, and Vernon sat down
amidst a half suppressed murmur of applause.
Shippen
,
as soon as he had touched his seat, jumped up,
clapped him upon his shoulder and exclaimed, so as
to be heard by all around,
At him ag'in, Harry, only for a quarter more,
and you shall have another fifty.
The tears were in the eyes of the old man, and
the fervency of his expression, the frank feeling tones
of his voice, so opposite as he appeared in every
respect
to his opponent, Watson, moved the sympathy
of the whole court in his favour. But Vernon
declined
his offer. He felt that he had made the
proper
impression, and that any thing more would only
tend to weaken and impair it. He was one of those
fortunate men, of whom there are so few in our
hemisphere, whether in the senate, the forum, or the
pulpit, who know where to stop; and, though
flattered
by the obvious effect of his argument, so novel,
and in some respects ingeniousof which we have
given, however, a very feeble reporthe firmly
resisted
all the persuasions of Shippen to renew the
speech. This single fact was not without its effect
upon the minds of those present. That a lawyer
should refuse a fee for a matter, seemingly, so easy
of execution, and that he should resista more
difficult
matter with young lawyersthe temptation still
to talk when the auditors were willing to hearwere
events to which our south-western people are not
habituated. The confidence which his refusal
indicated
in what had been already said, had its
influence
also. The jury retired from the box, but before
the verdict was returnedwhich,
par parenthese
,
gave only nominal damages as Vernon had
suggested
Carter
entered the court room suddenly, and
in a whisper summoned the young lawyer away.
The governor is at Mrs. Baxters, and would like
to speak with you awhile.
Shippen would have detained him, and released
him only with a promise that he should go home
and spend a night with him, and see his wife Susan,
and Bella, the little girl who had been the innocent
cause of the trial, and his ploughing oxen, and a fine
blood mare that he had just got from Georgia, and a
thousand other matters, most of which, at that
moment
,
Vernon might have had for the asking.
9*
CHAPTER VII.
I do accuse thee here,
To be a man, factious and dangerous,
A sower of sedition in the state,
A turbulent and discontented spirit,
Which I will prove.
B. Jonson
Sejanus
.
Let
us return to the shed room in the shop of
Hawkins, where we left our quondam friend the
soi-disant
actor, carousing with his new companion,
Saxon. Hawkins had left the two for awhile, and
during his absence employed himself no less busily
than did they, and possibly to more useful purpose.
The good liquor, aided by the arts of Saxon who
had his own policy in it, had been productive of its
customary effect upon the erratic youth, who was
now plainly in the seventh heaven of theatrical
hallucination
.
He treated his comrade to the choicest
selections of the old fathers of dramatic literature,
and mouthed in the becoming style of the best
modern artists. Now he gave imitations of Kean,
practising even the wry twist of his deformed visage
now the lugubrious whinings of Cooper, when
declining
towards the fifth act; and now the guttural
growl of Forrest, when, with singular bad taste, he
imitates even the death rattle in the throat of the
obese Vitellius. With much talent, and a good deal
of taste for the profession to which he so
desperately
inclined, the want of a proper education in
schools furnishing intrinsic standards, left Horsey
entirely open to that worst of all misfortunes to
talent in any countryand one which is the
particular
evil in oursthe formation of his style and
judgment upon models essentially erratic, and
unr
gulated by any just principle. To make a point,
rather than to act well the part, was too much his
desire, as it seems the prevailing ambition with all
our Daggerwoods; and in the course of a brief hour,
Saxon was helped to a dozen different readings of
all the disputed passages in Macbeth, Hamlet,
Richard, and the rest. It was curious to see with
what industry the youth had accumulated authorities
on Shakspeare. He had Gifford, Malone, Steevens,
Seymour, Rowe, Farmer, and some thirty or forty
more at his finger ends, and could we look at this
moment into the little closet which was assigned him
as a sleeping room at his father's house, we should
see the works of all these persons, accumulated on
the table by his couch; he being also one of those
erring persons who read by night in bed. These
books were all he had left to show for the thousands
he had dissipated of his father's income; and whether
his outlay had been a profitable one or not, would
have been of no difficult decision, were the father
chosen to resolve the question. To do the youth
justice, however, it may be added, that he had learned
something of good from the schools, however erring
and even vicious, through which he had gone. A
knowledge of books, and even of men, infinitely
beyond
that usually in the possession of persons in his
secluded
home, had been the result of his wanderings;
and the roughness of the country clown had been
fortunately exchanged for a manner, which, though it
might be sometimes swaggering and obtrusive, was
seldom rude, and never brutal or insolent. As a
farther set off to his deficiencies, Tom Horsey was
a good natured, generous fellow, who readily forgave
injuries, conciliated friends, and took the world
always
,
as the world is required to take its wives, for
better or worse. It's a damned bad world, Tom
was in the habit of saying over his cups, that would
not be content to take him too on the same terms.
He did the world injustice, however, as Saxon
strove busily to convince him. The cool, wily
outlaw
,
for such he was, listened patiently to all the
youth's recitations, and even encouraged him to
continue
them by suggesting the quotations, but, at
decent intervals he would contrive to insinuate a
side question touching other matters and in relation
to persons, by which he contrived, in the overflow of
the youth's garrulity, to get from him every thing
in his knowledge in relation to his father's concerns,
and those of Carter his lodger and Vernon his
guest. Some particular interest seemed, in his mind,
to hang over the probable proceedings of the latter,
and all his remarks, even when he spoke of playing
the topic on which Horsey could always be
commanded
were
calculated to fill the latter with the
persuasion that Vernon was about to go up the
country.
If he does then, Saxon, by the pipers, I must pay
for the music; that is to say, I must treat according
to the bet between usfor then, I shall take it for
granted it is as you say; and he's going up to join
that booby Tilton's companythough he's but a
poor codling if he does. That fellow, Tilton, is the
merest dolt and dunderhead, if you believe me, that
ever bowed to an audience. What the devil can he
hope to play himself; and as for his management
management indeed! `A fico for the phrase'the
thing can't answer, Mr. Saxon.
Perhaps not, Mr. Horsey, yet what is the poor
fellow to do? `Young ravens must have food,'you
know the quotation?
Ay, ay, `mine ancient,' are you there? But let
that humour pass! It is my doubt that this chap
Tilton is but a crow;and will never get his corn in
this field. If he can, God speed him, I say, and help
him to a better mind and finer figurematters in
which he needs all the help that God and man can
give him. As for the figure, I would not be his tailor
for all the cloththere would be more cutting to be
done on the man than the stuff. What I chafe at is
his chance of failure, which is so great,for failure
in a new scheme, throws back the period and the
prospect of success; and the thing, which in good
hands might, nay must, be successful, would, I am
free to take another bet, be sure to fail in his.
But if he gets good actors to begin with, Mr.
Horsey.
Ay, that alters the case, but when did you ever
know a fool choose wise help? It is scarce a thing
to be hoped for, however much desired.
What of this young fellow, Vernon; if he be
one of the company? insinuated Saxon.
You know my thought on that point. Dad
says he's a lawyer, and he as good as told me the
same thing himself. I'll look into the business when
I go home. But, let him be as you think, and still
I can say nothing of Tilton's choice. Harry
Vernon
may be a smart chap enough, and certainly
looks like one, but the stage requires something
more than that. Is he a reader, say you; has he
discretion of points; knows he his author; knows
he his audience; and to sum up all in little, has he
the divine gift, the born intelligence which makes the
actor a born actor, as completely as the poet is a
born poet, if one at all? These are the requisites,
Master Brook, and a fellow may be smart at law
and smart at physic, who would show but a dull ass
upon the stage; as I have seen a chap make a fine
speech at muster grounds from a stump, who sat a
horse like a jackdaw. To speak plainly, though I
would not have it reach Harry's ears, my best
reason
for doubting his being an actor is that I believe
he has no turn, no talent for the stage. I like Harry
so much already, that I should be sorry to see him
fail.
But why not join Tilton yourself?
Ah, Saxon, your question takes me all aback.
If it were not this dd fool Tilton, who will spoil
every thing, and like others who are as great fools
as himself, though probably better actors, he will be
casting himself in all the first characters. If I could
be sure
The sentence in which he was probably about to
show the weakness of his heart in its yearnings
towards
the old vanities which he had so recently and
solemnly renounced, was cut short by the sudden
entrance of Hawkins.
Horsey, he cried on entrance, I am afraid we
shall lose that bet with you. I have just got away
from the court house, where I left your friend
Vernon
in full argument.
The devil you did. Said I not, said I not! But
what's the businesswhat's the casesmurder,
rape, burglary, battery?
Battery, battery! He defends old Shippen against
Watson, whom he drubbed for insulting little Bella,
his daughter. Watson got no more than he
deserved
,
and your man Vernon's serving him like all
the world. I think the jury will hardly singe
Shippen's
skirts, though Watson thought to smoke him
to the tune of two or three thousand dollars.
Vernon's
put a new colour on the colt, and people who
thought him rather black when he was first carried
into court, now look upon him as a rather pretty
cream. He'll get off slick and easy; that Vernon's
a smart fellow.
By the ghost of Csar, but I must hear Harry,
I must. What say you, Mr. Saxon, will you go
along? what say you, Hawkins?
An expressive glance of the eye, which the latter
gave to Saxon, led him to decline the invitation, and
Hawkins pleading business, the actor set off alone.
He had scarcely taken his departure when Hawkins,
in a hurried and somewhat agitated manner, taking
Saxon farther into the apartment, and closing the
inner door, remarked
Would you believe it, Saxon; the Governor has
just got in from below.
Ah, indeed; he comes alone?
Yes, and has gone to mother Baxter's. But you
take it very coolly. Will you not be off?
Why should I take it otherwise. I know not
that I have any thing to fear from his coming; was
the calm reply.
How! said you not that you knew of advisers
having gone to him from Alabama of that dd
ugly business of Grafton; and of your course from
the Black Warrior, across to Mississippi.
Yes! But this is no trouble to me here. These
advisers tell of my aiming for the Yazoo, but nothing
of my being so low as this. Raymond is the last
place where he would think to find me.
What can he come for then?
That is a secret I should like to fathom. Can't
we contrive it, Hawkins. You have a room at this
old woman's?
Yes: but it's monstrous dangerous. It is
risking
every thing.
True; and there are cases where every thing
must be risked, if any thing is to be saved; and this
is one of them. It is important to know how much
of our secret they know. If they have a list of
names in Mississippi, the owners of them must take
tracks for Texas without more delay. There is no
saving them else, and I misdoubt that this fellow
Vernon is employed on some business above against
us, which, it is absolutely necessary that we should
gain a knowledge of.
But this pleading speaks against it. The youth
seems really nothing more than a young beginner
at the law on his first circuit.
That may be, and there is no good reason why
a young lawyer should not now and then try his
hand at a more profitable business. A governor's
proclamation, with a reward of two or three
thousand
dollars, is no bad inducement to a confident
youth to try the capture of an outlaw. I must see
more of this youth and more of the Governor before
I leave them; and the long and the short of the
matter
is, that we go to your room at once. He is even
now, you say, at mother Baxter's.
Even now,and more,another matter of which
I forgot to speakCarter has been with him ever
since you came.
And Vernon lodges with Carter! see you not;
can you doubt, Hawkins? If I do, it is only the
more resolutely to see how far they are linked
together
,
and to ascertain their objects truly. We
must see to it. I will leave you and take the right
hand side of the way towards the court house.
Send Jenkins round to the crooked oak with my
horse, that he may be conveniently in readiness. I
may have to scud on short notice. That done, take
your way to Baxter's, and meet me at the entrance.
Perhaps it would be quite as well to send the old
woman into the kitchen, or on some wild goose
errand
,
that the coast may be clear. See to it now,
Hawkins, with all your eyes; for we are in no sort
of danger here; nobody suspects us, unless we
blunder
through stupidity or haste.
Saxon looked carefully to his pistols, which were
well concealed in the bosom of the overcoat he wore.
Nobody would have suspected under the calm,
cool, dignified movement, the doomed outlaw,
standing
on the brink of danger, and thoughtful only on
the means of extrication from perils that environed
himself and comrades on every hand. His
bowie-knife
,
that dreadful instrument of summary and
sanguinary
vengeance, whose edge, sharpened to a
razor's keenness, was rendered still more terrible by
the condensed weight of a sabre thrown into its
back, was adjusted in his breast so as to answer the
first movements of his hand; and, with the confidence
of one who has prepared himself at all points for
the worst, the bold man, who must already be
recognised
by the reader of our previous work, as an old
acquaintance, left the shop of his comrade and
emerged calmly into the thoroughfare
Proceeding with corresponding boldness, he went
forward where the throng was thickest, entered the
court-house, looked on and listened for a brief space
to the proceedings, then took his way slowly to the
house of Mrs. Baxter, where he had appointed to
meet with his comrade. Hawkins had so contrived
it, as to keep the passage clear. He led him through
it with slow and cautious footsteps, up the narrow
stairway, and thence into his chamber, which lay on
the left hand, being the room opposite that which the
governor occupied. The little landing course at the
head of the stairsa sort of platform, some five
feet wide, was the only space that separated the two
chambers. When Hawkins had closed his door, he
gave Saxon to understand that but a few moments
had passed since Carter, accompanied by Vernon,
VOL. I. 10
had gone into the governor's room, and this
intelligence
quickened the anxiety of Saxon to inquire into
the purport of their business. Though scarcely
governed
by so keen a motive as the outlaw, let us,
however, go forward more boldly than himself to
procure the desired knowledge, and at once enter
the chamber in which the three are now assembled.
We shall lose little by our delay, since the
preliminaries
of introductionthose little formalities
without
which the world does no business civilly
occupied
the brief space between the entrance of Vernon
to the conference, and the beginning of our own and
the outlaw's espionage upon its progress.
Our mutual friend, Mr. Carter, assures me, Mr.
Vernon, of your perfect capacity to do for me a
certain
business which is important to the interests of
the state, and which requires as much secrecy and
courage as intelligence. Can I hope for your
assistance
?
The youth answered him briefly, that any service
not inconsistent with that upon which he was at
present
engaged would be cheerfully undertaken by him,
which would subserve the interests of the state, and
oblige his excellency.
But your excellency is not aware, perhaps, he
continued, that I am to leave Raymond, possibly
to-morrow, for the Yazoo neighbourhood.
It is that fact, in part, was the reply, which
prompts my application. It is in that very
neighbourhood
that your assistance will be required. I
need not add, that, apart from the state's commission
which will be given you, an adequate compensation
will be assigned for the time which may be consumed
in the service, and the degree of labour and peril to
which you may be subjected.
It will give me pleasure, sir, to serve the state,
even without these considerations; but, I must
remind
your excellency of one qualification with which
I prefaced my first reply. If the duties required at
my hands, shall, in any way, affect the object which
I have in view, and which I must, under existing
circumstances, esteem paramount to every other, I
shall be compelled to decline the service, though I
do so with extreme reluctance, as a loss of
opportunity
for honourable employment. Will you oblige
me, sir, by suffering me to know the nature of the
business.
Certainly. Briefly then: we have advices by
express from the authorities of Alabama, which
inform
us of a singular and extensive plan of outlawry,
which has its source either in that state or in ours,
and perhaps in both, and numbers no fewer than
fifteen
hundred adherents in the two. This number
has, I doubt not, been grievously exaggerated. If it
be not, we are in very sad condition. Of one thing
these letters assure me, that many of our citizens,
hitherto held in good esteem, are sworn confederates
of these banditti, and in one disguise or another trail
through all parts of the state, and sometimes
operate
in fixed places with even more effect, as they
appear under characters the more specious and
imposing
.
Then we have positive intelligence that one
of our justices of the peace belongs to this band, and
we are scarcely in doubt that a militia officer, of
whom the public has hitherto thought very highly, is
himself a leader among these outlaws. Their
commander
in chief, one Clym or Clem Foster, made
his escape from certain citizens of Tuscaloosa county
about three weeks ago, and was reported to have
crossed
over by way of Cotton-gin Port within the last ten
days. A man answering to his description was seen
in that neighbourhood about that time. Thus, you
have in brief the aspect of affairs. You see one of
the chief difficulties in our way. To move openly,
and with a force drawn from any other quarter of
the state, to act upon that in which these scoundrels
congregate, would be only to expel them temporarily,
and we should fail probably in taking a single
prisoner
.
To place a special commission in the hands of
any unknown person in that neighbourhood, would be
equally indiscreet, since it might be placing the whole
power of the state, for the time, in the control of
one of the very banditti whom we are striving to
subdue. We want a bold spirit, who will act
vigorously
when occasion serves; but one who can keep
his secret, work himself so adroitly as to sound those
with whom he mingles, sift the worthy from the
unworthy
,
and embody them in the proper moment for
the capture or destruction of these wretches.
Vernon heard the speaker with close attention.
We have summed up in short, what was only
delivered
in a dialogue of some length, in which the
questions of the former necessarily led to the
revelation
of many facts, of which, it is quite probable, the
governor spoke with some reluctance and with very
imperfect knowledge. When these facts had been
obtained, the answer of Vernon was immediate.
Your excellency shall judge for yourself of what
service I can be to you in this business, and how far
it will prove consistent with my present objects to
accept of your appointment. While you will not
deem my reluctance to arise from any lack of desire
to do my duty to the country which protects me,
you will, at the same time, hold me guiltless of the
vanity which would assume me to be possessed of
those endowments which you esteem, and correctly,
to be necessary to the proper success of the person
you select. You are probably, in part, advised of
the mission upon which I go to the Yazoo. I am in
pursuit of one, also a criminal, who, for aught we
know, may be one of these very banditti. Will it
be my policy to undertake this trust, when its
execution
may lead me into conflicts and necessities which
may defeat my present purpose?
Will it not? replied the governor. The capture
of one of the band, the discovery of the secrets of
one, and that one not the person whom you pursue
will these not be rather more likely than not, to lead
also to his detection?
I am afraid not, your excellency. Apart from the
obvious consequence of taking upon myself an
additional
employment, which must be, to a certain
extent
,
the diversion of my attention from, and my
pursuit of, the one object; these felons, according
to your own showing, are in possession of so
complete
a system, that unless you strike them, by a
simultaneous blow upon every link of their operation,
you endanger the success of your whole project. No
one man, setting out as I do, with so little
preparation
,
and without concert with any other operatives,
can possibly hope to effect any thing in this double
business. It would give me pride to act in this
matter
,
as your excellency desires; believe me, sir, I
feel deeply this honourable compliment, but I am
perfectly convinced, that, unless it positively
happened
in my way, to act upon the information you give,
I should esteem it unwise to go aside from my
path, and jeopard the success of that other purpose,
which, as it is of vital importance to Mr. Carter, is,
I assure you, of little less importance to me.
The governor seemed much chagrined by this
answer, and strode the chamber with ill-concealed
disquiet. Vernon resumed.
When, however, I decline the assumption of this
charge, as a distinct and responsible appointment,
your excellency, I do not mean to say that I would
not do any thing, if called on in a moment of
emergency
,
10*
to promote the welfare of the state and secure
its peace.
You would confer on this subject with another,
should I send him to youyou would act with him
if it took you not off from your present business?
demanded the other eagerly.
More, sir; I acknowledge your right, in the state's
emergency, to call upon me to risk my life should
that be necessary.
Enoughyou shall have blank commissions to
use at your discretion, and I will give youStay!
did you hear nothing, Mr. Carter? And as the
governor put this question his finger pointed to the
inner door, leading to the stairway. A slight
rustling
movement was evident at this moment, and
instantly
approaching it, his hand was extended to the
latch, when it partially unclosed without his aid, as
if in consequence of the sudden withdrawal of one's
grasp from without. The dark outline of a man
was perceptible through the aperture.
The outlaw himself, by heaven! cried he, as
he beheld the indistinct outlines of the person without.
It is Fosterit answers the description.
With these words the governor rushed to the door
with the intention of pursuing, but his purpose was
defeated by a hand from without, which, grasping
the handle, drew it to, and held it firmly against all
his efforts. Meanwhile, steps were heard as of one
descending the stairs. The moments were precious,
and with that promptness of movement which was a
prime and distinctive feature in the character of
Vernon, and tallied well with his keen intellect, no
less than with his great personal strength, he threw
his weight with a bound against the obstruction, and
tore it with a single effort from its hinges. The frame
work was sustained only by the person from without
whose grasp had hitherto secured the door. In another
moment the arms of the youth were wrapped around
him, and, in spite of his exertions, he was hauled into
the room to answer for his essay at eavesdropping.
What means this violence, gentlemen,
demanded
the eavesdropper, who was no other than
Hawkins
.
Who are you?what do you here, and where
is the other ruffian, your comrade, sirrah?
Hard words, sir, and you shall answer for them,
was the reply of the fellow. I am here because I
lodge herethat is my chamber, and by these stairs
I descend from it, and go to it when it pleases me.
Take your hand from my collar, young one, or I
will hurt you. He accompanied these words with
a threatening action, which Vernon, to whom they
were addressed, only answered by hurling him to the
ground with as much ease as if he had been an
infant
;
setting his knee upon his bosom, and drawing
thence the bowie-knife, the possession of which he
suspected, as he saw the fellow unbuttoning his vest.
But the greater villain must be secured. I saw
his personI have seen him before, and I am sure
I cannot be mistaken. It is Fosteryou heard him
descending,he cannot be far,let us take this
fellow
forward till we can deliver him to an officer, and
set some in pursuit.
You carry me not from this house, growled the
fellow from beneath the knee of Vernon. This is
my housemy castleand you shall answer for
this, or there's no law for a poor man in
Mississippi
.
You shall have law enough, my man, replied
the governor. Ben Cartersince this fellow will
give us the trouble to carry him,run to the sheriff,
and bid him bring his posse. We shall provide him
closer lodgings for a time, and he may then play
eavesdropper to those who are more of his own
complexion.
In due time Hawkins was delivered to the sheriff,
and pursuit commenced after the outlaw; but the
hounds were soon at fault; the buck had baffled
them, and was now out of reachtaking a zigzag
course within five miles of Raymond, as coolly as
if there were no sheriff within fifty. By night he
was back again, and lingered long enough to hear
from those who little suspected his interest in the
narration, a long story of his own escape, and of
Hawkins' commitment. The story went that he and
the governor had grappled fairlythat the governor
had got all the advantages, but that he had gotoff.
Which was pretty nearly the true state of the case.
CHAPTER VIII.
I hope that I shall ride in the saddle. O, 'tis a brave thing for a
man to sit by himself! He may stretch himself in the stirrups, look
about, and see the whole compass of the hemisphere. You're now,
my lord, i' the saddle.
Webster
The White Devil
.
The
necessary documents had come, court was
over in Raymond, and on a cold, frosty morning,
while yet the day only glimmered with a faint
redness
through the eastern chinks, Harry Vernon,
booted and spurred, prepared to mount his good
steed, on his journey of adventure. Carter stood
beside him, having given his last instructions. He
was visibly affected with the thought of parting from
one whom he regarded as warmly as he could have
done his own and only child; and this feeling was
much increased, as he beheld the unreluctant and
prompt determination of the youth to undertake and
execute to the best of his abilities, a labour which
involved the prospect of so much fatigue, and,
possibly
of so much peril. This last consideration, at the
moment of separation pleaded more strongly in the
old man's mind than any other.
And yet, Harry, my son, said he, when I hear
of this banditti, and behold the audacity with which
they act, I am afraid to let you go. God forbid that
you should risk your life that I might recover or save
a few thousands, which I should be suffered but a few
years to enjoy, and which I need not now. It is not
too latelet William Maitland go, and prosper, if
he may, with his ill-gotten treasures,why should I
send after him, to possible loss, one that I value so
much more? Why should you take this toil, which
takes you from a profession which you have so
honourably begun; and carries you among the
profligate
and the dangerous.
Nay, nay, my more than father; replied the
youth affectionately, you make the risks too great,
and the matter less important than it is. There is
but little danger, I trust, as I shall manage the
pursuit
;
and it was only in order to avoid unnecessary
encounters, that I declined accepting the governor's
offers. On this point I shall be well guarded. I
shall proceed slowly, moderately; neither seeking
the crowd, nor yet avoiding it; and only penetrating
into forbidden places, when there are probabilities of
my finding William Maitland within. The loss is
much greater than you think for, since, though you
are liable only for the amount of your bond, yet, in
a moral point of view, you are not free from
responsibility
for all the money over that amount, of which
he has robbed the bank. Your readiness to answer
for his honesty, implied in your guarantee for so much
money, induced their trusts; and though they may
demand of you but thirty thousand dollars in law,
in morals you owe it clearly to them to spare no
exertions which shall, in addition, get them back the
other sums for which they have no responsible
guarantee. A moment's reflection, under your own
convictions of what is right, must clearly establish
to your mind this truth. As for my dangerset
your heart at rest, as I shall certainly set mine. I
have a cool, deliberate temper, which will not flare
up at every fool's folly, and I am, I think, sufficiently
under the guidance of prudent thought, to keep from
the heels of any brute in his moment of anger.
Give me your prayers, my dear sir, when I am
gone, and I know not that I shall find or need any
better protection.
Yet it is needful, my son, that you have some of
the more carnal engines. You have weapons?
Enough, if pistol and bowie-knife can ever be
enough. I have a pair of pistols, and a small but
heavy knife. I doubt if I shall need them.
I have then only to repeat what I have said
before
,
Harry: I have no desire to drive this man to
utter destitution. He has childrenthe children of
Ellen Taylor, and she in her grave. God forbid that
I should do any thing to make them destitute or
wretched. Let him yield up every thing, and, as I
have told you, I will secure to them the sum of
twenty-five thousand dollars, under such restrictions
as will keep it from his creditors, and from his own
profligacy. I need not say to you, however, that he
is one upon whom you cannot rely; you must have
him in your power; you must keep him in your
power, and the money must be disgorged, before
you sign papers. Avoid, I need scarcely tell you,
all unnecessary exposure of his villany, for her
sake, for the sake of her children, both of whom are
females.
You have written, sir, to Mason at Vicksburg?
Yes, and to Fleetwood at Benton, and Mercer
at Lexington. They will provide you with funds
when called upon.
There is nothing more to be asked, said the
youth, leaping to his saddle. I will write to you
at Natchez when necessary. God bless you, my
dear sir, and keep you in healthfarewell!
He did not stop to hear the parting accents,
tremblingly uttered, which the good man sent after
him in blessings. In ten minutes the forest had
shrouded him from sight, and the tearful eyes of
Carter strained after him in vain.
Let us return to Saxon, otherwise Clement Foster,
the outlaw of Alabama. Having satisfied himself,
by personal inquiry, of the condition of Hawkins,
his companion, in Raymond, he left the village at
midnight, and, to verify the Scripture phrase which
denies all rest to the wicked, he rode nearly fifteen
miles at that late hour of the night. His course lay
somewhat across the country in the direction of
Grand Gulf, and came at length to a little farmstead
which stood in a half dilapidated condition at the head
of a turn-out, that is barely perceptible at any
time from the road, and only obvious at night to one
familiar with it. Here he routed up two men, who
proved his confederates, and with whom he conferred
for an hour before retiring to rest. This he did at
length in a shed-room of the hovel, which, it would
seem from the tacit manner in which it was got in
readiness for him, without orders, was reserved for
him especially. Some portions of his conference
with these men, as they may affect this narrative,
should be given to the reader.
Has Jones come up from Pontchartrain?
demanded
the leader.
He was answered by one of the men in the
negative
.
He will then be here to-morrow, but I shall not
wait for him. He must go on as fast as horseflesh
will carry him, and meet me if he can at Brown
Betsy's to-morrow night. You can counsel him to
come sober, if he comes at all, for I wish him to
skulk and follow, and play at point-hazard, perhaps,
with as keen a lawyer as rides the Mississippi
circuit
.
Be sure and tell him this, that he may drink
his alkalis and purge himself of the gin bottle. It
is a day's purgation; but he must do it while he
goes. He brings your share of the money from the
Atchafalaya business; but, by the Lord Harry,
Stanton, money seems to do you little good. You
are even now in rags.
That's because I don't get it by good means, I
suppose, said the fellow spoken to, in half-sleepy,
half-surly accents.
What, do you preach too, sirrah! Butgo to
bed, and forget not when you waken what I tell you
now. You will also remember it, Drake. The
matter
is of more consequence than you think for, and
will swamp us all, if we keep not our eyes open and
our heads clear. To sleepto sleep.
At day-dawn, the outlaw was again in motion,
visiting other haunts and dwellings of his fraternity,
that lay in his way, while pursuing an upward
course that carried him along the waters of the
Loosa Chitto or Big Black river. It so happened
that this very course was that taken by Vernon,
though the latter, as his progress was
straight-forward
,
was necessarily much in advance of the
outlaw
.
At the time of which we write, this region of
country was very thinly settled. The traveller rode
forty or fifty miles per day, very frequently
without
seeing sign of human habitation, and his road
lay through swamps that seemed like vast rivers of
mire, which his horse, with a feeling like his own,
would approach with a footstep most mincing and
deliberate. Travel in such a territory is travail,
indeed
,
and to one accustomed only to the stage and
steamboat facilities of the Atlantic states, it has the
aspect of something even more afflicting. The
swimming of creeks surcharged by freshets, and
wading through the ooze of a cane-brake, each
plunge into which makes the mire quiver around
the very shoulders of your horse, would be
something
of a warning to young couples to stay at
VOL. I. 11
home the first month after marriage, in that
neighbourhood
,
and not go upon connubial expeditions of
two or three hundred miles, just after the knot has
been safely fastened. Its disruption might be no
infrequent
consequence of such a doubtful practice.
To one like Vernon, however, bold, and governed
by a temperament that gloried in a dash of romance,
the occasional perils of such a course were lost
altogether
in the novelty of the circumstances; and he
dashed through the creek with a confident spur,
without stopping like more wary adventurers to
probe his footing with a pole, then drive his horse
through the stream, while he cooned a log above
it. These little obstructions were not unfrequent in
his route, but they offered no impediment to him.
The duties of life and manhood, opening for the first
time upon his consciousness fairly, were provocative
of that stimulant only, which we are apt to see in
the forward boy, to whom nothing gives so much
delight as being permitted to flourish with the tools
of full-grown men. He had neither father nor
mother
,
with painful misgivings of himself, to awaken
his own painful thoughts; and, unlike most young
men of his age, his heart remained perfectly
uncommitted
to any one of the hundred damsels, who, in
every civilized community, seem always to lie in
waiting for vacant hearts. In short, he had little to
lose of positive possession, whether of wealth or of
affection; he had every thing to gain in both
respects
.
His income was yet limited, and for ties, he
knew none nearer than that with the worthy Mr.
Carter. His present object was calculated to serve
himself no less than his patron, though the handsome
reward offered by the bank for the recovery of the
lost money, or the delivery of the felon, would never
have moved the proud young lawyer from his chosen
place at the bar, but that the interests of his friend
his preservation, in factabsolutely required it. But
this the reader already understands.
The turn of noon was at hand, and as yet our
young traveller had eaten nothing. The thought of
himself made him considerate of his horse, a noble
animal, the gift of Carter some two years before. A
pleasant rising-ground on his right, from the foot of
which a little branch wandered prattling across the
road, suggested all necessary conveniences for
refreshment
,
the other appliances being forthcoming.
We will ride, Sylvan, up this hill, which seems
grassy enough to give you a good hour's
employment
,
and, in the meanwhile, Mrs. Horsey's biscuits
and smoked beef shall answer my purposes. The
good old lady!how she wondered to find her plate
of biscuits missing, and how she routed the cook
and Tom, the waiter, and the whole household,
except
the true thief, touching their loss. I suppose
by this time Carter has told her all about itthe
why and the wherefore. Good old man! If I can
only save him this money, I shall feel that I have
done something to deserve the favour which he has
always shown me. If mind and body can do this
thing, such as I have shall be given without stint or
hesitation to the task,so heaven prosper me in my
own purposes hereafter.
This soliloquy was muttered as the youth rode his
horse upon the hill, and led him to a spot where he
might graze freely without wandering. He stripped
him of the saddle and valise, which he placed beside
a log, then seating himself, drew forth his little store
of provisions, the biscuits which had been
appropriated
by Carter the night before, to the probable
consternation
of his worthy landlady. To have asked
for them, would have been to declare the purpose of
travel which Vernon had in view, and this, once
known to the mother would have been soon known to
son Tom, and through his communicative medium to
every third person, at least, in the little world of
Raymond. The knife of our traveller was already
buried in the smoked beef, when his ear distinguished
a sound not unlike that of an approaching horseman.
The ears of his own steed pricked upward at the
sound, and when it became more distinct, the
conscious
animal whinnied as if with the joyful
conviction
that he was about to have a companion.
Vernon
started to his feet as the horseman came in sight,
and was absolutely dumb with astonishment to
recognize
at a single glance the person of our
eccentric
friend, Tom Horsey. His horse was well
heated
by hard riding, and covered with foam; and he
himself, though chuckling mightily at having found
the object of his search, alighted from his steed with
the air of one whose bones ached with his unwonted
jolting.
Ah, Harry, Harrywhat shall I say to thee,
Harry! Shall I call thee a traitor to friendshipto
heel it before day-peep, and say no word to the fellow
most after thy own heart. `That was the unkindest
cut of all.' I did not think it of thee, Harry! By
the ghost of Garrick, I did not!
Much annoyed at his pursuit and presence,
Vernon
was quite too much surprised at the event, and
too curious to know the cause of the actor's
pertinacity
,
to express himself as freely, and perhaps as
harshly, as he might otherwise have done.
Truly, Mr. Horsey, I know not what you mean,
or what you have to complain of. I am surprised
to see you here.
You need be; you deserve no such love at my
hands, Harry Monmouth. You should have spoken
out like a manthough you said it in a whisper.
Am I a man to blab? Can't I be trusted, think you?
By Pluto, Harry Vernon, I can be as close as Ben
Carter himself, and the dry cock should never have
heard a syllable. Bah, I am monstrous tired. That
rascally horse goes all one-sided,he has been ruined
by dad, and will never suit any but a lame man
again. I do think he has dislocated my hip.
Your father's horse, Mr. Horsey? How can the
old man do without him? You will surely return
with him immediately.
Devil a bit, Harry, devil a bit. He deserves to
lose him for not having a better in the stable, and I
will trade him off the first chance, though I get one
old as Methusaleh.
But wherefore are you here, Mr. Horsey? You
do not mean to travel, surely.
Do I not? Look at the bags!Filled, sirfilled
to the muzzle, with my best wardrobe. There's a
Romeo and a Hamlet, two field-officers and a Turk
in that wallet, not to speak of certain inexpressibles,
which will do for a dozen uncertain characters.
Butthis is dry work. What's in your flask?
He did not wait to be answered, but clapped the
bottle, which lay with the bread and beef at Vernon's
feet, to his mouth, and long and fervent was the
draught which he made therefrom.
Good whisky that, and whisky's an honest
beverage. And now, Harry, a bite of your biscuit.
You will laugh, perhaps, but of a truth, I look upon
Falstaff's proportion of bread and sack, as decidedly
the best for a traveller in winter. `This is a nipping
and an eager air,' and nothing blunts its edge so
well as a good sup of Monongahela. This dough
stuff makes one feel as dry and crusty as itself. But
you do not eat, Vernon.
Why truly, sir, I am so surprised to see you
here, that I had almost forgotten that I was hungry.
But, perhaps, you bring me some message from Mr.
Carter?
11*
Carter, indeed! Oh, no! I was quite too sly
for that. The moment Jim told me you were off
for it seems he saw you and Carter go to the stable
by dawn, or, as he swears, before itI had just risen
to take my antifogmatic; and at the word, I at once
guessed what you were after!
Indeed! And pray what was that? demanded
Vernon, with some curiosity, interrupting the
garrulous
speaker.
Ah, ha! all in good season, my master. You
thought to blink me, Harry, but you must know I
had a hint of your true business two days before
from some clever chaps in Raymond.
The wonder of Vernon increased, but the other
suffered him as little time to indulge it as to make
inquiries.
I tipped Jim the winkset him to saddle Gray
Bowline, dad's old dot and go one, and fasten him
behind the stable, while I donned my first come
atables
,
and rammed the rest in dad's old saddle-bags,
where I'll show them to you when you please.
These I handed to the sooty scamp, who will do any
thing for my lovewhen paid in moneyand he got
the nag caparisoned in twenty minutes, and ready
to my heel. Down stairs I went, andplump!
met the old lady, my ever venerable mamma, in the
passage-way. `Tom,' says she, `where are you
going so soon?' `Don't ask me, mother,' says I,
looking monstrous hurried, and going fast ahead,
`don't ask me, I beg you;' and off I went. In two
minutes I was on, and off. A few bounds brought
me into the woods, and your track was fresh enough
for the eyes of a young hunter. I heard of you once
by the way, butyour nag goes monstrous fast, if
he goes easy! Mine!by the petticoats of Ophelia
after her drowninghe has skinned me utterly all
of one side. I have found you, however, my dear
Harry, and I don't value the skinning. We shall
never part again. Skin or no skin under my bends,
I keep up with you though the devil's brimstone
smokes under your horse's tail.
Indeed, Mr. Horsey, but there go two words to
that bargain, replied Vernon, with an air of
resoluteness
,
and a face of but half-concealed chagrin.
`Agreed' shall be one of them, Harry, replied
the unembarrassed actor.
But how, Mr. Horsey, if I tell you that our
roads lie apart.
Impossible!they do not, Harryby my soul
they do not! I have the best information on that
subject. As I said before, I know your secret
your whole plan of operations, and, by all the
blessings
of the foot-lights and a fine audience, if you do
not suffer me to join with you in the business and
share profits, I'll run against you. I'll take the
morsel
from your mouth,
`And pluck the golden-eyed success away
From your young grasp.'
What can this witless fellow drive at! was the
unspoken soliloquy of Vernon, ere he replied to the
speaker. Can he really know any thing?it is
scarcely possible. There is some mistake; and I
must sound him cautiously. Aloud:
And what may be this goodly scheme of mine,
Mr. Horsey, in which your mind is so resolutely
resolved
to share. I am positively puzzled, and know
not how it is possible that a purely private
business
Purely private, you call it. 'Egad, before I'm
done with it, it shall be public enough. You thought
yourself mighty secret in your schemings, and I
confess you did blind me for awhile, and I took it
for granted that you really had no other object in
view than to run the dry course of a lean lawyer,
and jog from court-house to court-house, circuit after
circuit, picking up your pay in corn and bacon, and
getting a bastard fame from speeches as full of
words as Gratiano's, made in cases of trespass,
pounding, black eyes, and bloody noses. I give you
credit, now that I discover your purpose, for being
something bolder, and for an ambition of a more
enduring
and ennobling sort. But I can hardly forgive
you, Harry, for keeping a dumb side to me when you
knew my passion. I can be trusted, as you shall
see. You will find me a man after your own heart,
if your heart be open;a fellow wise enough to
speak only upon cues, though otherwise a born
rattler
;
and one who, whatever his woolheaded
neighbours
may say, can always `tell a hawk from a
handsaw,' in whatever quarter the wind may blow.
Puzzle on puzzle! exclaimed Vernon, now more
than ever convinced that his companion was mad.
What is it that you really mean, Mr. Horsey?
speak plainly, or I shall suspect you to be a
candidate
for bedlam or the calaboose.
Bedlam or the calaboose! Come! I don't like
that so well, Harry Vernon. I take it as something
unkind, sir, that you should speak in such fashion.
But, I see how it is; I forgive you; it is natural
enough that you should look on me as one likely to
go between you and the public. But you shall find
me generous. By the powers, Harry, I care not
much where I come in, whether as one, two, or
three, when a friend's fortune and desires are
concerned
.
You shall go before, and I will follow, or
we will enter side by side, on equal terms, marching
to equal victory. Envious or jealous of rival merit,
I never was and trust never to become, satisfied that
success has twenty thousand hands, and one willing
for every bold, worthy fellow that stands ready and
dares to grasp it. Harry Vernon, I drink to our
joint success.
The actor repeated his draught, but Vernon began
to be seriously annoyed by the intrusion, and thought
it high time to put an end to it. Never dreaming of
the conjecture which had taken such possession of
his companion's brain, and ignorant, of course, of the
stories which had been told him, he could form no
positive idea of the subject of his ravings, and began
seriously to consider him a fitting inmate for the
calaboose or bedlam, as he had already suggested to
the other's momentary discomfiture. His first
movement
,
therefore, was to restore his spirit-flask to the
valise, then, assuming what calmness of manner he
could, and taking especial care that while his words
should be inoffensive, they should be to the point at
least, he addressed him in a manner which was
intended
to bring his play at cross-purposes to a
conclusion
.
You have said a great deal, Mr. Horsey, which
for the life of me I cannot understand. Pray tell
me, without quotation or circumlocution, what it is
you meanwhat you intendand above all what
scheme it is, which you assume that we entertain in
common. I am not peevish nor fretful in my
disposition
,
yet I am not willing to suffer any trifling or
merriment at my expense.
Or, in more legitimate phrase, considering our
purposes, repeated the actor
`Though I am not splenitive and rash,
Yet have I in me something dangerous,
Which let thy wisdom fear.'
Prithee, my good Hamlet, smooth thy looks, and
dismiss
that cloud, full of lightning, that teems in
threatening
above thy brows. I mean thee no harm, no
hurt, no offence. I am a fellow, as I tell thee, after
thy own heart, and thou dost wrong thyself no less
than me, to be angry with me. Why wouldst thou
that I should tell thee in plain, point-blank matter,
what is thy business, and what should be mine?as
if thou wast resolved not to know, and couldst
deceive
me any longer. Dost thou not seek Tilton?
Tilton! exclaimed Vernon in profound
astonishment
,
mingled with something more of good humour
than before, as it now became obvious to him that
Horsey had blundered upon the wrong man, and
knew nothing of his secret, of which he had been in
some little apprehension.
Ay, Tilton, Tilton, the little lamplighter and
candle-snuffer and letter-carrier for so many years
at Cdwell's. He, who has now set up to be an
actor, a manager, and what not; and is going to
open at Benton, where thou and Iif thy stomach
be not too proud, Harry Vernon, for such
companionship
,
as I greatly fear me,will star it
together
,
to the confusion and admiration of the
natives
.
There, you have it; and might have saved
me all this trouble by owning to the truth before.
Deny me now if thou canst, my bully rook; thou art
not aiming at Benton,thou dost not seek for Tilton,
thou wouldst not leave the dry bones of the law,
for the wit of Mercutio and the marrow of
Falconbridge
.
In short, thy ambition leads thee not to
emulate the Garricks and the Keans, the Macreadys,
the Forrests, the Coopers, the
The unmitigated laughter of Vernon silenced the
actor, whose face of exultation it turned of a sudden
into soberness.
What do you laugh at, Mr. Vernon, I should like
to know!
Who put this silly thought into your head, Mr.
Horsey? Who could have bedevilled you with this
nonsense?
Bedevilled!Silly thought! I see nothing silly
about it, Master Vernon, and wonder that you should.
Do you deny it?
Every syllable.
What, that you are about to appear on the
stage?
I do.
You are not going to Benton to join the
company
?
On my soul, I am not.
Or wherever the company may act? You go
not to join Tilton?
I know nothing of the man.
It won't dothat cock won't fight, Harry
Vernon
,
responded the other, after a pause. I have
the matter on good evidence. Deny it as you may,
I believe it; begging your pardon for seeming to
doubt you; but the truth is, that all the circumstances
tell against you. I am sure you are going to join
Tilton, and, my dear fellow, confess the truth; you
will not trust me with your secret, for fear that I
shall blab it to Ben Carter. But, on my honour
Believe what you will, Mr. Horsey, replied
the other with recovered gravity. I have no sort
of objection to any strange notion that you may
take into your head; only, I pray that you may not
bother me with the mare's nests that you may
discover
,
nor challenge my admiration of the eggs.
You're angry with me, Harry. Come, my dear
boy, hand out your flask again, and we'll take a sup
of reconciliation.
No, sir; I will let you drink no more while you
are with me. You have taken a mouthful too much
already.
How, sir, do you mean
The swagger of the worthy histrion, who was
not apt to be a braggart, and was in truth a
good-meaning
fellow, was cut short by the sudden and
angry interruption of his more solid and resolute
companion:
Look you, Mr. Horsey, my road lies above, and
yours is below, with your parents. Let us separate.
Nay, nay, Harry Vernon; but you are quite
too hard upon me. Don't be vexed with me, because
I am a dd good-natured fool, that loves good
company
too well to quarrel with it. I don't mean to
vex you, but I am resolved, unless you put a bullet
through my cranium, to keep up with you to Benton.
I'd rather lose any thing short of life than lose the
chance of a good engagement. So, whither thou
goest, thither will I go also,where thou leadest
there will I follow,at least, until the manager gives
out the casts, and then, Harry, as thou wilt, and the
author pleases.
This resolution, though it annoyed Vernon, as it
expressed a determination to keep with him whether
he would or not, and might for a while operate
against his objects, was yet expressed in terms and
a manner so very conciliatory, and the poor histrion
seemed so completely to speak from his heart, that
Vernon resolved to bear with him awhile, nothing
doubting, that when the other found, as he was like
to do in another day, that his footsteps did not incline
to the place where the actors had pitched their tents,
he would be very willing to leave him without more
words. He contented himself, therefore, with
renewing
his assertion that he had nothing to do with
the players, and that Horsey deceived himself, or
had been grossly misled on the subject of his
inclining
to the stage. But the re-asseveration was of no
avail. The faith was infixed too deeply, and with a
chuckle, as he mounted his nag, the enthusiastic
actor replied
Oh, what's the use, Harry, my boy, of keeping
up that ball? It must come down sooner or later,
and one would think you would be weary of such a
sport. Let this humour cool`it is no good
humours
.'
Look not coldly upon me, for, on my soul,
if thou wilt have it so, thou shalt have the choice of
the cast whatever it may be, and as for little Tilton,
he shall learn as a first lesson, that we shall neither
of us do any thing for him, unless we do it to our
own liking. And now to horseto horse
`Wanton as youthful goats, wild as young bulls.'
It was scarce possible for Vernon to resist
laughter
;
certainly, he found it impossible to keep anger
with such a creature; a thing so light, so weak, so
utterly wanting in all those timely calculations of
propriety and good providence, as to make it seem
a sort of brutality to visit upon his faults with
harshness
.
They took horse together, and while they
rode, the actor seasoned the way and dialogue with
quotations,
Thick as leaves in Valambrosa.
Vernon strove at every opportunity to disabuse
his mind of the error which it had adopted in
reference
to himself; but his very earnestness seemed
only the more to convince the other to the contrary.
His answer to all such efforts consisted only of a half
laughing rebuke to his companion, who aimed at the
monopoly of the best character, and was jealous of
that interposition and rivalship on his part, which he
studiously assured Vernon, at the same time, should
never annoy him. The latter gave up the effort
which he found so perfectly unavailing, leaving it to
time, the general rectifier of man's mistakes, to put
a conclusion to this.
VOL. I. 12
CHAPTER IX.
How indirectly all things are fallen out!
I cannot choose but wonder what they were,
Rescued your rival.
If I fit you not
With such a new and well-laid stratagem,
As never yet your ears did hear a finer,
Call me with Lilly,
Bos, Fur, Sus atque Sacerdos
.
Ben Jonson
Tale of a Tub
.
Youth
is not the season for enduring enmities.
That is a cold heart and a malignant spirit which
preserves its bitterness and asperities through the
summer, and in spite of all its sunshine. Harry
Vernon, besides being of a just and generous nature,
was also of a cheerful and social one, and he soon
discovered that there was no good reason for
keeping
up a cloudy front to the vacillating and
wayward
creature who rode beside him, and whom an
erring judgment and, probably, fine but misdirected
endowments, were hurrying on to his own
destruction
.
By degrees he resumed his kindly manner to
the obtrusive but well-meaning actor, and as he
found that he could not rid himself of his company,
he resolved to make the most of it. This
resolution
once taken, it required but few words on the
part of Vernon to unlock all the stores of memory
and experience in Horsey's possession. The erratic
creature, from long wandering into forbidden places,
had picked up a wholesale, if not wholesome,
collection
of anecdote and story. His imitative
faculties
were good, and he illustrated his scenes by
taking off, with considerable humour, the various
persons who appeared in them. Shakespeare, too,
was at his fingers' ends, and there was no lack of
passages, to fill out his own remarks, and enliven
their deficiencies. The dog read well, too, with the
single reservation, that he had not yet learned that
nice and most necessary art of allthat art which
scarcely one of our artists possesses in a meritorious
degree,of subduing his utterance to the demands
of the character, and the capacities of his own
voice. This evil results, in most cases, from the too
great size of the theatre, which, as it calls for great
physical powers of voice, must, except in the case
of energies singularly masculine, for ever defeat
its nicer regulations. Horsey had throat enough,
and the very best of lungs, and he was glad of any
opportunity for using them. The woods soon rang
with his sonorous passages, and Vernon, with the
feeling of the cautious citizen always alive to
ridicule
,
could not help now and then looking around
him, as if apprehensive that other ears were
suffering
from those clamours that seemed almost to
perforate
his own anew. These declamations, be it
understood, however, were not given with the
reckless
rapidity of one who has nothing beside in store
of his own; but the actor ingeniously contrived that
they should only occur in such places in his own
dissertations where they might enforce and illustrate
what he said. This was one of his arts additional,
by which he contrived that his masterpieces should
be brought in play; and, like the fellow who had a
gun-story, and in order to introduce it fairly into
company, acquired the art of imitating the report of
a pistol, so Tom Horsey practised, when alone, those
generalizing opinions on a thousand subjects, under
some one of which he could always classify the fine
things of Brutus and Cassius, Hamlet, Hotspur, and
Macbeth. When, with a generous consideration of
his companion, and a moderation which few great
talkers are prone to practise, he had tired himself
fairly down, he came to a halt, and declared aloud
his resolution to pause in time, for fear he should also
tire down his hearer.
But, could you hear me, Harry, when the scene
is filling, when the characters are by, the audience
silent and watchful, and the curtain drawnit
would be something. You would say it were
something, and that I were no insane fool, as some
of dad's friends will have it, and Ben Carter among
them. I feel that I have it in me, Harry Vernon,
and, by the Lord Harry, but it shall come out. I
have never had a fair chance yet, but the time must
come. Hitherto, they have taken advantage of my
necessity, and I have been compelled to walk
through wooden parts, which I scorned to move in
with any wasteful animation of my own. Nothing
but the delight of being upon the boards, amidst the
blessed blaze of lights which are no where so lovely
to my eyes as in a playhouse, could have made me
endure the damnable persecution and miserable
jealousies of those poor, incapable creatures, that
were able to do nothing themselves, and hated the
very sight of others who had it in them to do every
thing. I could tell you stories of the drudgery of
the stage, of the malice and the meanness of the
actors, of the mercenary baseness of managers,
their impracticability and insolence when
successful
,
and their dd dishonesty when otherwise,
which would shock you to hear, and which you
could scarcely ever believe. But you will learn for
yourself. One week with the little lamplighter,
unless you make a hitand then you can snap your
fingers in his face, and kick him with your worst
boots, and still have his thanks,one week with
him, however, as a stock-player, and you will curse
your stars that endowed you with faculties, yet left
them at the mercy of such eternal skunks as your
generality of managers are sure to be. But let us
bully little Tilton, and play our own characters,
work our way up the Mississippi, break out like
little comets with a double length of tail in
Louisville
and Cincinnati, and, by-and-by, touch the Park
boardsthe zenith of theatrical eminence in
America
,
where, Mr. Kean told us, with an equivocal sort
of compliment, that the taste for the drama was
periodicaland then, the devil take the hindmost
hey, for the crown and the triumph, the chariots
and the horsemen
`A kingdom for a stageprinces to act,
And monarchs to behold the swelling scene.'
Supper first, said Vernon, or I shall never
sufficiently ascend that highest heaven of invention,
to behold with you so respectable an audience, or to
regard it with any sort of satisfaction when I do so.
Look aheadsee you nothing of a log house?
There should be one on the left, a little in the
woods. That must be our baiting-place to-night;
and if you will prick up your beast, Mr. Horsey,
which, in your own industry, you have been
indulging
long enough, we shall probably avoid the
prospect
,
of which there is some present danger, of
being compelled to sleep in Big Black Swamp
to-night
,
with nothing but Shakspeare to keep us warm
or satisfy our hunger.
And enough too. He has kept me warm and been
my only supper many a night. But, I do see
something
12*
of an opening, and it is to the left. By the
ghost of David, Harry Vernon, an' if it shall be a
large one, we'll have a few passageswe'll make
a rouse. `Because thou art virtuous shall there be
no more cakes and ale!'it is a house`ay, and
ginger shall be hot i' the mouth too.'
Hush! said Vernon, with singular gravity.
Be still, if you do not want to lose every chance
of supper. Chickens in these parts take to the
woods whenever they hear or see a strangerthey
know, poor devils, by a sort of instinct, the fate that
awaits them.
'Gad, if that be true, it is a very singular fact.
Are you serious, Master Vernon?
Serious! Do you think I could jest about such
a matter? But seethere's the woman of the
house. She must have heard you the last three
miles. If not utterly out of voice from your late
exertions, you will perhaps be the best spokesman
here. See if we can get beds and baconthe
chickens, I suppose, unless she has them in coop
already, cannot be thought of.
A very singular fact! muttered Horsey, as,
giving spur to his steed, he led the way to the
wigwam
,
leaving Vernon to follow at his leisure.
Accommodations! said the woman, who was a
somewhat ill-favoured person, probably forty years
of age, having a face sober and grave even to
sternness
,
and speaking in accents slow, harsh, and
indifferent
have
I accommodations for two for the
night? Yes, sir, I have, but they are none of the
best, and neither of you gentlemen would be much
the better of them. Perhaps, you'd better ride
farther,and you'll be suited better. The night's
clear enough, though it be cool, and if you're going
to strike for the lower ferry, you'll get a place to
lie at, ten miles ahead. The upper ferry-house is
farther on, but not much, and the road's pretty
clear in a starlight. You'd better ride on, I'm
thinking.
Nay, my good madam, that will hardly suit us,
replied Vernon, riding upwe have already ridden
near forty miles to-day, having come from Raymond,
and I am resolved, unless you positively deny us
shelter, to go no farther to-night.
I'm sure I don't deny you, sir; I only tell you
how little we can do here to make you comfortable.
We're mighty poor people in these parts, and have
little to give strangers to make them satisfied. Now,
ten miles beyond
No more, my good madam, said Vernon,
alighting from his horse; we stop with you
to-night
;
and the sooner you give us supper the better.
In the meantime, you can tell my friend here what
I have already told him, that your chickens have
already taken to the woods.
Chickens
The speech of the woman was cut short by
Horsey, who had been steadily watching her
features
with an air of interest, and who now
advanced
,
laid his hand on her shoulder, with a degree
of familiarity that made her start and look
disquieted
,
if not angry, as she strove to withdraw
herself from so great a freedom. This, however,
he would not suffer.
By the cut of your teeth, as the cheese said to the
mouse, I know you, my worthy professor of
sassafras
and gunja. Brown Bessy Clayton, as I live!
And who are you, young mister, that's so free
with my name?my name that was, I meanfor
though I'm Brown Bess, I'm no Clayton now.
What's your name?
Why, Bess, you're getting old, my girl,your
memory's failing you. Don't you remember me
don't you remember little Tom Horsey, that was
your best customer when you sold cakes and beer
at Hogler's millthat burst your bottles by shaking,
and punched your cakes out of the tray by a long
pole sharpened at the end?
Yes, and got punched for it himself, responded
the woman, as these reminiscences of Horsey
awakened her own. And is it you, Tomlittle
Tom, indeed? Why, you can eat your cakes now
off my shoulder.
Ay, Bess, and a bit of the shoulder with it,
when I happen to be so hungry as I am just now.
And so you're married,and who did you marry,
Bess?I hav'n't heard of you for these ten long
years.
But I've heard tell of you, Tom Horsey. They
said you'd gone crazy, and that didn't seem strange,
for you always had a little twist in your
understanding
,
and couldn't do things jist like other people.
Did you ever hear such a defamation of genius?
exclaimed Horsey to Vernon in a manner of
affected
misery. But go on, Bess. What did you
hear?
Why, they said as how you had turned fair fool,
and how they'd got you down among the
player-people
at Orleans, and how they dressed you up in
a jacket and breeches full of colours and
spangles
My Romeo, by the shade of Juliet!
And how, continued the woman, they brought
you out before the company, and worried you, jist
like so many curs worrying a pig that had got into
the 'tato patch
Exquisite comparison, by my soul!
And how they all stuck at you with their swords,
and how you fell down and pretended to be dead,
and then how they dragged you out by the heels;
while every body, men and women, little and big,
laughed as if they would split. After that I heard
no more of you, and concluded you were dead for
good.
For good, say you? exclaimed the actor, as
the woman concluded. Well, Vernon, only think
now that this is the representation of one of my
best performances,my debut in Macbeth, for my
benefitwhen it so happened that a cargo of
Ishmaelites
from Pearl River, that had crossed
Ponchartrain
that day, came to the `American,' with
`every particular hair on end,' to see their `old
schoolfellow, Tom Horsey, son of John Horsey,
the lame man that kept tavern on the river-road:'
and this is the dnable report which they carried
back to the country in their ignorance and envy.
Is it not a most abominable trait in man, that he
hates to see his neighbour's successes? Every
whipster with whom he ever hunted 'possum in a
dark night, or shelled corn in husking-time, is ready
to disparage those talents which he cannot rival,
and to pull down that merit in a companion which
he thinksand it isa sarcasm upon his own
deficiencies
.
By Pompey's ghost, it is my own people
that have ever been the first to decry my
performances
,
and to wrest from me the just rewards
of my labours.
Well, don't you be running down the Pearl
River people, Tom Horsey; they're a mighty good
sort of people, Tom, and I only wish I was back
ag'in among 'em, said the woman.
Selling cakes and beer? said Tom.
Why, yes, sellin' cakes and beer; it's a mighty
good business for the time it lasts.
Five months at least, BessI remember all
about itfrom May to September, and if the season
was very warm, a month longer. 'Gad my
picayunes
melted as rapidly in those months, when I was
a boy, as my Mexicans have continued to melt ever
since I was a man.
There was another thing, Tom, that they told
about you, said the woman.
What was that? quickly demanded the actor.
Why, that you spent your father's money a
deuced sight faster than he could make it, and that
you are a mighty great
Say no more, Brown Bess; leave it where it is,
at the `mighty great.'
Riprobate, I was going to say, continued the
matter of fact woman; and I reckon, Tom, it is
not far from the right word.
Perhaps not, Bess; but no more of that an'
thou lovest me; I am reformed nowgrown quite
sobernever drink unless when the spirit moves,
and I expect soon to confess a working of mind as
active as ever was your beer, whenever I can meet
with old brother Abrams
Why he's dead!dead five years ago!
exclaimed
the woman.
Dead, you say! Who could have thought it.
Why he was the last regular preacher that I ever
heard. It makes me melancholy to think of it; so
let's in to supper, Vernon, with what appetite we may.
You're married, Bess? Where's your husband, and
what is hewhat's his name?
A dark cloud rose and rested on the woman's
brow as she heard this question, which she answered
slowly and briefly.
His name's Yarbershe's a middle-aged man
that'll be in, I reckon, directly. But I'm truly
thinking
,
Tom, that you and the other gentleman had
much better ride on to the other house. It's a short
ten miles, and an easy road.
Can't think of it, Bess; by the soul and
substance
of the fat knight, I cannot. We must partake
of your hog and hominy to-night; and I'm
surprised
,
Bess, that you seek to send us forward
without
supper. You were not wont to be so
inhospitable
.
Marriage has changed you, Bess.
I reckon it has, Tom, said the woman, but
I'm not wanting you to go without supper. I could
get it ready for you in a short five minutes, and you
might easily ride then.
By the Lord Harry, Bess, but this is altogether
too bad! What! pack us off the moment we've
swallowed our coffee, on a long road in a dark
night! I tell you, Bess, it won't do. We sleep in
your house to-night, by the peepers of that blessed
saint Monajahadjee, of the Chickasaws, that slept
every day in the week but the eighth, and never
opened one eye, unless it was to see if the other was
shut.
Well, just as you will, Tom, but, perhaps, the
other gentleman here?
The other gentleman here is my Castor; we
are Castor and Pollux, the inseparables. He never
goes without me, and I never go without him, and
so, strange as it may seem to you, we never go
without one another. If we never go without one
another, we also never stay without one another,
and, Bess, I have drawn this proposition almost
syllogistically to you, in order that you should
understand
that we shall sleep together in the same bed,
provided you cannot spare us one apiece.
Ah, Tom, you're the same rattlepate that you
ever was; and the older you grow, the wiser you
don't grow. I can't understand the half you say.
Not understand! Did ever one hear the like,
when I stated the case with singular simplicity in
order that you should understand.
Well, well, responded the woman, but let Mr.
Castor speak for himself. He don't say much, and
I reckon it'll be the easier for me to understand
him. I was saying, sir, here she addressed herself
to Vernon, I was saying, Mr. Castor
Ha! ha! ha! was the ecstatic roar of Horsey,
who made no attempt to correct the error.
Vernon is my name, said his companion
gravely. The old woman gave Horsey a single
look of reproof, then turning to Vernon proceeded
to repeat what she had already said touching the
propriety of his riding to the next tavern, which was
at the lower ferry, and only ten miles off, for his
night's lodging. Her reason for so singular a
suggestion
arose from the alleged poverty of her
accommodations
.
There is something strange in all this: there is
something secret here! was the unexpressed thought
of Vernon, and he drew his conclusion as much from
the earnest and bewildered countenance of the
woman
,
as from her words. His self-communion went
farther: I am on the borders of the Chittaloosa,
and my labours should now properly begin. Every
mystery may have mine in its keeping, and I must
search it if I can. This woman, it is evident, would
send me off rather than Horsey. I will stay.
He spoke this determination aloud.
Mr. Horsey has spoken for both of us, Mrs.
Yarbers, and we must stay with you to-night. Forty
miles is rather more of a journey than a horse should
be made to bear who is going to a swamp country,
and I am almost as anxious for sleep as supper.
Well, if you will, said the old woman
ungraciously
,
as she ushered them into the hall, and
summoned
a negro girl to take the horses to the stable.
The saddle-bags, valise, and saddles were carried into
the house. The travellers drew chairs, rough,
country
made, high-backed, and seated with untanned
deer-skins stretched across and tacked beneath;
while the old lady, opening a wooden cupboard of
plain pine that was fastened by pegs to the rear
wall, drew forth a couple of common junk bottles,
one of which, as she said, contained Monongahela,
and the other honey, as a sweetener.
A dram will comfort you after you ride, Tom,
though if you drink whisky as freely as you used to
drink the sassafras, you'll have an enemy in your
head that'll be sure soon to trip your heels.
I am commanded to love mine enemies, Bess,
but I try to weaken them a little, so that our wrestle
shall be even; there's no water here?
Mary's gone for some to the spring, Tom; my
darter Mary; she'll be here in a shake.
You've a daughter, too, eh? What sort of a
girl is she, Bess? A good, smart, active, little
creature, I suppose, a
The door opened, and the sudden appearance of
the daughter in question, silenced the speech, and
utterly confounded the speaker for an instant, as he
found himself confronted by as tall and pretty an
adversary in the shape of a damsel, as ever met the
eyes yet of an enthusiastic and self-assured young
man. He started to his feet, caught the vessel
which she bore from her hands, a little clean white
piggin with a gourd hanging upon the handle, and
setting it down upon the shelf which was placed for
it, exclaimed, all in a breath
This your daughter, Bess,this your Mary?
by the Capulets, but she is the very Juliet of the host.
I must have a kiss, Mrs. Yarbersfor auld lang
syne, Bessby all the damask roses that ever tried
to look like those cheeks, and faded out of envy.
I must, Marywhy, Mary, I am your mother's old
friendI'm your great uncle, Maryan innocent
VOL. I. 13
old man,you need not fear me. I mustthere's
no useI must.
The girl, who was probably not more than
sixteen
,
perhaps not that, retreated with no less dignity
than modesty, while, between jest and earnest, her
mother expostulated with the bashaw; but it is
probable that neither the reluctance and possible
flight of the damsel, nor the expostulations of the
mother, would have availed to protect her from the
parental tenderness of the venerable man, but for
the sudden interposition of another party, whose
mode of proceeding was of a more summary and
imposing character. The door opened while the
strife was at the warmest, and the husband of the
dame entered, followed by a sturdy youth of about
twenty years of age. Horsey was too much
interested
by the game in hand to look behind him, and
it was only when the youth, without a word, passed
in front, and placed himself between him and the
maiden, that he became conscious of the unexpected
interruption of his desires. The intruder's presence
semed almost as much annoying to Mary as to the
enamoured actor. She shrunk back with quite as
much promptness from her champion as from her
assailant, and this movement probably encouraged
Horsey with the idea that his chances were even
better now than before.
My worthy rustic, said he, give me but a
moment, another time I will acknowledge your
presence, but just at this timenay, stand aside, I
pray you, that I may do grace to the lips of that
little Juliet therea momentbut a moment.
Suiting the action to the word, Horsey put forth
his hand, intending, with the utmost gentleness, to
put him aside from his path; but his hand had
scarcely touched the shoulder of the other, when,
putting forth all his strength, he planted a blow
between the eyes of the actor, that gave him a very
comical vision of two crossed rainbows, the ends of
which were most singularly tied together. Down
he fell like a bullock in the same instant, and his
prompt enemy jumped upon him, and twining his
little finger in the locks of the fallen man, prepared
to thrust his thumb into his eyes.
Touch my eyes, man, and I put you to death as
sure as a catastrophe, exclaimed Horsey,
characteristically
,
as the effort of the other had brought
him to all his consciousness. The fellow would
scarce have heeded his threats, but by this time the
vigorous arm of Vernon had grasped him about the
middle, and flung him to the other end of the room.
We have omitted the screams of the women, which
were as loud as usual, and as rightly timed. Nor
have we deemed it necessary to say that old
Yarbers
a
fellow almost overcome with fat offered
sundry expostulations to the course of his companion,
which, however, as he never hurried to enforce
them, were as little heeded by the fierce young
rustic
as were the screams aforesaid. The effect of
Vernon's movement was more obvious. The youth
glared now upon him and now upon Horsey, who
had taken advantage of the interval to recover his
feet, as if doubtful which to attack. His hesitation
resulted from no want of hostile feeling, but simply
from the consciousness that there were two to contend
with now; and one of them, however easy he found
it to trip the heels of the other, had convinced him
that the play in his case could never be all of one
side. While he stood glowing and glaring, Vernon,
like a man satisfied that he had done all that was
required, resumed his seat, and with the assistance
of the woman of the house, made such an
acquaintance
with its master, as suited the relation of guest
and landlord. The good humour of Horsey did
something to restore the quiet of the rest.
Young un, said he, you've bloodied my nose,
and done it tolerably well, with some skill, but
scarcely with sufficient firmness. That up and down
blow, though it would fell an ox if hit squarely
between the eyes, is a monstrous dangerous one if
the enemy is watchful. It leaves your whole side
exposed, all your ribs, not to speak of your
diaphragm
,
a blow in which would make a fat man
uncomfortable for life. You, sir, turning to
Yarbers
,
you would find a blow in your diaphragm a
singular inconvenience.
Ay, sir, or any where else, said the person
addressed
,
with a good-humoured laugh, and scarcely
knowing how to understand the strange creature
who confronted him.
And now, Mary, continued the actor, stopping
the blood with his handkerchief, as it still continued
to issue from his nose, you were the cause, though
the innocent cause, of this young rustic's incivility.
You must help me to some water, that I may
remove
`this filthy witness from my hand'and
nose. `This is a sorry sight,' Harry. By the way,
I must not forget to thank you, Harry, for taking
that fellow's fingers from my eyes.
If you don't mind how you talk, stranger, I'll
put 'em there again, said the other, his wrath duly
increasing with the seeming composure and good
humour of Horsey.
I hope not, replied the latter, as well for your
sake as mine. Had you succeeded, my good fellow,
in your first attempt, you'd have been, by this time,
on the longest journey that you have ever taken in
your life, and doubtful whether you'd have found
easy ferriage across the river, unless your pocket is
lined with more picayunes than I think it holds at
present. What, my lovely Juliet, you have the water,
have you?
There's the piggin, Mr. Horsey, and here's the
towel, sir, said the damsel, whose sympathies for
the hurts which he bore so good-humouredly, seemed
to have made her less shy of him than she had shown
herself at first.
So, you know my name already, chucka
good name, Julietand your mother knew it many
days before you, though I must have known you
once. Therethere's a spot still, my Juliet! he
exclaimed, as, having wiped his face, he placed the
towel upon her hand, and before she could be
conscious
of his design, threw his arm about her waist
and inflicted upon her cheek as unequivocal a smack
as ever came from the hasty application of lip to
lip. The young gallant was again in arms, but
Horsey was ready for him, and the father, probably
dreading that the latter would use some weapon in
the strife, as he had already intimated, interposed
his authority with sufficient promptitude to prevent
the encounter.
If we don't get angry, Mr. Mabry, I wonder
why should you? Besides, this gentleman's an old
friend of Bess, and Mary's but a child to him.
Not so fastnot so fast, old gentleman! cried
Horsey, who was considerably nettled at this
imperfect
sort of chronicling; a child, indeeda
woman
,
a fine, lovely, ripe, bewitching damsel, this
same Mary of yours. She's no more a child than
I'm a grandfather. Now I come to think of it,
there can't be much difference between us in age
not so much as to make a difference in any
material
respect. Let me see, she's about sixteen, and
egad, Mrs. Yarbers, it can't be more than fifteen
years since I bought cakes from you at Hogler's
and I going to Hugh Peter's school. I was only
13*
ten then,sixteen and tenwhy do you talk of her
being but a child to me? Count for yourself
sixteen
and ten are twenty-six all the world over,
except
Connecticut, where, they say, it counts more
and I'll take Bible oath I'm not a syllable older.
What say you to that, sir? There's no young woman
of sixteen in Mississippi who, if she has any sense,
will find fault with a man of twenty-six.
Vernon was amused at the pains which the actor
took to vindicate his youth; and the result of his
calculations seemed still farther to increase the
annoyance
of his rustic rival, who, after a little while
spent in a condition of fever-heat, got up and left
the room. He was followed by old Yarbers.
Meanwhile, Horsey continued a playful chat with
the mother and daughter,his philosophy under
his bruises seeming to commend him to additional
favour, and both listening to him with pleased
attention
.
But, catching the eye of Vernon, in the
midst of one of his random speeches, he made him
a sign, then rising, declared his intention to see
what sort of night it was, and left the house.
Vernon
soon followed.
CHAPTER X.
Lycus
.
That spark jealousy falling into his dry melancholy
brain, had well near set the whole house on fire.
Tharsalio
.
No matter, let it work; I did but pay him in's
own coin.
Geo. Chapman
.
I am
decidedly one of the best-natured mortals
in existence, said Horsey, when Vernon joined him
in the little area in front of the cottage, but there is
something, Harry, in being knocked over, that would
turn the sweet milk sour in the best of bosoms. I bore
with this thing as patiently as possible while in the
presence of the women folk, but my gall has been
rising for the last half-hour, and I can stomach it no
longer. It must out, and nothing will help me,
Harry, but a clip or two at the muzzle of this same
Master Mabry. You must stand by, and see fair
play whilst I give him quits. Doubt not that I can
do it, Harry. `I have the back trick simply as
strong as any man in Illyria.'
It will make matters worse, Horsey. You
were wrong in pressing upon the girl at first. She
is something more than a child, and the customs of
our country
I know all that, Harry, and had I not been a
sort of chicken under the wings, at one time, of the
good old clucking hen, her mother, I had, perhaps,
never thought of kissing the girl; though by the
divinity of Rosalind, there's justification enough in
the lips themselves for the rashness of my pursuit.
The guilt is equal between the tempter and the
tempted. She who pouts a pretty mouth under
one's nose can no more blame a body for snatching
a civil kiss from the offender, than you can blame a
hawk for stooping down upon a plump partridge
that runs too freely from under the briars, and
tempts the appetite it is yet unwilling to satisfy.
You are supported in this notion, said Vernon,
with a smile, by an authority no less moral than
that of Dr. Johnson, who says that if you tempt a
man you do him an injury, and if you overcome him
you share his guilt. His view is also sustained by
the decision of an English justice, who once
committed
the master to prison for laying money in the
servant's way, and at the same time discharged the
servant who stole it.
'Gad, Harry, those were wise fellows. If I had
known so much could be said in my favour, I had
not stopped short at a single kiss. That man,
Johnson
,
didn't he once write a play?
Yes,a tragedy
I'll read ita devilish clever sort of fellow. A
fellow that knows so well how to justify a kiss, must
have made a very amorous piece of business of it.
Wasn't it so, Harry?
Nay,quite the contrary, I believe. The play
was rather a cold performance,the author was a
phlegmatic. It does not follow, you know, that a
good judge is a good performer; and to kiss a pretty
woman is a movement of one's blood rather than
his thoughtan instinct, not a reflection. Butto
return to our subject. You can gain but a paltry
satisfaction, Mr. Horsey, by punishing this young
man; and I should say, judging from mere
appearances
,
that he is too stout for you. He has more
brawn and muscle, and though not so tall is a much
heavier man.
You shall see, Harry. I have what he has not.
I have the trick of fence, and I have played long
enough with muffles to venture a little upon the bare
mutton. The stage is no bad school for acquiring
agility of motion in foot and fista keen eye and
sudden thrust makes me more than a match for this
pudding-headed fellow, as I shall convince him no
less than yourself, when I have laid eyes on him for
awhile. Here is the path which I saw through the
window. They made for yonder thicket, where, I
reckon, we shall find them.
I will stand by you, said Vernon, with
recovered
gravity, and see yo through with this
business, but while we keep together, Mr. Horsey, I
trust, for my sake, you will provoke no more
difficulties
.
I have some right to expostulate with you,
I think, as you have constituted yourself my
companion
,
not merely without my desire, but against
my wish. My objects in this country are such as
might suffer material detriment from any collision
with the people.
Pshaw, Harry, my dear boy, `still harping on
my daughter,' still at thy old `humours;' replied
the unthinking fellow. It won't do, I tell you. Our
objects are the same, though the range of character
may be somewhat different; as I confess myself to
be somewhat erratic, and a jump from Romeo to
Dogberry has been a folly of mine more than once
already. When you see me resolved, head and
heels, to go on with you `to the last gasp with truth
and loyalty,' why, what the devil's the use of
shamming
any longer? You can't get rid of me, do what
you will, unless, as I told you before, you put a bullet
through my brains, and that were only to scatter
them worse than ever, without doing me or yourself
any great service. Be generous, mando as I have
done, make a clear bosom of it, and we will down
upon little Tilton with a concerted plan of
operations
which shall make the rascal stare. We can
do as we please then with all the arrangements
get our own terms, declare our own casts, and
`All furnish'd, all in arms,
All plumed like estridges, that with the wind
Bated like eagles having lately bathed:
Glittering in golden coats'
By the way, Harry, you have not seen my dress in
Hal. You shall see it to-morrowyou shall see me
in it `rise from the ground like feathered Mercury'
made a dd ugly hole in dad's crop to pay for that
dress, I tell you. What would the old fellow say,
were I to count up to him the cost of stars and
spangles, beaver, crosses, images and plumes, in
cotton bags. Ha! ha! I think I see him now, his
game leg in air, his sound one thundering on the
floor, his eyes shooting out from their spheres, red
and fiery, and his voice hoarse and choking, still
resolute to roar the anathema, which sticks in his
throat, at last, more rigidly than a better sentiment
in that of Macbeth. Oh, Harry, what a scene!
But hold!Here's our enemy.
A bright moon helped the progress of the several
parties. Yarbers and young Mabry stood in a
small open space among a clump of pines
apparently
in earnest conversation, as the two approached
them. Mabry held his horse by the bridle, one
foot already in the stirrup, as if, the important
matters
of which they spoke being fairly discussed, he
lingered only for a parting word. That they were
seriously engaged was likely enough, since they
neither saw nor heard the approach of the two
strangers, till they had already passed into the same
opening with themselves. It was then that Mabry,
as if apprehending the object of his enemy, or, as
was more probable, desiring an opportunity to
renew a conflict in which his success had been so
unequivocal already, withdrew his foot from the
stirrup, and once more threw the bridle from his
steed's neck over the stunted sapling which had
before
confined him. This done, he kept his place
where the eyes of the two had first encountered
him, while Yarbers, with some agitation of manner,
advanced and addressed them.
A fine evening, gentlemen,fine for a walk,
and
Ay, or for any other purpose which needs a
cool temperature and a clear sky; was the ready
answer of Horsey, who, at the same time passing by
Yarbers, continued his speech to his companion
I am glad this clear moon has helped me to find
you, young un, since I should not have slept so
comfortably with the thought of being your
involuntary
debtor. I bear, sir, some tokens of your favour
on my cheek. I am not willing that you should go
unrequited. Do you understand me, sir?
This apostrophe did not seem at all ungrateful to
the rustic, who had rather hoped than expected so
early an opportunity to renew his punishment of an
offence which he had shown himself so unwilling to
tolerate, and which had been repeated so
audaciously
before his eyes. That he could punish the
impudent stranger, he had no sort of doubt. His
own physical prowess had been generally
acknowledged
among the young Spartans of the
neighbourhood
,
and the sudden and easy overthrow of
Horsey by his single blow, but a little while before,
and the good-natured forbearance of the latter
immediately
after, had given him but a mean idea as
well of the courage as of the strength of his
opponent
.
That Horsey should, with open eyes and
cool deliberation, come once more within his
clutches, was no less satisfactory than surprising;
and boldly confronting him, he answered his
salutation
in language that left little possibility of a
reconciliation
being effected by either of the bystanders,
both of whom attempted a consummation which
was so proper and desirable. Yarbers strove with
Mabry, and Vernon, though to a far more
moderate
extent, with Horsey. He knew that the
popular
sentiment made the course of Horsey one of
retributive
justice only, and his first overtures being
unsuccessful, he forebore renewing them, and
patiently
waited in silence the progress of events.
Yarbers, also, after a while, gave up, as useless, the
effort to mollify the champion on his side of the hill,
and the parties at length stood fitted, both ready and
anxious, to feed fat the ancient grudge.
Nothing surely could have been more curious than
the difference of mood which the two exhibited while
in this position. Mabry, at first, like a young bull
simply bent on mischief, approached his enemy with
slow steps, his rising temper indicated only by
occasional
sudden jerks of the head, and a slight fitful
stamping of the feet. A muttered growl escaped
his lips at intervals, and his fists were clenched
and opened alternatelyhis long fingers, the nails
of which were quite as threatening as any other
premonitory symptom of danger, being sometimes
thrust upward, as if, of themselves, anxious to rend
from their sockets the eyes of all who beheld them
with hostility. Vernon regarded this threat as so
unequivocal that he interposed, and insisted upon
an up-and-down, straight fight, fist, head and feet,
but no gougingno rough-and-tumble; but this
was to deprive the enemy of one of his most
favourite weapons, and that which he meditated to
use with more malignant efficiency in this strife
than any other.
I fight as I pleaseaccording to my own fashion
and let him do the same, replied Mabry. If
he's afraid of my fingers let him say so, and I'll let
him off.
Afraid of your fingers, you catamount!
exclaimed
the actor with contemptuous scorn, and a
coolness that was really edifying; use tooth and
nail, my good fellow, if you please, or if you can.
Don't trouble yourself, Harry, about me,'egad I'll
swallow him, claws and all, though his scales were
as rough and large as those of the biggest alligator
that ever picked his teeth with a cypress on the
banks of Pontchartrain.
You will, will you? cried the other, the foam
gathering about his mouth, his teeth gnashing with
rage, and his whole body in motion, like that of the
bull, whose gradually accumulating fury, moves it
from petty mischief to a destroving madness. He
bounded from the earth, ran round his enemy,
slapping
his thighs with his hands the while, in the most
savage fashion, and at length, with a whooping shriek,
imitated from that of some wild beast of the forest,
he threw a summerset, his feet aiming to strike the
breast of the actor, who followed all his movements
with eyes and hands in constant readiness. The
preliminaries of Mabry had warned Horsey of the
mode in which his attack was likely to begin, and
for which he prepared himself. It must not be
forgotten
that Horsey was Yorkshire toothat is to
say, he was quite as well accomplished in the arts of
the forest-fighter as was his opponentwith the
additional
advantage of knowing other arts which were
even of more avail in such warfare as the present.
VOL. I. 14
The heels of Mabry were no sooner in the air, than
the actor, sinking on his knees, removed the mark
which they were meant to strike; but, rising the
moment after, he sprang to the spot where the other
had alighted, and dealt him a blow between the
eyes which gave him an apparition of the four
moons of Jupiter, with a very fine display of
crossfires
playing in the centre, such as never yet blessed
the vision of Herschel or Dick. This tumbled him
over for an instant; but, nothing daunted, though
confounded, he renewed his attack in a different
form, and with a caution which had been more
advantageously
exercised in the first instance. The
actor, no ways elated, but seeming to regard the
proceeding so far, as one which had been the result
of the plainest calculation, calmly approached his
enemy, speaking as he did so, apologetically, as it
were, to the two spectators for continuing the fight.
Blow for blow is quite enough in all ordinary
cases; but this fellow tumbled me unawares, and in
the presence of the women, and, by the valour of
Orlando, he shall have another fall, ere our accounts
balance. This I have sworn to, Harry,as firm an
oath as if I had pressed my lips on the pocket
Shakspeare. I will give the lad a lesson which he
will remember whenever he has occasion to take
his measure by that of mother earth. Are you
ready, young un?
Once more they stood before each other,the
language of superiority which Horsey employed,
goading his rustic opponent to a degree of ferocity
which made him forget his hurts; and conscious of
his superior strength, he rushed in upon the actor,
employing no art, and only seeking to come to the
close hugthe grapple of sinewsin which lay his
chief and only hope. But Horsey had no
disposition
to gratify him in this desire. He well knew
the danger to him of such an issue. Once closed
with, his cunning of fence would avail him
nothing
;
and once down, his eyes had no farther
security
against the long claws which had already
been stretched out to pluck them forth. It was
fortunate
,
perhaps, that the rage of his enemy deprived
him of his deliberation. His blind attack was not
dangerous. His approach was met with cool,
keen-eyed
determinationa characteristic in which
Vernon
never could have conceived his companion to
have been so strong. Talking all the while, and
quoting as much Shakspeare as ever, he parried the
blows of the rustic, for awhile utterly forbearing to
put in any of his own. At length, as if he had
yielded a sufficiently fair time to his opponent's
play, he exclaimed
Now, sir, is my turn. I will close up your eyes,
without putting you to sleep; though, let me tell
you, it would be very easy for me to do that too.
I don't fear you, dn youI'll down you yet!
roared the other in a rage of fury that increased
with every failure of his own efforts.
Your right eye first! said the actor, answering
this ebullition at the same moment with word and
blow; and now your left!
Both blows took effect, in spite of the desperate
efforts of the victim to defend himself, and he lay at
the feet of his foe almost without motion. Yarbers
assisted him to rise, but he was in no condition for
farther conflict. Blinded and staggering he stood,
and still his lips breathed nothing but defiance.
The fellow's game, said Horsey. The voice,
the words, roused the instinct of hate anew in the
vanquished man, and he struggled in the arms of
Yarbers to rush once more upon his foe.
Restrained
in this, his hand suddenly plucked a
spring-knife
from his bosom, the blade of which was
instantly shot out, and, but for the timely grasp of
Vernon, he had sheathed it in the body of the man
who held him. The weapon, spite of his struggles,
was taken from him, and a stupor which followed,
seemed to possess his mind and body with equal
apathy. He murmured incoherently while it lasted,
his words consisting mostly of bitter denunciation,
which, to the surprise of the two travellers, seemed
chiefly to fall upon Yarbers.
Your villains, John Yarbersyou would shut
my mouth upwouldn't have me tell what I know
and have made your villains do this. But I will
speakI'll write it downI'll declare your roguery
to all Madison. They shall know who
He raves! exclaimed Yarbers in no little
agitation
;
you've beat all the sense out of him, Mr.
Horsey, and he don't know what he says. But
don't you mind him. Go home at once. Bess is
waiting supper for you by this time, and there's no
need that you should wait. I'll tend to him, and see
him carried home.
I'm truly sorry I had to thump him so hard,
Harry, said Horsey apologetically to his
companion
,
as they took their way back to the cottage,
but I had sworn it, you know, and couldn't so well
get off. Besides, it's absolutely necessary now and
then to make an example of these fellows. They
rely on superior strength to be insolent, and nothing
would have pleased this chap so much as carrying
home my eyes as a trophy. Years hence he would
have a history for Dick Jenkins, and Jim Dobbins,
and Peter Pinchback and a dozen others, of the
dandy from below that he met at Yarbers' house,
and `how he caught,'imitating the patois of the
country`how he caught the chap mighty soptious
with the gal, and how he gin him the cross-buttock,
and, before he could say Jack Robinson, had a
finger in his shock and a thumb in his eye, and sent
him off with the blind-staggers and two holes in his
forehead that could make no use of specks, though
he was mighty glad to wear them;' and then, to
prove the truth of what he said, he would bring
forth a bottle of eyes preserved in whiskymy
eyes with fifty others, the Tom's, Dick's, and
Harry's, the Ned's, Ben's and Peter's, the Billy's
and Timothy's, that have been the heroes of the
barbacue and gin-shop from time immemorialall
in attestation of the superior excellence of the
claws that plucked them out. The eyes of Tom
Horsey preserved in whisky! Whew! The thought
makes me shudder again. Eyes, Harry Vernon,
are absolutely necessary to an actor.
Keep yours about you as a traveller. You have
made an enemy of this youth, who will not forget
you. We travel in a wild region, and the securities
are few for life and limb. A man may be tumbled in
these swamps, and the wildcat alone will find out
his hiding-place. You, who have no sort of reason
to be in this neighbourhood, cannot too soon take
yourself out of it.
To-morrow, Harryyou would not have me
set off to-night?
Noto-morrow will be time enough. Return
to Raymond, set yourself in safety and your father's
mind at rest.
`Ha! ha, boy! Say'st thou so? Art thou there,
truepenny?' Now hear me, Harry Percy, I look on
it that you fear meI hold thee jealous of my
attributes
,
my attitudes, my carriage, my certain
something
,
which, being peculiar to the individual man,
is vulgarly called genius. I will outshine thee
before
Jim Tiltonoutdo theetake the rag off the
bush in Benton; and leave thee `the mere lees to
brag of.' You give me counsel but no confidence,
14*
why should I keep terms with thee? Urge me again
upon this matter, and I declare against thee. Thou
shalt know me as a rival rather than an ally; and I
will foil all thy best points with my own. Look to
it, Harry,the gall rises within me.
Vernon regarded the speaker with mixed feelings
of pity and vexation. But the monomania was too
strong to be overcome by argument, or resisted by
any thing short of violencea measure to which,
as there was no present necessity to rid himself of
his companion, there was no occasion to resort.
Suppressing, therefore, some stern expressions which
had risen to his lips, he suffered the other to chuckle
in the prospect of his theatrical superiority, inly
consoling himself with the idea that before the close
of another day he should be rid of his thoughtless
but well-intentioned tormentor; and he, disabused of
the unhappy error which had probably, more than
any thing beside, seduced him from the home to
which he had only just returned. When they
reached the house, the actor resumed his random
and rhapsodical chit-chat with all around him, as if
nothing had happened either within or without to
discompose him for an instant. The hostess he
reminded
of old times, and of a thousand practical
jokes which he had played, of which she herself
had been more than once the victim. With a fresh
memory he accompanied the vital requisites of
narration
,
lively comment, and felicitous gesture; and,
speaking with all the frank exuberance of boyhood,
which his playhouse habits had been rather
calculated
to increase than diminish, he had the
satisfaction
of seeing the blushing Mary watching and
listening with an attentiveness scarcely less sweet
and anxious than that of the gentle lady wedded
to the Moor,her white neck stretched forward
her head bent towards himher lips slightly parted,
and in her eyes that glistering eagerness of gaze
which betrays mingled pleasure and curiosity. It
is more than probable that the likeness between his
own situation and that of Othello, forced itself upon
him when he made this discovery, for a moment
after, without any preface, he began half aloud to
mutter the fine description of the scene
These things to hear
Would Desdemona seriously incline, &c.
The summons to supper, twice, thrice repeated by
the hostess herself, scarcely succeeded in diverting
him from this theme and stopping him in the full
swell and torrent of his declamation. But the old
lady was already handling the coffee-pot, and there
was no time to finish the quotation; yet, as if to
revenge
himself for the interruption, he seized the
hands of the damsel, who still sat, almost as
inattentive
to ordinary matters as himself, and gently
pressing them the while, he conducted her to the
vacant seat beside his own at the table.
CHAPTER XI.
Vot
.
You shall stand here, my lord, unseen, and hear all;
Do I deal now like a right friend with you?
Ans
.
Like a most faithful.
Second Maid's Tragedy
.
Vernon
retired early to his couch, which stood,
with that of Horsey, in an adjoining shed-room.
He was pleased to find clean white homespun
sheets allotted him; and looking around the
apartment
,
involuntarily congratulated himself that so
tidy a damsel as Mary Stinson made up the beds
and aired the chambers. Clear water in a clean
white goblet stood on a chairfor there was no
other washstandon the back of which hung a
couple of towels of coarse homespun, bleached by
long use and good washing to a whiteness like
that of the sheets. These little matters attested
some larger degree of civilization than the
externals
of the mansion had prepared him to expect;
and were the fruits, most probably, of better days
and associations, which Mrs. Yarbers had brought
with her from the lower country. Certainly they
were only becoming features in one who had traded
so long in cakes and beer to the common satisfaction.
Yarbers himself appeared to be a slovenly, coarse
creature, to whom the neatness of a household was
not likely to be an early subject of consideration.
It was fully an hour after Vernon had retired before
Horsey followed his example. He sat up talking
with the hostess, to whom his sudden re-appearance
after so long an interval had brought back as many
associations as her ancient features had awakened
in him; and the ball of conversation, so busied were
they mutually in asking and answering questions,
was seldom suffered to fall for more than a single
moment in all that space of time. It would be
difficult
to say whether the old lady took any special
pleasure in the chat of the individual in question. It
is more than probable she would have found the
same in that of any other young person who had
presented himself at the close of day, and begged a
shelter for the night. Age likes to enliven itself with
the fires of youth, as the venerable monarch of
Israel became conscious of a living warmth from
the embraces of the young maidens who were
placed beside him for that purpose. It seems like
the pouring of new mountain-streams into exhausted
channels, and impelling into consciousness and
motion
the choked and stagnant fountains of life. The
heart grows young in the contemplation of youth,
and a momentary forgetfulness of its own decay is
the consequence of that revivification of memory
which confounds the past with the present; or
rather, sends the mind back from the bleak eminence
of age which it has reached, and where it stands
stiff and frozen, to the green and flowery valleys
below, from which it has risen at first, but to which,
save by the aid of memory, it can never, never
more return. There may have been, indeed, some
little occult policy in the gracious demeanour of
Mrs. Yarbers to the dashing and good-natured
actor. She was not without that social instinct
which is called cunning, and did not fail to recollect
that Tom Horsey's father was one of the staunchest
proprietors in all Hindes county. It had not
escaped
her eye that her old customer for cakes and
beer was really very much taken with the
appearance
of her lovely daughter, and here, to use the
phrase of the sea-logician was a concatenation
accordingly. Perhaps, were it our cue to
prosecute
this inquiry still farther at this moment, it were
not difficult to find strong sanction for the suspicion
which is here presented to the mind of the reader;
but this might be anticipating other passages.
Enough to say, that Mrs. Yarbers was not pleased
with her husband, with his relations, and her own
position; and, as a mother, regarded the existing
influences of the latter as highly detrimental to the
fortunes of a child whom she loved, naturally and
necessarily, as a mother should; but to whom she
gave additional regard, as, contemplating her
through the medium of her pride, she saw in her
beauty a possession which lifted her heart, and
warmed her vanity, and made it a sorrow in her
mind when she reflected that such charms were
destined to ripen in the shade, and, like the fruits
of the untrodden forest, to ripen unprofitably
without
eye to admire or lip to taste. This was a
subject upon which her mind was apt to brood,
and it need not occasion wonder to be told that the
instincts of one brooding thus, would not be
unlikely
to result in practices not very dissimilar to
those of the professedly managing mother in
communities
of more artifice and fashion. From the
first moment when Horsey declared himself and
renewed his old acquaintance with her, the fancy
had floated in her mind that his coming was a
special providence; and this fancy, fixed firmly at
last, she resolved to lend all her powers to the
consummation of the thing she wished. With this
resolution, Mary was suffered to sit up long
beyond
the usual hour, listening to a conversation
which, enlivened by playful remarks and pleasant
anecdotes on the part of the actor, was very
agreeable to a young creature who had as yet
seen nothing of the world; and the mother even
assumed the performance of many of those tasks
which in ordinary periods were commonly allotted
to her daughter, that there might be no obstacle
offered to the formation of an intimacy between
the two which promised to realize her desires, and
which, so far, had advanced with tolerable rapidity.
The absence of her husband was favourable to her
plans; and, it may be, that some impulse was
derived
for their provocation, from the fact that they
were calculated to interfere with his. He, too, had
purposes in view for the damselthough not his
daughterwhich were something less than
agreeable
to the mother; and the open avowal of his
preference in behalf of young Mabry had been
the signal for her declared hostility to his
pretension
.
Thus matters stood at the period of which
we write.
When Horsey retired from the hall, which he had
not thought to do until Mary disappeared, and
certain admonitory yawns from the mother denoted
that condition of declining consciousness which
could not long do full justice to his good stories and
choice quotations, Yarbers had not returned. But
Horsey had been but few minutes in his chamber
before
the outer door of the dwelling was heard to
unclose
and his heavy tread sounded along the floor. He
had challenged his companion's attention the
moment
he entered the room, but the latter had
discouraged
him, by declaring a very carnal desire
for sleepan excuse which, at that moment, the
buoyant actor was unwilling to regard as worthy
a single consideration; and he rattled on without
intermission for awhile, until, undressed and buried
in the sheets, the animal obtained the ascendency,
and his tongue, taking advantage of the
circumstance
,
assigned the task of declaring his
whereabouts
to that distinguished member his nose, the
extraordinary industry and capacity of which was
soon a matter of general notoriety. To this
moment
Vernon had not closed his eyes. His mind
was just in that condition of quickening cogitation
when, yet unpossessed of its definite purpose, it
compares plans, analyzes its resources and
dependencies
,
and from pregnant and critical doubts
conceives
and gathers hopes and resolutions. There
was much in the position of Vernon to keep him
watchful, and the smallest unusual event was
calculated
to make his blood bound, and his fancy spring
into activity. Thus, after Yarbers' return to the
cottage, and while he meditated a thousand different
courses of conduct for the better prosecution of his
leading object, his ear, quickened by thought, under
the influence of an imagination warmed and
strengthened by the drowsy midnight horn that
sounded throughout the world of silence, caught
the sudden baying of a beagle, and a crowd of
suspicious fancies thronged upon him. Once, twice,
thrice, the loud, deep, prolonged note sounded faintly
through the apartment, and then the footstep of
Yarbers
was again heard, slowly crossing the floor
from the rear to the entrance of the house. The
lifting of the latch followed, the door was opened,
and again closed. Silence succeeded for a moment;
then arose a stunning bay from the hound, almost at
the threshhold of the dwelling, a prolonged note
like that which had awakened the attention of
Vernon
a few moments before. This was singular
enough. There were evidently no dogs of any kind
about the premises at the first coming of the
travellers
,
and though they might afterwards have come
home with the master of the house, yet it was highly
improbable that such had been the case, else
wherefore
had they seen nothing of them when they
sallied
forth to the meeting already described of Horsey
with Mabry? Besides, it was scarcely possible
that a farmer on the outskirts of the then Mississippi
border, should so carefully exclude his dogs from
the same apartment with himself. Vernon was in
the mood to conjecture a thousand strange matters,
and to convert into causes of suspicion many things
that might be innocent enough. To one in his
situation
,
and with his objects, this was sufficiently proper;
and the occasion for his excitation in the present
instance
was well founded. The beagles that were in
the wood then, run not on four legs; and the last sound
that reached his ears, issuing from the lungs of
Yarbers
,
was an annunciation to a companion that the
coast was clear. Under the shade of a spreading
oak, a hundred yards from his dwelling, he was
joined by no less a person than our old acquaintance,
Saxon.
You have lodgers, Jack? demanded the outlaw
in the first moment of their meeting.
Two chaps from belowone a quiet, sober,
silent sort of person, the other a fellow all tongue.
His name's Horsey,he's
No matter. I know them both. As for Horsey,
it's a misfortune he's along. He may be in the way.
Hawkins put some nonsense in that fellow's head,
and I fear has only thrust him in our path. The
other must be seen to.
Ha! What is he?
A spy, I reckon. Such is our suspicion. He's
in with the governor, and they have had some talk
about an ugly business which concerns us. The
only good feature in the thing is, that they do not
know exactly which way to turn themselves, or who
VOL. I. 15
to trust. What they know leads them to apprehend
a great deal of which they know nothing, and much
more than is the truth. What this youth knows is
our question. We must touch his wallet. You must
manage that to-night.
Has he money, think you?
Nay, that is no object now; besides, I doubt he
has little. He is a poor young lawyer that the
governor has tempted with promises of a great
reward
for every beagle that he can collar. Our
object
is to get hold of his papers, and see what names
he has down. We know that certain papers of Mat
Webber fell into their hands at that ugly business on
the Black Warrior; and the confessions of that
traitor, Eberly, if he made any, might give them
clues enough to our most secret operations. That
this fellow, Vernon, is employed by the state, I
have no sort of doubt,but there's no telling to
what extentwhat are the powers given him, or
what is the object he aims at. These we must
learn. His papers we must handle, and you must
contrive it if you can to-night, or the work will be
more troublesome to-morrow. Have you found out
what course he takes?
To Beatie's Bluff, if he himself is to be believed;
but the other lark told Betsy a different story, and
said that they were both for the lower ford, on the
route to Benton.
And how's Bess nowhas she got over her
humours? Does she still continue to suspect you?
Worse than ever; and Mabry is also very
troublesome.
But have you not given him your daughter
will not that stop his mouth?
It would, I make no doubt, could my giving be
his having. But the old woman's stubborn as a
mule, the girl herself dislikes him, and this evening
there was a strange blow out, that has made the
chap furious as a wild beastall tongue and wrath,
and no reason.
Ha! what was the matter?
Well, you see, it so happened, that the old
woman
know'd this young man, Horsey, when he was
only a little bit of a boy, some where down on Pearl
River. Well, when they struck up the acquaintance
between 'em, what should the fellow do, but, to make
it fast, he ups and goes for kissing Mary, and for
any thing I know, the old woman too. Just at the
time when he was about it, and pushing Mary, who
was frightened enough, I warrant, all round the
room, we came in, Mabry and myself; and
before
we could put in or say a word, Mabry jumps
forward, and clips the stranger side of his head and
tumbles him over like a log. There was a great
to-do after that. The old woman set all the water
in the house a-boiling, and it got quite too hot for
Ned. He started off and I followed him, and while
we were talking together under the trees, who
should come up but these two fellows. Horsey
followed to get satisfaction for the blow, which,
it was surprising to me, he took so lightly at first.
He thought better of it afterwards, however, and
did better, for, I tell you, he handled poor Ned in
two minutes in a way that's a caution. He
downed him, a fair stupid downNed rolled about
like a drunken bullock, and got mighty sick with
both eyes shut up, and a great retching at his
stomach
.
I had tight work to keep him steady on his
nag and get him safely home. Since then, when he
recovered, he's been in a mighty crooked humour.
He swears that I don't want he should have the
girlthat I'm only playing 'possum, and half
believes
that I set this fellow, Horsey, on to beat him,
though nobody could have been more willing for
the fight at first than Mabry himself.
Does he threaten?
A little squinting that way, though he don't
speak out plainly. But he'd threaten and tell too, if
so be he thought I was only shamming in the
business
with Mary.
You must run it through then, as fast as
possible
.
He will scarcely speak any thing to your
discredit, if he was once married to your daughter.
No! But that's the worry. The old woman's
hot ag'in him. She thinks Mary meat for his
master; and I do really believe she fancies to
marry her to a colonel or some great lawyer, or
maybe to a member of Congress. She always
rides a high horse when she talks about Mary.
But the girl herself?
Likes him no better than Bess. He stands but
little chance with either of them.
But if Bess approved, would not that help his
chance with Mary?
Why, yes; but that's the swampworse than
the Big Blackwhich I can't manage to cross no
how.
Why not make Mabry a colonel? The thing
might very easily be done. You can beat up and
bring in stray votes enough to turn the election, if
the fellow could do any thing for himself. We
must manage this matter hereafter. For this other
fellow, now
Vernon?
Yes,of course you know which bed he sleeps
in. Did you give an eye to his portmanteau?
It's in the room with himI put it myself by the
chimney. You don't mean to
Yarbers paused, and looked vacantly in the
other's face leaving the sentence unfinished. Saxon
smiled after a moment's hesitation, and replied
You are afraid to have more work on your
hands than was stipulated for. Be under no
concern
.
We shall avoid blood-spilling and violence,
as a general good policy, which is the more
important
to observe now when we are under partial
suspicion already. All that we ask of you is to find
out what he carries. You must get his papers; and
this you can do, I trust, without difficulty. You
have the old trap in the floor by which to enter, and
this key will open any portmanteau-lock that was
ever sold in Mississippi. As for his life, that is the
least consideration so long as we know his game.
There is more chance of Mabry growing
troublesome
than him, and you may yet find it necessary
to work with cold steel upon him. Make him a
colonel, and if that doesn't bring Brown Bess to
favour him, we must bribe him to good breeding in
another way.
It'll be hard work. I never seed a fellow that set
such store on a gal in all my life. He can't bear to
see another man look upon her, and he talks of
nothing
else.
Unless it be of you; but his case needs no
immediate
attention. This of Vernon does. Did you
note whether his saddle had pockets?
It has. I searched them already, but found
nothing
worth telling of. There was a newspaper, and
some old accounts, I take itthey looked like bills
and calculations.
You cared not what they looked like, Yarbers,
when you found that they did not look like money.
But I must see those papers. Where is the saddle?
In the stable. Shall I lead your horse round
the old field? They may hear his footsteps if we
take the path.
15*
Rightdo so. I'll await you at the stall.
Yarbers had put a tolerably fair estimate upon
the papers found in the saddle-pouches. An
examination
of them by torchlight resulted in no discovery
such as Saxon sought for, and the attempt to arrive
at farther knowledge was devolved for the present
upon the adroit and prying industry of Yarbers.
CHAPTER XII.
It is in mine authority to command
The keys of all the posterns: please your highness
To take the urgent here: come, sir, away.
Winter's Tale
.
Before
this long conference was ended, sleep had
overcome the limbs of Harry Vernon. The
imagination
which had so long kept him wakeful in spite
of the day's fatigue, now busied itself only in his
dreams, which were all of a kind natural to the
young beginner on the weary paths of life. With a
heart as yet unfettered, and a fancy free as that of
the bird for the first time winging its way from the
forests to the ocean, he was conscious only of that
void and vacant region in his bosom, which is
intended
to be filled by love. The germ was there
of the great empire over which the imperial master
was yet to rear his wand, but the especial divinity
had not bestowed a glance on the territory she was
destined to inhabit. Warm and waiting for the
advent
,
the heart of Harry Vernon did not yet repine
in inconclusive fancies, hoping and sighing, and
surrendering
itself to imbecility. He suffered himself
but little time to brood over the vague desires which
he felt, but summoning to his side the thoughts which
attend on duty, he addressed himself with ardour to
the actual demands of existence, without yielding up
more mind than was necessary to such as were
eventual and prospective. It was only while he
slept that his fancy gave itself up to the desires of
his heart; and all the struggles before his pathway
were thrust from sight, and all his duties and dangers
forgotten, to give place to as lovely a vision as
youthful bard ever conceived and young imagination
ever desired. A maiden conjured up in realms of
faery rose before his dreaming eyejust such a form
as met and realized the ideal which his united taste
and reason might have been disposed to create at a
moment of particular inspiration. She was tall and
graceful; her skin pure as marble and smooth as
ivory; her eyes black and streaming with a melting
light; her lips soft as the leaf and richer than the
rose; her cheeks pale but radiant, almost transparent
with a light like that which glistened from her eyes;
and her forehead lofty, spiritually narrow, and
shaded by the voluminous masses of silk-like hair,
darker than that which shines on the shoulders of the
raven. She stood beside himsuch was his
dreaming
fancyin a vision of his sleep. He had sunk
for shelter beneath the shadows of a group of mighty
oaks that surmounted the brow of a hill, and were
surrounded by a dense and untrodden forest. His
horse drank the while and cropped the herbage
upon the banks of a little stream that wandered
down the hillside, and lost itself in the deep groves of
a thicket which hid from sight the dark and gloomy
recesses of an inland swamp. The midday sun
shone above him in melting fervour, but the dense
foliage shielded him from the oppressive heat, and
but a few strange straggling gleams, trembling and
retreating as if conscious of intrusion, stole in at
intervals
between the branches, as they slowly yielded
to the capricious wind. A dark shadow, as if from
an overhanging cloud, suddenly overspread the
scene the moment ere she entered upon it, but at her
approach the cloud disappeared, a glory like that
of the moon enveloped him with its soft, fleecy
edges, and his very soul seemed to melt within him
as the entrancing vision drew nigh to his side. Other
forms followed and crowded upon the scenestrange
events and mingling action disturbed its quiet, and
his eye toiled in the survey of a thousand features,
each changing at his glance and distracting his
attention. But the lovely form which had fixed his
eye and fastened upon his soul at first, was still to be
seen amidst the crowdnow here, now there, nigh
and then remote, but still present, hallowing the
scene to softness, modifying the strife, stilling the
clamour, and subduing the turbulence, until,such
was the strange fancy,the sudden obtrusion of
Horsey, and his fierce declamation, affrighted the
delicate and ethereal beauty from the spot; and he
started from his sleep with a harsher mood in his
bosom towards his self-appointed companion than
any which he had ever entertained before. It will
be seen how far the random actor was answerable
for the dispersion of his happy fancies.
Horsey was not without his visions also; but they
were of a very different character. When he first
fell asleep, his nose performed such vigorous airs
that Vernon was apprehensive lest they might
greatly interfere with his own desired rest. But
the mastery of this solemn member was disputed at
frequent periods by his tongue; which, as if never
needing rest, continued at intervals to pour forth
choice fragments from his favourite Shakspeare,
growling at one moment in all the emphatic terrors
of the tragic muse; at another softening down to
the most dulcet parts of love, the sweet significant
nothings with which every hero regales his
Amaryllis
in the shade. These were long or short as
the occasion seemed to require them; and the
prompt and well-versed memory of the actor
appeared
never to want the auxiliary help of a
quotation
.
Sometimes, the sentences would be broken,
sometimes complete; at first, they were usually
short, consisting of two or three consecutive words
of a single phrase; but Vernon, who listened to him
for awhile with smiling curiosity, observed, as the
night advanced, that he rose from fragments to
entire
passages, and when he himself was sinking into
that sleep which yielded him a vision so entrancing,
he was conscious that the actor was gliding into the
dialogue in which he personated the love-sick
Montague
,
and wooed the fair Capulet beneath the
window
.
Something Vernon caught ere he himself
slept, of
strides the lazy pacing clouds
And sails upon the bosom of the air,
followed by an intense ebullition of the nostrils
which probably answered all the purposes of a
reply from Juliet; when he himself, surrendering
to the oppressive sleep, lost all farther apprehension
of the dialogue. But it was continued, nevertheless,
by the actor, though so large a portion of his
audience
slept; and, perhaps, the interruptions from
his nose allowed for, he never went through the
part with more honest unction in his life. That
he might have done better, or at least toiled for
it, is unquestionable, if he could only have been
told that at this moment his audience was
increased
.
So it was. Saxon, the outlaw, and his adjunct
Yarbers, stood without the dwelling and beside the
chimney of the shed-room in which slept the
travellers
.
Their ears took in with readiness the earnest
and pleading devotions of the amorous Romeo, and
so greatly did the affair tend to the amusement of
the former, that he could with difficulty restrain
himself from taking the opposite part of the
dialogue
,
and thus stimulating the enthusiastic actor to
increased efforts. But the more timid Yarbers was
opposed to this, and, speaking in whispers, scarcely
audible to his immediate companion, dwelt earnestly
on the danger of discovery.
Pshaw, John Yarbers, the man sleepssoundly
toono man sleeps more soundly than him who
dreams of what he loves.
But the other fellowVernon!
Ay,you have need of caution there; but I
reckon he sleeps too. You must lift the trap
cautiously
and listen, before you do any thing.
This trap was simply a square hole in the floor,
made by sawing two of the flooring-boards across,
fastening them together by a cross-piece below, and
securing them with common hooks to the joist
beneath
.
While, therefore, their ends rested upon the
joists, they resisted any pressure from above, and
it was easy for one under the house, by undoing the
hooks, to raise the trap and make his way into it.
The fabric stood upon raised blocks, from three to
four feet from the ground, and, obeying the direction
of the outlaw, Yarbers fell upon his knees, and
soon disappeared beneath it. It was easy to undo
the hooks which secured the door, but the continued
declamation of Horsey, in spite of all the assurances
of Saxon that he slept, disturbed the nerves of the
intruder, and he once more returned to the entrance
to assure his companion that it was certainly
Vernon
who snored and Horsey who spoke; and that
the speaking had none of the obstructions or
hesitation
of a sleeping man, and came most certainly
from the throat of one as perfectly conscious as he
ever was in daylight. The impatient outlaw
answered
him with an oath.
Yarbers, you are but a dry bone after all.
Stand aside, and let me do it.
Stay, sirdon't you hear steps? Don't you
think he's walking?
Pshaw, man! It's your own heart. It thumps
hard enough to scare you, I doubt not. Where does
the portmanteau stand?
Right side of the chimney from the hall-door;
and the saddle-bags on the left.
But which is Vernon's?
Fegs! I don't know. I warn't home when they
come, and I s'pose they took 'em off the creatures
themselves and brought 'em in. There's no telling
which is which.
That's unfortunate. We must then examine
both, said Saxon, as he crawled under the house
and made his way to the still unopened trap-door.
This he raised with sufficient care, though not
without some little noise,the hard, heavy pine of
which the boards were made requiring that degree
of effort in raising them which had been otherwise
necessary to keep them in equilibrium and prevent
the edges from grazing against the surrounding
floor, to which they were made to correspond with
tolerable nicety. Once lifted, the intruder, still
grasping the door in his hands, raised himself and
stood up within the opening, his head and shoulders
being now within the apartment. The door he laid
down gently upon the floor beside the trap, so that
it might be drawn into its place on the first alarm.
To his confusion, however, while thus engaged, he
discovered that the conjecture of Yarbers was not
unfounded. Horsey was certainly out of bed, and
striding the floor of the apartment. His ruling
passion
had grown utterly ungovernable in his sleep,
and the somnambulist was now fairly in the highest
realm of hallucination. His movements were,
however
,
slow enough at this period; and Saxon
succeeded
,
without noise or interruption, in stretching forth
his hand to the fire-place and securing the
saddle-bags
,
which were the first that came within his
reach. These he handed through the aperture to his
comrade below, who proceeded to examine them in
the moonlight without. His whispered words, as he
looked at the contents, declared his own wonder,
while they satisfied Saxon that he had fallen upon
the wrong chattels.
Jackets and breeches all covered with gold and
spangles.
Stuff 'em back, said Saxon, stooping down
and whispering; stuff 'em back and hand me the
bags. They are the actor's baggage. We must
grope for the other's.
While this was doing, and at the moment when
Saxon had received them in his hands, and was
about raising them through the hole in which he
stood, in order to replace them, the paroxysm came
upon Romeo stronger and less controllable than
ever. A rush of inspiration filled his veins, and to
the great annoyance of the outlaw, he heard him
growling and advancing. The play had made
rapid progress in the sleep of the actor. He had
reached the fifth act,he had got his poison from the
apothecaryhe had resolved upon his own death,
and was hurrying on to give County Paris his.
Give me that mattock! he cried in low, hoarse
accents to the supposed Balthazar beside him. His
voice then subsided into a throng of pressing
whispers
,
as if forced to speak, yet not desiring to be
heard. This brought him within a few paces of the
outlaw, who began seriously to feel the inconvenience
of his situation. A few strides more would bring
VOL. I. 16
the actor upon his shoulders, and into the pit. To
withdraw and let down the door at that moment,
might be to arouse the sleeper, and defeat the object
which he had in view; and no possible effort which
he could make, short of rushing into the room itself,
would enable himthis he discovered to reach the
opposite end of the fire-place where the valise of
Vernon had been placed. While he stood in a state
of incertitude, which prevented him from doing
any thing, the passion of the actor had taken a new
direction from the approach of Paris. He had gone
through the paroxysms which made him beat down
the walls of the monument; and here Saxon
observed
,
with some surprise, that he now spoke the
part of Paris as well as his own, to which, hitherto,
he had entirely confined himself. The inference
of the outlaw from this fact, was, that the pressure
of sleep was passing off, the influence of imagination
lessened, and that the actor's ear needed the absolute
reality of sound, to continue any longer in his
self-deception
.
This added somewhat to the
apprehensions
of the intruder, who was not suffered very long
to speculate upon the matter. The language of Paris
was threateningthat of Romeo had assumed a tone
of mildness, which, in reality, only disguised the
labouring
volcano in his bosom.
`I beseech thee, youth,
Pull not another sin upon my head,
By urging me to fury.'
Still he approaches, and his arm rises as if
balancing
the sword. Live, he says, in most soliciting
tones
`Live, and hereafter say,
A madman's mercy bade thee runaway.'
Here he availed himself of one of his own readings
of the thousand unimportant distinctions in such
matters, of which stage-struck citizens are so apt to
make a fuss. Pausing at the word run, which he
had spoken along with the whole passage in the
gentlest accents, he now made a tremendous
transition
,
and the final word, away, was thundered
forth in tones to waken up the dead. This was a
point upon which, in his waking moments, he was
very apt to pride himself. The answer of Paris,
which he also spoke, fell something short of this, but
was still loud; and he had scarcely given himself
time to finish it, before, reaching the acme of his
paroxysm in the part of Romeo, he gave the torrent
free vent, and leapt upon the shoulders of Saxon,
while he cried aloud,
`Wilt thou provoke me?then have at thee, boy!'
The situation was awkward in the last degree, and
the struggles of Romeo were such as to convince
the outlaw that he was rapidly coming to his senses.
Exerting his whole strength, therefore, he seized the
half-prostrate actor by his shoulders, and flung him
from him as far as he might while in the place in
which he stood, not giving much heed whether the
poor fellow was brought up by flint or feathers.
Then, suddenly sinking down with equal promptness
and composure, he drew the trap into its place with
a degree of ease which added but little to the bustle
which the previous incident had occasioned. The
direction given to Horsey by the arms of Saxon,
carried him upon the couch of Vernon, whom the
struggling actor, now emerging into actual bodily
consciousness, grappled with as he was rising up in
alarm, and continued to contend with as if County
Paris still remained to be slain. But he met with no
better treatment at the hands of Vernon than from
those of Saxon, being tumbled, by a very
unscrupulous
movement, backward upon the floor, where he
lay, for a moment, actually at a loss to determine
where he was and what was his condition. Vernon
had been as roughly awakened from a pleasant
dream as the actor, and, still in doubt as to whence
the annoyance arose, he was soon out of bed and
standing above Romeo, the moment he had flung him
from him. What might have been his farther act
had not Horsey spoken, though doubtful in
character
,
would have been certainly decisive. The tongue
of the latter, never for any length of time idle,
happily resumed its offices in time to prevent more
mischief.
Why Harry, my dear boy, is that you? Why
what the devil's the matter?
Matter, Mr. Horsey. That's the very question
to be asked of you. How came you on my bed?
Your bed! Was that your bed, Harry? By
all that's sacred in stage lights, I took it for the tomb
of Juliet; and Parisyou were Paris, my dear
fellow.
Do you walk in your sleep, Mr. Horsey? asked
Vernon, now beginning to conjecture the whole
affair.
Egad, it may be. I don't know, but, certainly, I
have had a strangely exciting dream. It was our
first night at Benton, Harry. I was Romeo, and
that dear little Mary made her
debut
in Juliet, under
my instructions. If I ever play so well in reality, as
I fancied I played this night,as I must have
played in my sleep,I shall ask for nothing better.
But, (rising from the floor as he spoke,) my shin is
cursedly bruised,the skin's off; I can hardly get
up. I had some notion that I had got into a hole,
but
The voice of Mrs. Yarbers at the chamber door,
demanding to know if any body was sick, and
asking the cause of the uproar, silenced the actor.
After satisfying her, he was very glad to slink back
into bed, as he found Vernon unwilling any longer to
listen to his description of the scene, and the detail of
points newly-made, which had broken in upon
fancies
of his own no less dear and exciting, though,
possiblyit was his own reflectionnot more real
and stable than those of his companion.
Saxon was no less annoyed, and, perhaps, with
more serious cause for annoyance, than those within.
He waited long without the house, and near his
place of secret ingress, in the hope of hearing those
sounds from the sleepers which should assure him of
an uninterrupted entrance. But he waited in vain.
Whether it was that the rough handling which
Horsey
had received had utterly expelled the nightmare,
or whether he had become conscious of the
unreasonableness
of making any more disturbance in the
house, and was willing to compensate for his
excesses
at one moment by an unusual degree of
forbearance
at another, he certainly did not snore again
that night. Vernon's was a well-bred nose, that
seldom violated the rules of decorum; and hopeless
of the plan, the progress of which had been so
forcibly interrupted in the first instance, the outlaw
concluded to defer to another opportunity his
intended
purpose.
We must do it on the road side; and it may be
necessary that we should even lay hands on him.
These papers being of value he would most probably
conceal about his person. It is barely possible that
they should be in the valise, and we should take no
16*
such risks as this on the strength of a bare
possibility
.
We must keep your house in the reputation
of being an honest one, Yarbers, as well to serve our
purposes as to please your wife. Let her not know
that I have been here to-night. I will go farther
up, and be ready for our man at the fork.
She'll guess fast enough though I don't tell her.
She's mighty 'cute, and knows the bay of the
beagle
is not for nothing in these parts.
So long as she can't see the beagle, and don't
know whose name's on the collar, she knows
nothing
.
But help me to my horse, while I ride. Jones
will be here by daylight, I suppose. You can send
him after me when he comes.
And Mabry?
If he blab, he must be silenced. If the mouth
won't be sugared it must be stopped. You will see
him to-morrow when he is a little cooled off from
the drubbing of this actor, and persuade him that
you have nothing to do in the business. This he
will be the more apt to believe when he finds his
enemy gone; and, perhaps, it might be just as well
that you should see him at an early hour on the
subject
.
Should nothing answershould he grow
troublesomeI will send a decoy-beagle who will
get him into Cane Castle, where he'll leave all his
secrets before he comes forth.
There was one here for you to-day from Cane
CastleStillyards.
The Hunchback! well, what said he?
He came from Monna.
Ah! she's impatientbut she must wait. She
would fetter me, Yarbers, as Brown Bess fetters
you, but that my blood is quite as quick and
impatient
as her own. Yet, she's a woman more to be
feared than Bess. She can't scold so wellnay, she
seldom scolds, but she thinks and broods over her
thoughts, which are sometimes fearful enough, and
one day she may seek to act them. She's secret,
Yarbers, and there she is unlike Bess, who would
blab every thing she knew to your hurt if you once
put her into a passion. Monna, if sometimes fearful
as the grave, is at all times as secret. It would be
twenty times our good, Yarbers, were your wife
half as secret. But you took her for better or
worse, and so must we. If you are satisfied with
your bargain, speaking with a malicious smile,
your friends have no reason to complain.
CHAPTER XIII.
The confidence of youth our only art,
And Hope gay pilot of the bold design,
We saw the living landscapes * * * *
Reach after reach salute us and depart.
Wordsworth
.
The
travellers prepared to set forth at an early
hour on the ensuing morning. The adventures of
the night had tended somewhat to sour the usually
sweet temper of the actor. His legs, which he
displayed
to the wonder and commiseration of his
companion, were skinned from knee to ankle, in a
way perfectly mysterious to the sufferer, who could
not conceive how such an affliction could have arisen
simply from his playing Romeo to empty boxes.
And yet it seemed to me, among other things,
that it wasn't Romeo, neither, but Hamlet. I was in
the grave, grapplingI'll be sworn upon itwith
Laertes, with whom I `fought a long hour by
Shrewsbury clock.' It must have been in the grave
that I got these bruises.
That imperfect state of mind which, in dreams, so
happily unites the fanciful with the actual, had, in
fact, produced a rapid transition in his thoughts from
the one play to the other, while his involuntary
struggle in the hole with the outlaw suggested a
similitude of circumstances so favourable for a
change of scene; and the dawning of his right
reason, which the struggle necessarily occasioned,
forced upon him the partial conviction that some
other man, of considerable brawn and muscle, had,
like himself, been dreaming a part also, which had
given the performance a termination so perfectly
tragical. His inspection of his saddle-bags
contributed
in some little degree to his confusion. The
contents were in strange disorder.
Could I have been so dd stupid as to have
dressed myself in costume? I don't recollect putting
it back, and if I did, I must have shown a singular
indifference to Romeo's wardrobe to have put it up
without folding. Look here, Harry Vernon, what a
bunch I've made of it in my sleep; a bag from a
beggar's pressand the garment perfectly newa
splendid garment, for which that skunk of a tailor
amerced me in a greater number of dad's dollars
than I should be altogether willing to count up in his
hearing. You shall see me put it on. You shall
you shall form an idea of the sort of chap that
Cdwell quarrelled with;you shall see the figure,
at least, of a Romeo not to be met with every day.
This scene was going on in the chamber prior to
their appearance before the family in the hall. They
had been already summoned to an early breakfast,
which Vernon, before retiring for the night, had
especially solicited. He now ventured to remind
the actor that the family and breakfast waited upon
them.
Only a moment! exclaimed the actor hurriedly,
as he proceeded to envelope himself in the glittering
garment of the amorous Montagueonly for a
moment! It's worth a glance from a veteran stager.
Ha! what's this?a hole! a rent!
The exclamation of the actor, distinguished by
tones expressive not merely of surprise, but
consternation
and horror, drew the attention of Vernon to
the dress, in which an envious nailprobably while
old Yarbers was inspecting the glittering sack
beneath
the househad torn a finger's breadth.
What the dl shall I do?what a misfortune!
exclaimed the actor, with a degree of concern
infinitely
greater than any that his bruised shins had
occasioned.
It's but a small hole: it's easily mended, said
Vernon.
Small! exclaimed the actor, with some
indignation
.
Ay, ay, not so deep as a well, nor so wide
as a church door, but 'tis enough to call for the
instant
succour of a darning needle. Juliet, that is to
say, my little Mary, here, shall take it up off hand.
She's a nice, handy body, that; would make, with
training, an admirable Juliet'gad, 'twould be a
charity to give her lessons, and I'll think of it. But
to the Romeoshe shall take up the rent in the
twinkling of an eye.
Surely, Mr. Horsey, you will not delay us for so
small a matter.
Small a matter, indeed! By St. David's best
buckles, Harry, you have a strangely irreverent way
about you! Such a rent in Romeo's body is no
small matter. Let the audience see a hole in a hero's
breeches, and dme if it don't turn all his tragedy
into farce. I once saw a chap named Barnes playing
Lear, with his shirtan ugly corner of it, I mean
depending, for all the world like a streamer, fully a
quarter of a yard from his inexpressibles. The
audience roared with admiration, which Barnes took
for applause. Never did a fellow play so furiously
finewith so much earnestness and enthusiasm.
But the more fire he put into his acting, the more it
filled them with laughter; all of which he mistook,
like an ass as he was, for pleasure at his
performance
.
On a sudden, however, he happened to
fling his left hand behind him, in order to adjust his
sword, and he grasped along with it the obtrusive
garment. You never saw a fellow's comb cut so
short off. He lost his voice in an instanthis head
dropped, and when he came round to the wing, the
sweat stood upon his brow like treacle. No, no! I
am clear that no man should make his bow to the
public with a hole in his breeches.
Vernon expostulated against the delay, but in
vain. A new measure suggested itself to his
companion
.
While her hand's in at one thing, she can do the
other, or I'll do it myself. I'll get Mary to heat me
an iron, and I'll smooth it before I start. It's ruined
for ever if I put it back in this condition.
Vernon saw that expostulation and entreaty were
alike vain. Horsey made a point of healing Romeo's
hurtsthe ruling passion rendering him equally
obstinate
to argument and entreaty; and with a
complacency
as enviable in the eye of a traveller as it
is desirable in that of an actor, he sallied from his
chamber with the fractured garment in his hand,
and proceeded instantly and without circumlocution,
to declare his requisitions to mother and daughter.
Get your needle, my little Juliet, and show me
what sort of a workman you are; but first put me
an iron to warm; I must take out these wrinkles.
The girl willingly assumed the performance of the
task set her, and Horsey sat down the while to
breakfast, but his eyes were upon her as she sewed,
and more than once he started up to look at her
progress.
Well enough done, Mary. You are the girl
after my own heart. Egad, if my wardrobe suffers
much more injury in this fashion, I shall not be able
to do without you. I shall have to come and steal
you from mamma. A stitch or two more just there,
Mary, if you please; and now that I look at it, just
beneath the arm I see that a thread has dropped.
The garment is rather tight over the shoulders, and
it is only a timely precaution that would guard
against the strain of any great action in that quarter.
A man's blood gets up wondrously, Harry, when
he's in the fury of a fifth actwhen he's warmed by
opposition, and, more than all, by his own rising
consciousness
of what is called for by the character.
At such a time his action increases accordingly, and
it would be the most awkward thing in the world, if,
extending his arm to convey the idea of command,
to order Buckingham's head off, or any matter of
equal tragic signification, he should discover to the
inquisitive audience a rent under the arm, and a
glimmer of a white cotton shirt beneath his buckram.
It's the easiest thing in the world to upset the gravity
of an audience in the deepest scenes. One fool
makes many, and the first booby that laughs out,
without any fear of shame, finds a hundred
followers
.
I've seen it a thousand times, and know there
is nothing so tragic as will frighten farce. Farce
follows
tragedy as naturally as the sparks fly upward.
She stands beside her, ready to grin at the first
opening
;
and let dignity forget herself for an instant, she
claps her hands, and darts in, without any regard to
decency, before all the spectators.
Thus rambling on, the actor ate his breakfast, and
watched the progress of Mary with her needle. The
bright eyes of the girl laughed the while, and her
cheeks blushed, when he hung over her; his glances
being equally shared between the sempstress and the
garment. The breakfast over, Vernon, with some
consternation, beheld him proceeding to assist the
mother
and daughter in removing the plates and dishes
in order to convert the table into a tailor's board, on
which he could perform the last-needed office of
smoothing out the rumpled Romeo. Old Yarbers
looked on with a scarcely-suppressed smile, which
was not lessened as the actor confessed to having
disordered his wardrobe in his
night
-errant habits.
He
could have told a truer story, and have accounted
more truly, if not more rationally, for the condition
of the saddle-bags. But he was prudent enough to
conceal his knowledge, and suppress, though with
difficulty, his laughter. The actor had made a clean
breast, and declared the true cause of the uproar of
last night to the family. There was nothing
retentive
in his nature, unless it might be in the one
purpose
of his mood; and prattling ever, like the
downward
running fountain, his streams, the deeps and
shallows alike, were equally open to the sunlight.
Harry Vernon, meanwhile, became impatient to the
last degree. Not that he had any reason to wait for
Horsey, beyond that of mere civility. He well knew
that, before the day was out, they would reach the
spot where diverging roads should prove
convincingly
to the actor that his course was other than
that which he had so precipitately and erroneously
assumed to be the same with his own. To hurry
off before his companion was ready, in order that
he might anticipate this truth, would at least seem
rude, if it were not so in reality; and then the
utter simplicity and good nature of the actor
pleaded
in his behalf, and made Vernon, who was
generously
and nobly constituted, reluctant to do any
thing which might inflict unnecessary pain, even
though he well knew that a nature so mercurial as
that of Horsey would not feel it long. Resolved,
therefore, to await the actor's pleasure, he sat
resigned
to his fate, and beheld him removing the
hominy, the remnants of the bacon and eggsthe
mother, father and daughter, equally, and in vain,
VOL. I. 17
striving to prevent him from performing duties so
seemingly inconsistent with the dignity of a
gentleman
and the position of a guest. But his activity
set their exertions at defiance. Plate followed plate,
and dish dish, and cup cup, without stop or stay,
until, striving to sweep up in one common effort the
remaining odds and ends, he grappled them quite too
unceremoniously together, and, to his own horror,
and the great reddening of the hostess's cheeks, they
came in undistinguishable ruin to the ground.
Bless my soul, Mrs. Yarbers, but what have I
done? I have broken all your cups and saucers.
No! never mind, Mr. Horsey, stammered the
old lady, half angry with her old favourite, yet doing
her utmost to conceal her annoyance.
It's very unfortunate. I certainly had 'em fast,
my dear madam. I could carry twice as many.
I'll show you now, I'll bring back, in two turns, all
that I have carried to the shelf; and he actually
proceeded to restore the plates and dishes to the
tableand if I break so much as a teacup, I'll
give my head for a football. It was certainly the
strangest misfortune.
Vernon interposed.
Certainly it was, Mr. Horseya sort of fatality
which can no more be accounted for than helped.
All that you can do is to send Mrs. Yarbers a fine
set from Vicksburg or Natchez, and take care to
meddle with no more cups and saucers. The table
is ready for you nowwhy not smooth the garment?
True, true, my cousin of Vernon, that is a good
thought; and Besshold me your debtor for a set of
china, the best that money can get in Natchez. Nay,
nay, I will have no refusalit must be so. You shall
have the cups and saucers; I swear it by my Romeo,
which stands waiting for smoothing. Let me have
the iron, Mary,nay, don't burn your pretty fingers
with itlet me have it.
It's hot, Mr. Horsey. Better take it up with the
towel, sir, said the girl. But the rapid actor had
already grasped the iron at the fire, with a rapidity
only exceeded by the haste with which he dropped
it again; and he now stood blowing his fingers, his
face red as a lobster's with the sudden pain, and his
mouth puffing and speaking alternately.
Hot asphew! phew!the skin's off fingers as
well as legs. Phew! Harry, my dear fellow, what an
accident! Ay, do, Mary, that's a dear girldo you
iron it for me. Let your iron lie smoothly, Mary,
my dear, and take care that it doesn't scorch Romeo
as it has scorched me. That blue is very perishable
phew!the misfortune of all things that are very
beautiful. There, thereI think that will do. It must
do. I won't worry you to work for me any longer,
my sweet Juliet. Mrs. Yarbers, why didn't you call
your daughter Juliet, instead of Mary?
As well might Mrs. Yarbers ask why you were
not called Romeo, instead of Tom, Mr. Horsey.
The one question might be answered just as readily
as the other. But time presses on me, if not on you,
and if you are disposed to stop until you have
revised
all the Christian names in the county, there is
certainly no good reason why I should linger to
assist
you.
Right, Harry,there's right and reason in what
you say. Mrs. Yarbers, the best friends must part
you shall hear of me soon, and see me again when
I have got through my business above. Mary, my
dear, you shall be my Juliet,nay, don't look down
I tell you it shall be so. There shall go an oath
to it that shall bind one of us, at least; and unless
Mr. Mabry steps between us bothha! so you turn
awayyou do not like that,well, I like you the
better that you do not; and so good-bye. `It is a
grief so brief to part' with thee. Come, Harry
Vernon, I am ready now.
The actor had prolonged the parting words and
moments to the last possible limits, and somewhat to
the surprise of Vernon, he saw, or fancied he saw,
an expression of seriousness and interest, rather
beyond
that of his ordinary manner, conspicuous in
what he said and looked to the lovely forest damsel.
Nor, on the other hand, did it seem to Vernon that
the girl was entirely without some consciousness of
the interest which she occasioned, and that which
she felt, for her little rosy lips quivered as she spoke
to them at parting, and the good-bye trembled
in imperfect expression upon her scarcely opened
mouth. Mrs. Yarbers was pleased to assure both
the travellers that nothing would gladden her more
than to see them often; a compliment which she
then repeated to Horsey in particular; and one, in
approbation of which, her lord and master growled
out certain confirmatory, but scarcely intelligible,
sentences. For a brief space after their departure
from the hovel, the spirits of Horsey seemed
considerably
depressed. He said but little, and that
little with the air of a man who speaks rather to
avoid the imputation of sullenness, than with any
desire to please. When he did speak more freely,
and with the gradual assumption of his former mood,
his expressions revealed the true source of his
solemnity.
There is something monstrous uncomfortable at
parting, Harry, even with acquaintances of
yesterday
.
I don't get over it for an hour or two. It
seems to me like rooting me up, and tearing off
some of my leaves and branches, when I am
compelled
to grapple hands only to cast them loose
again. It's true it don't make me sickfor that
matter I shouldn't go to bed, I believe, or lose
stomach for a dinner, if I was to be separated for
ever from the best friends in the world. I should
only, if that were the case, take a pine torch in my
fingers, and go about looking after others; and a
newer set might soon console me for the lost. But
it seems to weigh me down,my limbs grow
weakish, and I lose all desire to make any exertions
and scarcely care to say or hear any thing, though
the best passage offered itself for quotation, jump to
the moment, from Billy Shakspeare, that High
Treasurer
of all manner of spoken jewels. Now I feel
just so in leaving these good people. It's true Brown
Bess is an old crony. I know nothing about her
husband, who seems but a curmudgeon; but that
dear little creaturethat Marydon't you think her
devilish handsome, Harry? What a forehead she
has! what lips, eyes, hair! A very collection of
beauties! Celia, Rosalind, and Helen, melted into
one; and yet, Harry, she did not speak twenty
words to me the whole time she was present.
How could shewho can, Mr. Horsey?
replied
Vernon, laughing, you out-talked the whole
family.
The lawyer, also. By my faith, Harry, but that
I heard you make a long and good speech at
Raymond
,
I should be inclined to say you had taken
up the wrong profession. Now I should have been
the lawyer.
You mistake. You would soon ruin yourself as
a lawyer. You would soon talk yourself away. A
lawyer's words are the materials he works with,
you would soon dull them, or wear them out. Your
talking lawyer is a profligate who cheapens his own
wares by making them common. To talk in the
right place is his art, no less than to talk to the
purpose
.
17*
The where, and the when, and the how much,
are the three grand requisites of public speaking.
Egad, if that be the case, Harry, I should be
soon swallowed up; for, as to stopping to think when
I should speak, and what I should say, that would
seem to be the most idle, as it would certainly be, in
my case, the most impracticable thing in the world.
For that matter, I don't know half the time that I'm
talking, even when my tongue is most busy `beating
all the chimes of Westminster.' I catch myself,
every now and then, speechifying of my own head,
or giving a reading from Shakspeare to pine trees
and gray mosses, wasting myself, as the rose does
its sweetness, upon the desert air, when I can get no
better audience. Such, I trust, will not be our fate
at Benton, however, if Tilton has any skill in
management
,
and the Yazooians any taste. By the
splinters, you shall see how I shall drive; nay,
there's no good reason why I should not give you a
sample now. Here's a quiet spotlooks for all the
world as if it was meant for such a purpose. There
is a space on the brow of the hill which would
accommodate
a thousand people, and the pines rise,
and the oaks spread above and around it, and the
vines link them together and fill up the space
between
;
so that the amphitheatre of the Romans was
never so compact, and not half so well covered.
And, in the woods, with green leaves around me, my
voice seems to have a volume and a clearness that
I cannot always command in a building. Ride up
with me for a minute, and you shall see as good an
imitation of Forrestdid you ever meet with
Forrest
,
Harry? A splendid, half-savage-looking fellow
a sort of Mark Antony before dinnerwho, by
the way, would make a figure in Dryden's Antony,
perhaps superior to any who has yet tried it. But I
will show you Forrest in Damon,you shall have
the strangling sceneI'll choke a pine sapling for
LucullusI'll
He commenced riding up the hill as he spoke, but
Vernon stopped him.
I ride on, Mr. Horsey. I would not now stop to
see Forrest himself.
The dl you wouldn't.
No, on my soul I wouldn't.
The actor stared.
Harry Vernon, you are a bundle of mysteries.
How can it be that you love the stage?nay, how
can you yourself play with any hope of success
unless
you are willing to behold the best models?
Your remark reminds me of the error under
which you have laboured so long and under which
you still labour; was the reply of Vernon expressed
in looks equally grave with his language. I will
not ask, Mr. Horsey, by what means, or by whom,
you became possessed of the idea that I entertained
a passion for the stage and had resolved to go upon
it. It is enough that such is your delusion,
entertained
in spite of my earnest and repeated assurances
that such was not my intentionthat I had no
such passion, and that I was already earnestly and
irrevocably bound to the pursuit of another
profession
one
of the most jealous as the most absorbing
which will suffer neither rival nor interruption.
With a most unbecoming resoluteness you refused
credence to my own assurances to this effect, and
have appointed yourself my travelling companion,
without knowing how far I desired company, or
whether your presence might not somewhat interfere
with the object of my pursuit. It has not been
through your forbearance, Mr. Horsey, that it has
not done so, and I trust you will believe me when I
tell you that it has been with me a serious fear that
such might be its effect. Finding you possessed
with this strange notion, and having exhausted all
my forms of speech in seeking to convince you that
I was no actor, and did not intend to become one, I
foreborein consideration of your parents, who have
treated me so kindly, and with some reference to
yourself, for I am not blind to your good qualities
and natural partsfarther expostulation and
complaint
,
and was contented that you should remain in
your error for awhile, satisfied that it would not be
very long before you would be disabused of it. That
time is now at hand; a few miles farther will bring
us to the forks, and you will then find that I will
certainly take the upper road for Beattie's Bluff,
while you, if your aim be Benton, will as certainly
take that which crosses the river below. It only
remains
that I should again assure you, with all the
solemnity of an oath, though I make none, that I am
by profession a lawyer, that I have never dreamed of
any other, and do not know, and have never thought
to inquire, whether I have the most partial
qualification
for the stage. I admire good acting, am not
deficient in a knowledge of the best dramatists, can
quote Shakspeare almost as frequently, if not so
felicitously as yourself, and, at another time than
this,with less care upon my mind, and less
business
upon my hands,I should be particularly
pleased to hear you in any, and all, of your favourite
parts. Believe me, Mr. Horsey, from what I have
already seen, I am prepared to believe that it is in
your power, with study, industry, and humility, to
rise to considerable distinction in your art.
Say you so, Harry? Then I forgive you all the
rest. I forgive you all that dd dignity that makes
me feel all over as if Carter himself had caught me
playing tricks with my neighbours' sign boards, and
was scoring me hip and thigh with a most thorny
morality. But, Harry, do you really think from
what you have seen that I should become a proper
actor?
I do, really, Mr. Horsey.
That is to say with study and industry. But
what do you mean by humility? I don't see any
necessity for humility. Indeed, that's the last matter
that a modern actor esteems as a requisite.
The most necessary of all, for without humility
one learns nothing. He will neither see in what he
is himself defective, nor in what consists his rival's
superiority. He can learn nothing who believes
there is little left him to learn, and he alone learns
all that man can teach, who is humble enough to
doubt his own possessions, and hopeful enough to
labour for their increase. I should have high hopes
of you, Mr. Horsey, could you bring yourself to this
conviction.
God bless you, my dear fellow, these are devilish
kind words of yours. Devilish kind! I'm dnably
unused to them. I've heard nothing all my life but
censure; sneer and censure. Managers, and actors,
and audience,no, dme, I won't say any thing
about the audience, they have always treated me well
enough whenever I had fair play before them,but,
by my soul, I can't say the same for my brother
actors, and still less favourably can I speak of
managers
.
Had I believed them, I should have cut my
throat, or turned in as a wagoner, or taken to some
other villanous handicraft which only suffers a man
to know that he is alive at meal-time. They have
denied all my hopes and decried all my talents; and
then came doubts to my mind;doubtsdark, dirty,
earth-whelming, miserable doubts, Mr. Vernon, that
made my soul sick, and made me feel as if I could
steal away into some dark corner of the woods and
die; satisfied, if out of human sight, that they spoke
nothing but the truththat I had deceived myself
that, in short, I had none of that genius, the fires of
which I fancied to be blazing away proudly and
in-extinguishably
in soul and brain. Oh, Harry Vernon,
these were killing, crushing doubts, and when they
came to me, as they always did when I was out of
money, and the dd tailors and tavern-keepers at
my heels, I felt all over as the meanest of all possible
beings. But you cheer me; your wordsfor I
believe
you, Harry, to be a dd smart fellowyour
words reassure me. I feel my courage rise; I feel
the fire blazing up within me, and by all that's
resolute
in man, it shall blaze out, ere many days, to the
satisfaction of others. But, though you give me life,
Harry, curse me but you crush me again when you
tell me you are not one of us. I can hardly believe
you even now. I heard it so solemnly asserted, and,
indeed, lost and paid a bet on the matter.
Something strange, at least, in all this business,
said Vernon, curiously. Pray where did you hear
this story?
In Raymond, while you were talking in the
court-house.
My talking in the court-house, alone, should
have sufficed to prove my profession.
Yes, it would, and it did, at first; but there was
a dd plausible story told me about the matter,
which made me throw it all up as so much
gammon
.
And who took so much interest in me, and so
much pains to lead you astray in this matter, Mr.
Horsey? Can you remember?
The actor, without hesitation, gave full details of
the conference with Hawkins and Saxon in the
village
of Raymond, narrated such portions of the
dialogue as had special reference to theatricals and
his companion's probable connexion with them, and
from the succinctness of his statements, and the
clearness with which he repeated the several parts
taken by the two, he soon convinced Vernon that
there must have been a sinister purpose in the minds
of the men who made such seemingly gratuitous
mis-statements. The name of Hawkins strengthened
this conviction.
Hawkins, Hawkins! That was the name of the
man whom the governor arrested.
The same, replied Horsey. He's a strange
sort of suspicious chap. Every body thinks there's
something wrong about him, but they can't tell what.
He gambles, they all know; but he's so cunning they
can find nothing worse against him; though I've no
doubt they're right in thinking him a great rascal.
Indeed! and can it be that you value your
character
so little as to consort with a fellow whom you
think a rascal?
Ah, Harry, there you have me. But, truth to
speak, a poor devil like myself, whom one set snarls
at, and the other laughs at, is devilish well satisfied
to get a companion who will do neither, without
being particularly anxious to know whether he's as
good a man as he should be, or even as he appears.
Besides, let me tell you, Hawkins is a smart fellow.
He has Shakspeare at his fingers' ends, and I've
seen him throw that into his face, while he's been
going through a part of Iago, which would send a
shiver through pit and gallery at a glance.
Enough: these men have lied to you, Mr.
Horsey
,
at least so far as I have been concerned. They
have, I gather from your account of it, used you as
a spy upon me.
The devil you say?
Think over the matter yourself, my friend, and
you cannot escape this conviction. They have
flattered
your ruling passion, and have gleaned from
you all the knowledge of me and my movements
which might have been in your possession.
Fortunately
,
you knew nothing, and could reveal nothing,
nothing at least of very serious importance.
Whether any thing worse will grow out of it than
this wild-goose chase upon which they have sent
you, it is impossible now to say. It will be
important
,
however, that we should both be cautious in
our future progress.
Spoken like a book, Harry. But why the dl
should these fellows want to know your movements,
heh? So you
have
secrets, Harrythere is a
mysterythere
Professional and personal, purely, Mr. Horsey,
and when I tell you this much, I trust, I secure
myself
against further inquiry. To convince you,
however
,
that I regard you with interest and favour, I
make free to counsel you to return to your friends
and family. I do not believe this story of theatrical
establishments at Benton and other places. The
country is unfit for, and unable to support them. A
circus, now, would be more reasonable; a place for
ground and lofty tumbling; but, seriously, I look upon
the dramatic art as utterly foreign to such regions
as the Yazoo. There is, as yet, no settled
population
.
The country is uncleared, and thoroughly
wild; settled by squatters, chieflywithout means,
tastes, education, or sensibility; rude, rough people;
a people peculiarly fitted for the conquest of savages
and savage lands, but utterly incapable of
appreciating
an art so exquisite and intellectual as that of
the legitimate drama. Go back, and if it be your
resolute determination to seek for fame in the
prosecution
of your present purposewhich I would not
counselseek it, then, where only it is to be found.
Go to the large citiesgo to the largest. Where
the ability exists to pay best, there will always the
best talent assemblethere will the true standards
of critical judgment be formed, and rival powers will
soon reduce each other to their just level, until
which there can be no certain reputation. There is
something very puny in the judgment of small
communities
;
and something very contemptible in being
a little lion in a little plain. Go to the ring where all
the challengers assemble, and strike the shield of the
most insolent and bold. When you have done this,
you will find your level, and what is of more
importance
to you still, you will have justly arrived at a
knowledge of your own strength. Till then, you
walk in vapour, and the stars which shine above you
are far or near, according to the wind and the
weather
,
your own caprice of mood, or the caprice of
feeling and judgment of those with whom you
mingle
.
Understand me, Mr. Horsey, I do not counsel
you by what I have said, to pursue the stage. Far
from it. I believe the glories of the profession to be
very uncertain, and its golden rewards, half the time,
to be visionary; besides, it is attended by a thousand
defeats and humiliations which are gall and
wormwood
to the independent spirit. On this head, you
know best what you will do, and to your calm,
common-sense
reflection, I am willing to leave it. But if
you are resolved to be an actor, then it is my advice
that you break ground where the audience is large,
and where the competitors are many; where you will
be compelled to take pains to preserve rank and
respectability
,
and where no petty management or
petty clique can prevent your efforts, or do injustice
to your performance. Go to the great city, if you
must act, and throw yourself upon the waters.
Remember
VOL. I. 18
the noble chorus in your own favourite
play,
`A kingdom for a stage, princes to act,
And monarchs to behold the swelling scene,
Then should the warlike Harry,
like himself
,
Assume the port of Mars'
It is only, you perceive, where the field is large,
commensurate to the greatness of the actorthat he
can be
like himself
,that he can do justice to
himself
,
or feel that ambitious spurring of the soul
which is conscious always of her true occasions.
CHAPTER XIV.
You see this chase is hotly followed, friends.
King Henry V
.
We
arrest the farther dialogue which took place
between the two before their separation. Horsey
was gratified at the interest which Vernon seemed
to take in his fortunes, for the simple but dignified
manners of the young lawyer had impressed him
with a respectful deference, which had the effect,
not unfrequently, of restraining his exuberance of
character, and compelling him to meditate awhile
before speaking; a practice exceedingly novel to
him, and one which kept him from sundry outbreaks
of folly while they were in company together. He
listened
with unaccustomed patience to the exhortations
of Vernon, and though he had not the courage to
forbear the small game which he was even then
pecking at, he acknowledged the generally beneficial
tenor of the advice given him. He was not willing
to believe that the forest world in which he was
about to penetrate was unsusceptible of present
dramatic
improvement, and still less was he willing to
tolerate the suspicion which his companion threw
out, that the story of Tilton's theatrical establishment
at Benton was a falsehooda hoax invented for the
simple purpose of securing him as an instrument in
the prosecution of some ulterior purpose as yet
unaccountable
to either party. His heart was set upon
obtaining the plaudits of the Bentonians, and his ears
already rang prospectively with their clapping and
huzzas. These, he thought, would not be amiss, even
though at some future period, he struck at the higher
game of the great metropolis. Small triumphs are
the forerunners of great ones; and he was one of
those who thought it just as well to accept the wreath
of myrtle, if the more enduring laurel could not be
so easily procured. With this philosophy he was
the more readily reconciled to a separation from the
companion, in conjunction with whom, until the
present hour, he fancied he was to enter the green
and verdurous fields of an actor's immortality. He
had many regretful quotations to utter; many
protestations
of fidelity and friendship.
And should you want help, Harry, he cried out
as they rode asunder, should you get into any
spree and want a backer to see you safe, give me a
sign, a signallet me have the cueand by the ghost
of Garrick, I will need no prompter to tell me what
my part should be in the business. I will be at your
side in the twinkling of an eye, and they shall be
Turks and Trojans of heavy metal, indeed
Syracusans
of stamp and substancewho will hold their
ground long before us twain,my Pythias and
myself
.
Long and heartily did the adhesive actor wring
the hand of his companion, to whom, though not an
ascetic, the scenic exuberance of his friend became
almost an annoyance; and he found it a relief to
escape from that excruciating degree of affection to
which he felt unable to make more than a very
partial
return. His escape was at length effected, though
Horsey, like Prior's thief,
Now fitted the halter, now traversed the cart,
And often took leave, but seemed loth to depart.
It will somewhat confirm the truth of the assurances
of sorrow which he expressed at parting with his
friend, to say, that, for full twenty minutes after
leaving him, he uttered no single quotation, unless
we may except the fragment of a speech made to
his horse, the renewal of whose irregular motion had
revived all the peculiar sensibility of old sores made
the day previous. Ah, Bowline, Bowline!
Shakspeare
almost gave me warning against thee in
particular
;
certainly I have the `rubbers,' though I did
not expect them. If you go on at this rate, you
limping dl, Romeo's quarters will be in no
condition
to climb balconies, or do the necessary action
of a lover. I am parched and peeled, hip and thigh,
literally scalded, as tender as a steamed potato, and
as raw as a thoroughly done one. Well, well, it is
to be expected. One should not complain where the
end promises so much. These, I suppose, are the
first pains which a man is expected to take in
getting
on in the worldthe pains of immortality, the
condition of greatness, a suffering in the flesh for
the ambitious workings of the spirit, which should
teach a man, among other lessons, to value the glory,
when won, which he purchases at so much cost.
Well, it is but a skin-deep suffering, after all, and
there is some consolation in knowing, you limping
rascal, that I can make you share it. My spurring
shall equal your scalding, or there never yet went
two words to a bargain.
While the actor communed after this manner with
his uneasy steed, Harry Vernon, better mounted,
was making his forward way with a speed rather
greater than his wont, as it was his object to make
up for the time lost in waiting upon Horsey's
operations
at the hut of Yarbers, and, subsequently, in that
which had been consumed in their parting. He had
ridden probably an hour after that event, and the
motion of his horse had been suffered to relax into
18*
that ordinary walking trot to which most horses
on long travel naturally incline. The thoughts of
the rider, busied with other subjects, were now
abstracted
from the movements of his steed, and he was
gradually becoming indifferent to, and unobservant
of, surrounding objects, when he was brought to his
senses by the sudden and fast trampling of a horse's
feet behind him. Looking round, what was his
surprise
to behold Edward Mabry, the lover of Mary
Stinson, in the person of his pursuer. Vernon drew
up and awaited himreadily guessing the purpose of
his pursuit, and really glad that Horsey had taken
another course, and got so greatly the start of one
whose desperate hostility was apparent in every
glance of his eye, and in every motion of his
malignant
,
and now wretched countenance. The tokens
of the combat of the preceding night were
prominently
offensive. His eyes were so swollen that the
orbs were barely perceptible, and the sight must have
been barely sufficient to enable him to ride. This
condition of his face made the rage which appeared
its leading expression, look monstrous and fiendish.
His lips were tremulous though closed, the veins
upon his forehead tensely corded; and the skin
around, affected by the injuries done to his eyes,
had assumed in spots, a dark, dirty green colour,
which added to the general hideousness of his present
aspect. He was armed with a rifle, which, perhaps,
in the present situation of his eyes, would be found
far less formidable than usual. Glaring upon Vernon
with an expression of hostility which almost left it
doubtful in our hero's mind if he himself were not also
the object of his pursuit, he demanded to know what
had become of his companion. His words were few
and passionate, and the disrespectful manner in which
he spoke, and the brutal epithets which he applied at
the same time to the person for whom he inquired,
had the effect of producing a certain degree of
irritation
in the mind of Vernon, which kept his answer
in suspense. The youth repeated his demand in a
style of insolence more offensive than before.
I have no desire to quarrel with you, said
Vernon
,
but still less am I disposed to satisfy the
demands
of any one who makes them disrespectfully.
I will not answer your question. I will tell you
nothing about Mr. Horsey or his movements.
Ha! then you take his place. You shall answer
for him yourself, cried the other, dropping his reins
and grasping his rifle in both hands. The instinctive
and natural movement of Vernon was to close with
him at once, and thus defeat the contemplated
employment
of the deadly weapon with which he
threatened him. He wheeled his horse instantly
beside
that of the assailant, and his left hand grasped
the weapon also.
What mean you, madman? What would you
do? demanded Vernon, sternly. But that I pity
you, your movement this instant would have
prompted
me to shoot you down like a dog. If you are
angry with Mr. Horsey, that is no business of mine.
I am not answerable for his conduct nor his
absence
.
Then tell me where he is, replied the other
hoarsely, or stand in his shoes.
Neither, sir. I will give you no assistance in
your folly.
A scuffle followed this reply. Mabry strove to
back his horse in order that he might employ his
rifle. Such at least seemed his object to Vernon,
whose efforts were directed to defeat this purpose;
and suffering the other to recede, he addressed all
his strength to obtaining possession of the weapon,
which Mabry, in the sudden backward movement
of his horse, was compelled to yield up, or suffer
himself to be drawn with it between the two animals.
Furious at this disadvantage he leaped to the ground
and drawing a bowie knife, rushed forward. But a
few paces divided them, and the rapidity of his
assailant's
movement was such that Vernon felt he
could neither take aim, nor prepare the weapon in
time to anticipate his attack. With this conviction
he put spurs to his horse and drew him up only after
he had put a space of fifty yards between them.
Advance upon me a second time, young man,
and I shoot you without scruple. You are a
madman
to act in this manner. What have I done to
you? Of what do you complain? Do you think I
will answer your questions, or the questions of any
body who does not speak respectfully? Do you
suppose I will assist in guiding you to the
commission
of murder? You are mistaken in me no less
than in yourself. In a fair struggle, were I so
disposed
,
I should put you down as effectually as you
were put down last night; and were it not that I should
derive but little satisfaction from such a victory,
your insolent language might have provoked me to
have done so before this. Think a little before you
move farther in this business. By this time the
person
you seek is far beyond your reach; and as for
me, you gain nothing, I assure you, by annoying
me. I will return you your rifle if you will promise
me that you will not use it.
I will make no promise, replied the other,
leaping
again upon his steed, we shall soon be at closer
quarters.
And with these words, with a fury even more blind
than his hurt vision, the madman was preparing to
urge his horse forward upon the speaker, heedless of
warning, and in utter defiance of the lifted rifle.
I warn you again,once, twice, thrice, I warn
you, were the slow, deliberate tones of Vernon's
voice, as, dropping the rifle in his left hand, he lifted
the ranging sights before his eye, approach me,
Mr. Mabry, with bared weapon, and I will certainly
shoot you.
I defy, I dare you. Shoot, and be dd! I fear
you not, said the fellow, as he put spurs to his horse.
Hold! cried the voice of one who darted before
his path, emerging into the main road from a little
Indian trail that crossed it at nearly equal distances
between the contending parties. The interruption
was seasonable enough. Vernon had already cocked
the rifle, and the approach, by ten steps more, of his
furious assailant, would have had the effect of
drawing
his fire. The entrance of the third personage
relieved him from a dreadful necessity.
Hold, you, Ned Mabry, you meal-headed fellow!
What the deuce is it you're a-doing?
The abrupt salutation arrested the rash onset of
the youth, and probably saved his life. The stranger
was a tall backwoodsman, fully six feet in height,
and solid and massive like a tower. He rode a
coal-black
horse of proportions and strength of
corresponding
greatness with his owna keen, fire-eyed
animal, broad chested, strongly quartered, slim in
fetlock, small in hoof, long necked, narrow headed,
and with a mane, which, though plaited and divided
on either side, seemed scarcely less copious than that
of the full possession of the ordinary horse. His own
person was no less symmetrical and erect than it was
large and powerful. His cheeks were of a fine
sanguine
hue, his eyes bright, blue and lively, denoting
good nature, with an arch, lurking humour, that
perhaps
indicated a fondness for his jest in defiance of
the broken bones which are sometimes apt to
follow
it. His nose was finely Roman, and his
forehead
,
though neither broad nor high, was yet full,
suitably large, and contributed to that general
expression
of character, rather than talents, which
belonged
to his other features. He looked earnestly
for a few minutes upon Vernon while addressing
Mabry, to whom he spoke in the familiar language
of an old acquaintance.
Well, now you're a pretty lark to serve me in
this way, Ned Mabry. Didn't you promise me you
wouldn't do any thing more with this business. Didn't
you say you'd let the stranger get off, and say no
more about it; and here, only two hours after, I find
you, like a cursed maw-mouth that grows blind when
he sees a worm wriggle, here you're mad after the
bait though there's a hook in it. Don't you see the
rifleyou a'n't bullet-proof, I reckon?
It's my own rifle, Walter, said the assailant,
sullenly.
The devil it is! cried the other with a laugh;
then it's a sign I haven't come a minute too soon.
You've got another warning of the truth I told you.
Look you, stranger, turning to Vernon, to whom
the sudden arrival of a third person, who seemed an
associate of his enemy, only cautioned to greater
watchfulness; look you, stranger, you mustn't take
it hard that this mad fellow set upon you, seeing
you've took his sweetheart from him, and put his
two eyes in double-mourning. It's mighty hard to
lose one's gal and get a beating all in the same night,
and I reckon there's a mighty few of us that wouldn't
be just as mad as Ned Mabry after it.
But I've done neither, said Vernon; I've neither
beaten him, nor took his sweetheart from him. I
have done him no sort of injury, intentional or
otherwise
;
and he has no more excuse to assail me than
he has to assail the man in the moon.
How! how the dl's this, Ned? Didn't you
tell me?
Not this one,the otherthe man that was
travelling
with him.
The splinters! and so you set upon the wrong
man. Well, I say, that's being owl-blind, stone-blind,
horse-blind; blind of three eyes, without even a
smeller to go by. What the devil made you trouble
him?
This question was soon answered, and the cause
of difference explained. The good-natured stranger
proceeded to patch up the affair, and, if possible,
reconcile the parties. On Vernon's side this was no
great difficulty. The other, foiled on every hand,
baffled so far in the pursuit of one who had humbled
him so successfully, and suffering from his bruises of
body no less than those of mind, was just in that state
of stupid doggedness when conciliation was almost
as much thrown away upon him as argument and
explanation. More was done by the sheer influence
of the stranger's wish, than by his reasoning. The
rustic lover seemed to recognize in Wat or Walter
Rawlins,for such was the name of the last comer,
a superior, before whom he stood irresolute and
dependent. He confirmed the promise made in his
behalf by the latter to Vernon, that he would offer
him no farther injury or insult, and, at his solicitation,
he returned the rifle to Mabry, though not until he
had pushed the flint from the teeth of the cock, thus
depriving him of the power of doing any immediate
harm with the instrument, unless he went better
provided
than usual. He had performed this movement
with so little effort and so much adroitness, while the
lock of the gun lay beneath his right hand, and on the
opposite side of his horse to that where the other
parties
stood, that he had escaped observation; and,
satisfied
with the possession of his weapon, Mabry
gave no glance to the condition in which it was
returned
to him.
And now, Ned Mabry, go you home and be
quiet, said his companion. You promised me
before
to do nothing in this business, and it's a dead
weight on your credit now that you didn't keep your
word. You a'n't in any condition now to look up
your enemies. With them eyes you could not see
to hit a squirrel, though he sat on a bare stump
grinning
at you with all his grinders; and how should
you look, going after a fellow who's got his own
peepers wide awake. Go back, I say, and keep
quiet till you see me again. As for this business of
Yarbers himself, continued the pacificator, drawing
his companion away to some little distance from the
place where Vernon stood, and lowering his voice
to a whispersay nothing till you see me. There's
something strange about it, and we've got some
mighty strange neighbours. Don't whisper it to
saint or sinner till we can tell whether it's a safe
person that's to hear it, and this there's no telling jist
at this time, when the whole country is in a sort of
topsy-turvy, and strange men come about us hearing
what they can, and telling nothing in return. There's
nothing to do but to keep quiet as I tell you, and out
of harm's way. I won't be gone longer than a
week; in the meantime get your eyes open if you
can, and keep 'em so. I'll keep on awhile with this
stranger, and see what I can drive out of him. He
don't look and behave like a man who was one of
Yarbers' kidney, and I've a sort o' notion you're quite
wrong in your guess that they're in one and the same
business. I'll worm it out of him in no time, I reckon.
If he's got the cunning of a rogue, I've got cunning
enough to see how deep it goes; and if he a'n't a
rogue, why then there will be one more honest man
found to help the rest.
Much more was said ere they separated, though
the conference occupied but little time. Vernon
meanwhile bade them a courteous good-day, and
was about to set forward, when the voice of
Rawlins
arrested him.
Stay a bit, stranger, if so be you like company.
I'm driving on in the same track with you for a few
miles farther, at least, and if you're like myself, you'll
agree that it's no bad thing to have somebody at
your elbow, if it's only to answer questions. When
a man's by himself he's apt to think strange things;
and the devil's more apt to be on the look-out for
a single traveller than when they go in pairs to
strengthen each other. I am a ra'al joker when the
humour suits, and I can sing, too, when the weather
a'n't against it, and the frogs don't rise in the throat.
So you see
Say no more, said Vernon; it will please me
to have your company.
Spoken like a man, and I'll be with you after a
word more with this unbroke colt. Now, Ned
Mabry
,
you promise me to give over the chase of this
fellow.
Such was the promise which Rawlins exacted
from his companion ere they separateda promise
reluctantly given, and badly kept; since he had
scarce reached the crossroads in returning, ere his
rage resumed full sway over him, and he struck into
the path which Horsey had taken, giving full rein to
his horse, in the hope to make up for that loss of
time in the pursuit which had been occasioned
by the events of the previous hour. Vernon was
joined by Rawlins, and in a few moments, on the
place which they had just occupied, stood the
outlaw
Saxon, who emerged from the woods on one
hand, and was immediately after joined by a
comrade
named Jones, who came to the spot from an
opposite quarter.
I would give something to know what Mabry
VOL. I. 19
and Rawlins had to talk about so long in secret;
said Saxon. Could you make out nothing?
Not a syllable, said Jones. His coming was
untimely.
Yes: but for that we should have lost one who
may become an enemy. Yarbers, certainly, would
have been the gainer; and we should have had good
reason for tying the arms of this fellow Vernon
behind
him. This, however, we must do before long.
We must use Judge Nawls for that business, I
reckon.
Ay, none better, said Saxon; but do you go
ahead, and keep on the haunches of these fellows.
Rawlins, I suppose, is on his way to the old
Methodist
quarter. He and Vernon know each other for
the first time, and they will probably separate at
Brother Badger's turn-out. Do not lose him from
sight. I will join you before midnight.
CHAPTER XV.
The noyse thereof cald forth that straunger knight,
To weet what dreadfull thing was there in hond;
Where whenas two brave knights in bloody fight,
With deadly rancor he enraunged fond,
His sunbroad shield about his wrest he bond,
And shining blade unsheathed.
Spenser
.
Vernon
rode on with his new companion,
Rawlins
whom
he soon discovered to be quite a social,
good-humoured fellowwith a speed which was
intended
to make up for lost time. It was his desire
to reach and cross the ferry over the Chitta-Loosa
before sunset, in order that he might find lodgings
on the opposite side at a conveniently early hour. But
this purpose, when expressed, was discouraged by
his companion.
It will be quite dark before you can get across
the ferry,which is more a ferry and a half than a
ferry; mighty bad crossing and a strange up and
down, in and out, turning and twisting contrivance
as ever you did see,and then, when you're across,
it's a chance if you find any place to stay at, that can
be called a place at all, under seven or eight miles.
But if you'll go with me to old Billy Badger's
to-night
he's
only two miles from the ferryyou can
take an early start in the morning, and have a whole
day before you. Billy Badger's a crumpy, stiff sort
of a persona raal, true-believing Methodist, that
preaches himself when the parson don't come, and
to my way of thinking, makes a deuced sight the
best prayer of any among them. He's rather strange
in his ways, to be sure, but you'll be heartily
welcome
.
He'll give you a good supper, but you must
swallow the long grace that goes before it; and if
one happens to be mighty hungry, it's a great trying
of the patience. I've been a-bothered by it more
than once before, but it's no use. Nothing can stop
him when he once begins, and I do think if the house
was a fire, he'd sooner let it burn awhile than cut
the prayer off in the middle. Now, I'm used to it
myself and don't mind it so much, but I think it only
right, when I ax a man to another's house, that I
should tell him what he's to look for.
A good rule, said Vernon; and without
saying
whether I will go with you or not, let me know
whether Mr. Badger is in the habit of receiving
company.
Sure he is; he has 'em at all times and of all
characters. Why, his house is something of a
thoroughfare
,
you see; being so near the ferry, and
folks a-travelling jist like you, and coming up late
in the day, are mighty apt to go to old Billy's to
spend the night.
But that must give him a great deal of trouble,
if he keeps no public house.
Not a bit, or if it does, he don't mind it in
consideration
of the good company, and somebody to
talk to. Though he's a gruff and grumpy sort of
person, he's mighty fond of a confabulation, and so
long as you'll listen, and even if you wont listen, he'll
still talk on, exhorting, as it were, and mighty airnest.
When he once gits hold of the flesh and the devil,
there's no telling how long he'll hold on. It's no
trifle that'll make him let go; and you'll see the
blood git up into his face, and the veins grow big on
his forehead, and the foam will come out and stand
in his mouth-corners long before he'll think you've
had enough. He never asks how you like the thing,
for he always concludes that he knows best what's
good for every body; and as for disagreeing with
him, when once you set eyes on him, you'll see for
yourself that that's out of the question. I tell you,
sir, Mr. Vernon, he looks like all the Laws and the
Prophets; and he speaks as if he stood on a high
place, and we were all put below to listen to him.
A stern old mana very judge in Israelfrom
your description.
The very thing, Mr. Vernon; but then he's
really kind as any man alive, though, for that
matter
,
he haint the knack of showing it kindly. He'll
help you up from the road with the look of the same
fellow that knocked you down; and bind up your
wounds with as sour a face all the while, as if his
own bowie-knife had made them. He'll talk to you
as if he thought you a rogue, just at the very time
when he's lending you a cool hundred; and when
he's helping you to the best on his table, he'll be
grumbling something about the indulgences of the
flesh, and the profligacies of appetite, and all that
sort of thing; so, unless you set out to find a bundle
of contradictions in every thing he does and says,
there's no telling how to take him.
I've met with such a character before, said
Vernon; it is neither unusual nor unnatural, and
only indicates a predominating self-esteem, that
asserts
its superiority by eccentricities of thought and
manner. The eccentricities of men arise, mostly,
from an undue estimate of their own importance,
which flatters itself by the surprises it
continually
effects, by means of novelty and strangeness,
19*
in the minds of the observers. So long as these
eccentricities
hurt nobody, people are content to laugh
or wonder at them; when they exceed this limit, the
owner ceases to be a fool, and is locked up as a
madman. Has this old gentleman a family.
He has a son who is nothing like hima sly,
cautious fellow, that I don't know whether to like or
dislikehe's neither one thing nor t'other, and, to
speak a truth, one reason against my liking him may
be that he don't seem to like me.
A good and sufficient reason. There are some
love-verses which maintain this philosophy in strong
and proper language:
`What care I how fair she be,
If she be not fair for me.'
Has the old gentleman no other family?
Yes, replied the other with a hesitating tone.
He's got a niecea mighty fine girl, named
Rachel
,
out of the Scriptures; the young man his son
is named out of the Scriptures, too,they call him
Gideon,though, I'm thinking that his name is
all that he ever got out of the Holy Book, or ever
will get. There's something wrong about him, I
reckon.
But Rachel, there's nothing wrong about her
you don't dislike Rachel, do you, Mr. Rawlins? for,
if you do, I shall begin to wonder why it is you
visit the family.
Ah, Mr. Vernon, you're a keen one. You must
be a lawyer, I'm thinking. But you say right,
there's nothing wrong about Rachel, and if the truth
is to be told, I may as well tell it at onceI do like
Rachel. I thinkthough I don't count her so pretty
as some that I've seen and could mentionI think
she is about the finest and best. She's so
sweet-tempered
,
and so modest and good; and then, she
has a great deal more sense, and a power of
larning
,
more than ever I expect to cram into this bigger
noddle of mine. I confess to you, Mr. Vernon, I do
like Rachel.
The frankness of the rustic lover, had already
placed the parties on the most friendly footing. His
confession increased the respect which the lawyer
had begun to entertain for him. He replied
playfully
And reasoning, Mr. Rawlins, from what you
have said of Gideon, I presume, one of your best
arguments
for liking Rachel is found in her liking
you. Is it not so?you love each other.
There is, perhaps, nothing so likely to win the
heart of a young lover, as to seek his confidence on
the subject nearest to his affections. The interest
we betray in his passion saves him from the fear of
ridiculean always prevalent fear with the tribe of
passionates,and that sinking fulness of heart which
distinguishes the lover, must find some friendly bosom
into which to pour its hopes, its fears, its tumultuous
and joyous expectancies. The words of Vernon
unsealed
the fountain, and took the stone from its lips.
After that, Rawlins had no farther concealments.
He grasped the hand of his companion, and,
warning
him the while to secrecy,a caution which was
rather insisted upon by the respect which he had
for the maiden, than because of any desire on his
own part to maintain, as a secret, a fact which was
so full to him of triumph as well as joyhe told him
that he had been successful in persuading Rachel to
regard him as the properest man in the country.
His courtship, from the beginning, underwent
developement
in all its details, with a more circumstantial
distinctness than even that of Othello, though it did
not appear that the affections of Rachel were secured
for her lover through a like medium. The
judgment
of Rawlins deferred to that of the maiden of
his heart. He studiously insisted upon her mental
superiority, and spoke in the becoming language of
that humility which acknowledges the favour of
fortune
in his conquests, and assumes no share of the
merit to himself.
I will go with you to-night, Mr. Rawlins, and
see this lady.
Do, that's a friend, Mr. Vernon; it does me good
when a man of sense and education talks with
Rachel
.
She's mighty sweet-spoken and smart; has a
whole closet-full of books; and sends to Natchy for
more whenever she can get a chance. Now, other
men would much rather have a wife to work and
mend for them, and would count it mighty idle to
see 'em poking over books; but I'm not that sort of
man. I'd want my wife to talk respectably, jist the
same as if she lived in a big city like Orleans; for
if a man's poor as Job's turkey to-day, it's no reason
he should be poor to-morrow. In this country, a man
may git rich in double quick time, if he's only
constant
and sober to his business; and if the Lord
spares me, Mr. Vernon, I'm bent on making my
children men of substance and education. If I had
no learning myselfand, like most of our people,
seven months time would cover every hour of
schooling
I ever had,I know the good of learning, and
my children will have enough to do them good,
whether I live or die, if so be their mother's able to
give it them; and I'd sooner have my wife teaching
her children to read and write, than darning
stockings
,
or mending breeches, or doing any of that sort
of business, which a nigger girl can do that never
had any education at all.
It amused Vernon to hear his companion counting
his chickens with so much complacency, and making
his arrangements how to train them, even before
they were hatched. He smiled with an expression
of that humour upon his countenance which formed
no small portion of his character.
Of course, Mr. Rawlins, you have consulted
with Rachel on this subject; you have told her your
plans at length.
To be sure I have. Do you think I'd keep such
a matter from her? No, no, sir, as God's my judge
there ain't any thing in my bosom that I've kept
from her ears, since that moment when she said `yes'
to my asking. It was only last weekI go to see
her about once a week, Mr. Vernonit was only
last week I tried to get her to say, if she had a son,
which she would like best to have him, a lawyer or
a doctor; and it was a great worry to me to get her
to talk about the matter at all, and what she did say
was as much as to say, `have your own way about
it,' for it came to as little. Now, Mr. Vernon, I
know that there's nothing so troublesome in families
as a difference between man and wife about these
things, and I wanted to put the matter out of all
danger of dispute. It was strange to me that Rachel,
who can talk so well about most matters, and give
me so much good advice when I want it, shouldn't
be willing to tell me her real notions.
Perhaps she thought there was time enough a
year or two hence for the consideration of the
subject. You, on the other hand, I perceive, are for
taking time by the forelock. You prefer being quick
to being slow. She, too, might have been thinking
of girl children, only; who, of course, can neither be
doctors nor lawyers.
Well, that's true, there may be something in
that, Mr. Vernon, but then, again, you know it's an
equal chance that we should have boys as well as
girls. I was going to tell her that, but she broke off
suddenly, because she thought she heard the old man
calling her from the house.
The unsophisticated lover impressed Vernon
favourably as regarded both himself and mistress,
by the naturalness with which he detailed his own
secret thoughts and desires, and the manners of the
damsel. That Rachel was more thoughtful than
her lover, and quite as good a tactician, he had no
sort of doubt from the chapter of developements
which had been made by the former. How long
Rawlins would have gone on in a narrative which
was too pleasing to his heart and fancies to suffer
the obtrusion of other thoughts and objects on his
mind, it would be difficult to say. He was checked
by an abrupt inquiry of Vernon, and brought back
to the more earthly objects of humanity, with some
slowness and a little reluctance.
Hear you those dogs? there are several beagles
do you hunt much in this neighbourhood, Mr.
Rawlins?
Beagles! I don't hear any, Mr. Vernon.
I have heard them for the last twenty minutes,
but the truth is, Mr. Rawlins, when a man's in love
he hears nothing and sees little that does not concern
his mistress. This is your condition. For the last
half hour we have talked of nothing else, and you
have heard nothing that did not call for an answer
about her. Now I have heard the baying of these
beagles beside and before us, as if scattered, and
crossing on false scents. Who keeps a pack about
here?
A pack of beagles! I don't think there's such a
thing in the county, Mr. Vernon. There's one or
two here and there in different placesthere's some
two or three I know of, but no more. John Herne
he's something of a hunter, and has several dogs,
but only one hound, and that's but a poor affair,
Macartney, the Scotchman, that lives on the edge
of Atala, he has one, but he don't hunt. Ned Mabry,
the chap that would have mauled you this morning,
if you had let him, he has two, and both of them
fine pups, but he's not the man to think of deer
hunting to-day. Besides him, I can't call to mind
another man in our neighbourhood that keeps a
beagle.
That is strange, for I have certainly heard
several at different points of the compass within this
hour. Hark! hear you not now?
Yes, that's a beagle, but it sounds mighty faint,
and may be, after all, from a tongue that you never
hear close, and the dog that owns it ain't so easy to
be seen. You know there's a story in these parts of
a ghost-dog that haunts the woods about the Big
Black; they call him the white dog of Chitta-Loosa,
and old folks tell strange things about him, how he
let his master be murdered, and now has nothing to
do but to run through the woods constantly looking
after him. He is said to keep in the swamp of the
Big Black, and you hear him always just as evening
is coming on, as if he was calling to his master, and
was making moan that another night was near at
hand, and he hadn't yet found him. There's a-many
sounds in these woods, and sights too, I've heard
them tell of, that you'll hear without knowing
where they come from, or who they belong to.
People about here don't mind them much now, since
they've got a little used to them; but when I first
came on the Big Black, it made my heart beat
mighty quick, I tell you, and made me clap long
spurs to my horse, to hear them; and even now, I
catch myself saying my prayers, without knowing
when I begin, to find myself belated on the edge of
the swamp, nobody with me, and on a sudden hear
a whisper close at my elbow, and may be a laugh
and a clapping of the hands behind me.
But why should you think this any thing more
than ordinary. This whispering, and laughing, and
clapping,nay, this baying of dogs,may all be the
work of men.
No men, no men, Mr. Vernon!I'm a man
myself, and can answer that. I'm a stout man,
sound in wind and limb, six feet in stocking foot, and
able to swing a cotton bag, and that's a-much for
any body to do. Besides, I'm not afraid of any
fellow that ever I saw yet, that had no better help
than flesh and blood, broad shoulders, and solid
muscle, can give him; and when I've turned and
challenged them that made these noises, and put into
the swamps after themand I've a keen nose, and
a quick eye among the bushes, Mr. Vernonand
after all could find nothing to lay a finger on, why
then it was time to think of saying one's prayers,
and using one's spurs. Now, don't you go to think
from what I'm saying that I'm easily frightened with
ghosts and images. I'm frightened at nothing I can
see and feel; but when a body can neither see nor
feelwhen eyes and hands fail, what's to be done?
Am I to stand then, waiting what's to come? No, no,
I'm clear for clean heels without waiting for orders.
I asked Rachel if it was right for me to run in such
cases, and she clearly agreed it was. Well, when
our counts come to the same ending, there's nothing
more to be said about it, and run's the word for me.
A ghost that I can see, or a man that I can feel, will
never make me stir my ankles faster than I choose;
but I don't think it's any shame to use one's trotters
when he can make no use of his other limbs.
Give your horse a light spur now, Mr. Rawlins,
said Vernon, gravely, and let us ride on a little
faster. These beagles seem to increase in number,
and I can distinguish the baying of no less than three
from several quarters. If there be so few in the
county as you assert, then are these noises the more
mysterious, and they must have some object. Now,
as I am one of those who will not easily believe in
your white dog of the Chitta-Loosa, or in the ghost
of a dog at all, I am persuaded that what we hear
are the voices of real flesh and blood beings, whether
of hounds or men. If they are voices of men, they
imitate well, and must have some leading object for
acquiring the practice; if they are those of beagles,
then may we get a glimpse of a close chase, and,
perhaps, join in a pursuit, which I am very fond of.
A pistol bullet may bring down a deer at a small
distance, and I have known a man get a shot near
enough to enable him to do business with a pistol. I
will have mine in readiness.
I will not fail you, Mr. Vernon, said the other,
in suppressed accents, and bringing his horse more
closely to the side of his companion. It's jist as
well to have your pistols ready, if we are to seek for
these hounds you speak of, for, to tell you a truth, it
has been for a long time my notion that there were
men at the bottom of some of these noises of dogs; not
that there are not other noises of the woods that could
never have been made by any manthat I'll swear
forand if you know'd half as much of our country
and the swamps as I do, you'd be for thinking like
myself. I could tell you of the strangest things
Not now! not now! exclaimed Vernon,
impatiently
,
but get your pistols out, my good fellow; it
may be a word and a blow with us. I hear one
sound responding to another, and the last did not
seem more than a couple of hundred yards distant,
in that thick branch. Let us ride apart, a rifle's
sight could cover us both.
Speaking thus, Vernon spurred his horse forward
VOL. I. 20
in a smart canter, while Rawlins, obeying his
suggestion
,
prepared his weapons, and followed him at
a horse's length behind. They had scarcely increased
their motion, when a sudden clamour reached their
ears in front; a hoarse summons, the voice of a man
in anger, mingled with lower tones, as if in
expostulation
.
These were followed by a shrieka repeated
shriek, and the accents of a womanof woman in
distress! This put a life into the limbs, and a fire into
the hearts of the two young men, which gave them
no time for reflection, and left them in no doubt as
to the course which they should take, and the duty
which lay before them.
Lord God! was the somewhat irreverent
exclamation
of Rawlins, Lord God! Mr. Vernon, if it
should be Rachel!
It is a woman, Mr. Rawlins!follow me close
if you be a man. This is no time to loiter.
You won't find me backward, by the powers!
I'm at you, and after you. There's no scare in Wat
Rawlins at the push. Lord help us! I'm afeard it's
Rachel. She loves to walk in the woods so, every
afternoon. Git up, you lazy bh, or I'll knife your
quarters!
The last speech, warm from the blood, and
breaking
out in defiance of all restraint, was addressed to
his horse, which, in his anger, it will be seen that he
made feminine. The animal, though fleet, and now
doing his best, yet lacked the speed of Vernon's, and
the distance, small at first, was increasing fast
between them. The fear that another should do for
the safety of his sweetheart that which he alone
aimed to accomplish, was wormwood to his spirit;
and his apostrophe to his steed was coupled with the
driving and constant application of the spur, until
the flanks of the generous animal soon grew red
under the infliction. The shrieks were renewed
fast, sharp, imploring,terminating, at length, in a
long, piercing scream, which grew feeble, at last,
as if from exhaustion; and when it closed, the
thrilling words of Vernon, as he looked behind, and
cried to Rawlins to follow, sent a creeping chill
of terror to the heart of the rustic.
Push, push, or we shall be too late!
I'm hereI'm close! This dd beast! I hope
it ain't Rachel! Get on, you bh!Every thing
stands in the way; the trees, and bushes, and I never
saw the creature so dull before. Get up, you
clod-hopping
bh, or I'll kill you, by all that's certain!
I've always told Rachel about walking out so far,
but she wouldn't mind me, and said there was no
danger; but I knew there was danger, and I said so.
But these womenthey won't mind any thing
they're so obstinate if they're a little smart; and so
dn the bh, she'll stop full short before long,
and want to take a roll in the road.
There was no good reason to justify this last
apprehension of the excited woodman. The animal
was covering ground with a rapidity which might
have done some credit to Turpin's mare. But a few
seconds had passed since the first alarm, and nothing
but the impatience and the special apprehensions
which had seized him on a sudden in regard to the
woman who was dearest to his heart, could have so
utterly confounded his consciousness and judgment
on all other subjects. To be passed and left behind
by the young lawyerthe citizenone of a class
for whom the forest-born of our country are very
apt to entertain a very wholesale contempt as
respects the exercise of all those qualities which
require personal strength and agility, and more
especially, in the management of a horsealso
added to his affliction, which, however, was not
destined to endure long. Vernon had already entered
upon the scene of action. The roads crosseda
large area was formed by the contact of the two
pathsand here the strife was in progress, and
hence the clamour. A single glance at the objects
before him, gave Vernon a correct notion of the
affair. A travelling carriage crossed the road, the
horses being checked and held by a man whose
muffled face, cap drawn over his eyes, coarse
garments, rude manner, not to speak of the pistol in
his grasp, at once declared him to be a ruffian and
an assailant. An old man, the proprietor of the
vehicle, whose white locks and bald head were
uncovered and exposed, lay on the ground beneath
the knee of another ruffian, while a third was busied
in rifling the carriage of its contents. Two females,
one a tall maiden of seventeen or thereabouts, the
other a child of twelve, were on their knees to the
villain who held the old man down, imploring,
seemingly, for mercy; the younger of the two,
clinging to the arm of the assailant, seeking with a
childish pertinacity, and in utter ignorance of any
danger to herself, to push him from his position.
The screams which had alarmed the travellers
arose from these; and they were continued by the
younger of the damsels long after the elder had
deemed itthe first alarm being overan idle mode
of remedying the misfortune, for the cure of which
she probably meditated other means. Perhaps there
were other apprehensions of womanhood more
dreadful
to the pure heart, which made her fearful to offend
the insolence of those to whom neither herself nor
parentfor such was the old man beneath the grasp
of the ruffiancould oppose any powers of defence.
Her efforts were those of prayer, expostulation and
entreaty, until the approach of Vernon, whom she
first beheld, suggested new hopes of rescue; and then
her screams were joined to those of her younger
sister, and gave a new impulse to the movements of
our hero and his companion, who followed close
upon his heels.
There was but little time for reflectionnone for
hesitation, and the mood and character of Vernon
were such as to require neither. To assail the
assailants, to rescue the victims, was an instinct that
sent him the nearest way to work; and coming, as
he did, somewhat suddenly upon the robbers, he was
able to effect that which, in a state of greater
preparation
on their part, it would have been fatal for
him even to attempt. Their own interest in the
prize, and the clamours of the young women, had
kept them from hearing the tread of the approaching
horsemen; and as they came into the cross-roads
from the opposite track, they were totally unseen
until within thirty yards of the party. It was then
too late to take any of those precautions by which
nothing would have been more easy than to have
shot them down at their approach, without risking
an exchange of bullets. As it was, a single bay of
the beagletheir accustomed signalwas the only
warning which the more busy robbers received
from the companion who held the horses, and who
occupied, with them and the carriage, the upper part
of the road. The ruffian who bestrid the prostrate
gentleman turned about at the signal, only to
receive the bullet of Vernon, unerringly aimed at
his head. He fell prostrate upon the body of the old
man, and his blood and brains covered his face and
garments. In the next moment, the robber in
possession
of the carriage fired at Vernon, and was about
to leap with a second pistol upon him, when the
appearance of Rawlins, who made his
entre
with a
shout which might have done credit to the lungs of
Stentor, determined the assailant to trust his heels
rather than his weapon; and without giving a look
20*
to his comrade, he darted into the opposite woods,
leaving the carriage between himself and his foes.
He who held the horses, kept his ground until
Rawlins
had approached him within a few paces, when,
lifting his weapon, with as deliberate an aim as the
circumstances of his position would allow, he fired,
but ineffectually, at the sturdy woodman. Could the
latter have seen the bitter, nay, venomous, expression
of face which the fellow gave him ere he shot, he
would have congratulated himself, indeed, that it
was not Rachel who had fallen into his hands.
Vernon was the first to pursue the escaping ruffians,
but he had scarcely entered the wood ere he felt
himself growing sick and faint; and then, for the
first time, he found himself wounded in the thigh. He
returned to the scene of action, and with difficulty
alighted from his horse. The old man and his
daughters, whom he had rescued, came about him
to acknowledge and thank him for his services; but
exhaustion, from loss of blood, now overcame him,
and he sunk to the ground with a dim consciousness
while he was falling, that the old man was the very
person
whom he soughtthe very William Maitland who
had defrauded the bank and involved Carter, to the
loss of so many thousands. But this impression soon
gave place to another, and it seemed to the swooning
youth that the features of the man were at once
absorbed
in those of a lovely virgin,such a vision as
had filled his dreaming fancy the night he slept at
the hovel of Mrs. Yarbers;a form of chiselled
symmetry
,
and a face, of the exquisite beauty of which,
the soul, alone, could feel the perfection and the
charm, in those vague and spiritual imaginings
which come to the youthful heart when it first
dreams of love,which come to it but once, and is
believed by it for ever.
CHAPTER XVI.
Why do you strive sowhither would you fly?
You cannot wrest yourself away from care,
You may from counsel; you may shift your place,
But not your person; and another clime
Makes you no other.
Fletcher
.
The
woodman, who had continued the pursuit of
the ruffians without being at all apprised of the
malicious
aim of one of them upon him, from which he
had been so fortunate as to escape, soon found his
efforts unavailing to overtake them. They had made
their way into a canebrake immediately contiguous,
in whose thick, fostering glooms and secret abodes,
they could easily defy and baffle the search of any
hundred men. Ignorant of the hurt of Vernon, whom
he had seen enter the forest in pursuit, like himself,
he shook his hand in anger at the sheltering
recesses
in which the robbers were lost from sight,
and returned towards the scene of action, with a
degree of composure, which seemed to regard the
fatigue of his horse as superior to all other
considerations
.
His astonishment and concern, when he
discovered
the insensible condition of his companion,
was worthy of a much longer acquaintance, and a
more social and equal relationship than had
existed
between them. A few moments sufficed to
convince him that his friend was not dead, nor,
perhaps
,
badly injured; and a few more enabled him to
kick the dead robber with a quiet conviction that he
could do no more hurt. The features of the ruffian
he inspected carefully; but if he had any knowledge
of them before, he kept the matter to himself, and
having emptied the pockets of all that they contained
of value, and possessed himself of the pistols with
which the fellow had been armed, but which the
true and prompt shot of Vernon had prevented him
from using, he left the carcass in the highway, with
probably some such motive as that of the woodman
when he kills a snakenamely, the start and
momentary
terror which such a spectacle will provoke
in the spectator. This business was the work of a
few moments only; and he now addressed himself
seriously to the task of assisting his wounded
companion
,
and directing the farther movements of the
party, all the members of which were labouring under
more or less excitement and apprehension. The
whole scene was over in a few minutes, but the full
pressure of its terrors and dangers had not passed
entirely away. The old gentleman who had been
rescued, was even then busy in cleansing his face
and bosom, as well as he might, from the blood and
brains of the slain robber which had spurted over
them. He was a fine-looking man, of very
venerable
aspect; but there was an incertitude in his
looks, and a tremulousness of limb in his
movements
,
which seemed to the mind of the woodman
strangely inconsistent with the fine, manly mould
in which nature had cast his frame. It was also
apparent to our forester that there was a fidgety
uneasiness
in his manner, which denoted apprehensions
no less active at the moment of his rescue and
seeming
safety, than when he lay under the weapon of
the robber. He spoke confusedly, yet not with
rapidity
;
checked and interrupted himself repeatedly;
caught up his speech before he had completed his
sentences; corrected, or strove to correct his
expression
;
and increased his confusion, as folks are very
apt to do, by anticipating it. His determination on
little matters seemed to undergo alteration quite as
often as his speech; and in all that he said and did,
he exhibited to the countryman, who was not entirely
obtuse, that purposeless, imbecile character, which
is conscious of much to be done, yet is capable of
nothing, and despairs even while it undertakes, and
falters before fatigue. Yet, so far as the ordinary
circumstances are involved which produce fear in
the minds of men, the stranger had shown himself
hardy enough. It is true, he did not offer resistance
to the robbers, though armed; but this arose as well
from the manner in which he had been surprised by
them, as from a proper conviction that he could not
hope to resist them with any chance of success; and
might, by doing so, have provoked their ill-treatment
of his daughters, for whose safety he had shown all
the solicitude of a father. He had not betrayed so
much alarm for his own safety, while actually
beneath
the body of his assailant, as he did now,
speaking
of the event to the sturdy woodman, by whose
assistance, in part, his rescue had been achieved.
Indeed, his timidity, uneasiness and downcast looks
while he spoke, surprised the latter quite as much as
they vexed him; and his words were spoken with the
view to reassuring the courage which he could not
but thinkand this too with some feelings of
contempt
,had
been quite too much cast down by the
strife through which it had just gone.
There's no sort of danger now, old gentleman,
while we're so strong around you. It won't be any
two robbers of the Chitta-Loosa that'll venture to
lay thumb and fingers on the nose of Wat Rawlins,
and he with his eyes open. So since you're safe
now, and don't seem to have lost any thing, take
your seat in your wagon, while I help Vernon
into the bottom of it. You must make some room
for him, young lady, and don't be frightened at a
little blood. It is good blood, and spilt in your own
behalf, so you may look on it with a sort of pleasure,
if you a'n't too faint-hearted,which I don't think
so much your case as that of the old gentleman.
He's mighty uneasy now, though for what there's
no telling. Why don't you mount, old gentleman,
and put yourself in readiness.
In some agitation, the stranger turned to his
daughter
,
and a brief conversation was carried on between
the two in whispers. The woodman remarked that
the fine eye of the maiden was kindled, her cheek
flushed, and he could hear her distinctly exclaim, at
the conclusion of a long and very earnest sentence,
do notdo not think of such a thing, dear father;
common humanity alone, were there no other
reasons
,
should require this; now it is the due,
gratitude
The rest of the words were lost to the
listener
,
who, at the same time, busied himself in binding
a handkerchief around the thigh of the youth in the
hope to arrest the bleeding. While thus engaged,
the traveller approached him, and asked how far
they might be at that moment from the first ferry.
The question surprised the woodman, who looked up
at the speaker with increased surprise. With a mind
so utterly unsophisticated as his own, he could
conceive
of no condition of things justifying the
reluctance
of the traveller to lend himself to the work of
succouring one to whom he owed so great a service.
His wonder, however, did not extend to the conduct
of the elder maiden. She had stooped to assist him
in his rude surgery, and had yielded the mantle from
her shoulder to help in binding up the hurts of his
patient. But his eye spoke to her father a different
language from that which his lips addressed to her.
To him he looked the surprise he felt, and something
more. Scorn was mingled with his wonder, and
anger rose no less upon his lips than upon his
countenance
.
The ferry! he exclaimed; the ferry! Why
what the diccans can you be after? A'n't there time
enough for that question to-morrow, or the next day,
or the day after, or any day for the next six months
to come? We can give you house-room, stranger,
as I told you before, and keep you in the dry, though
it rains rivers. There's old Billy Badger, that'll give
you something more than a suppera sermon with
itand be glad that you eat heartily, if you can hear
well. Come, old man, give us a lift, while we set
the lad in your wagon. He won't oncommode the
ladies much, and if so be he does, it was all their own
fault and yours, to git into difficulties, and he's hurt
in gitting you out of them. Give us a lift, and look
better pleased, and by gimini, I'll forget how little
minded you seem to holp the man that holped you.
Do my father no injustice, interposed the elder
maiden; he is not indifferent to the fate of your
friendof our friend,and will do what you require,
and all that he can, for his succour and relief. Do
not suppose, even had you not been nigh to urge it,
that we should have needed any persuasion to move
us to so necessary an act of duty. No, sir,
believe
me, had there been no better strength than that
of my own feeble frame, that should have been given
for his service, and though I sank beneath the
burden
,
I should, at least, have done my utmost to find
succour for one who has been of the greatest succour
to us.
I believe you, my dear young lady, I believe
you; there's no mistake in your face; by the
powers! I believe you jist as much as if your words
had come from the lips of Rachel herself; but the
old gentleman, why don't he spunk up, and lend a
hand?
The keen eye of the woodman was fixed upon the
traveller as he spoke these words. The latter
became
still more confused at the apostrophe; his
glance sank to the ground, and he faltered out
some only half-intelligible accents, about the
necessity
he was under of pursuing his journey, and the
inconveniences which would arise to him, of any
unexpected
delay; and here he turned to his daughter,
and proceeded to repeat what he had said to the
woodman, touching the exigencies of his situation.
The blunt language of Rawlins anticipated the
maiden, and prevented her replying to a speech,
which, though partially intelligible only, seemed
greatly to distress her.
By the powers! old gentleman, to my thinking
you have been saying any thing but the right thing.
What are you talking about your journey for at this
time, when here's the man that saved your throats,
and your money, and may be, God only knows,
saved this handsome young lady, that's your own
daughter, from something worse than all. Here he
is, I say, lying on the ground, knocked over in
holping
you out of the hobble, and wanting help himself
now, to get him to a soft bed, and a quiet place to
get well in. If it hadn't a-been for him, who knows
what might have happened? It's true I was close
behind, but my nag's not the creature that he rides.
I'd ha' done as much for you as I could, but then he
did it, and made no promises; so fall to, and give me
a shoulder here, while I lift the lad into your wagon.
The ladies can sit on one side, and we can lay him
in the bottom; he's swoonded, and won't know any
thing about it, and it's only two miles we've got to
go.
Two miles! exclaimed the traveller, is it only
two miles to the ferry?
Ferry! Why, what do you want with the ferry?
demanded Rawlins.
I must cross the ferry to-night, returned the
other.
You can'tyou shan't! by all the powers you
shan't! You shall carry the lad in your wagon to
Billy Badger's, which is only two miles off, and it
will be quite dark by the time we git there, for
you'll have to go slow on account of the lad's
hurts. After that, if you are so cursed
hard-hearted
,
old gentleman, as to set off without waiting
to know how the man is that resked his life to save
yours and your daughter's, not to say nothing
about your cash, which must be pretty considerable,
to bring these robbers about you
You mistake, you mistake, my friend, was the
hasty interruption of the traveller, I have but little
money with meprecious littlenothing to speak
of.
Tell that to the chickensthe old fowls won't
believe you. But that's neither here nor there. As
for your crossing the ferry this night, that's
impossible
.
Where would you have been, or what, let me
ask you, would you have had to cross with, if the
lad hadn't put in to save you? If you don't choose
to do the thing willingly, by the powers, I'll do it for
you. I'll take possession of your carry-all, and fix
the thing to my own liking.
Oh, my father, why will you resist?why
oppose any longer? was the pleading inquiry of the
elder maiden, whose own solicitations, though before
chiefly whispered, as if in deference to her father's
years and feelings, were as warm in expression, and
as humane in their purport, as were those of the
VOL. I. 21
more abrupt and sturdy woodman. The gentleman
says rightly, continued the maiden, we have all
been saved by the valour of his companion, and we
must see him carried safely to his dwelling. Nay,
more, we cannot leave him till he is out of danger.
Virginia, my child, what is it that you say?
You know not my reasonsmy necessity, was the
bewildered response of the father.
Nothing, my father, but absolute danger can
justify inhumanity. She laid down this just
principle
with due solemnity.
I am in danger, whispered the father in her
earfoes seekevils besetdangers follow me.
God forbid! say not so!your lifehow?
from what?from whom?speak to me, dear
father! Tell me allnow, now. Let me know
wherefore this journeywhy have you left your
homeour dear homein this strange and sudden
manner?
The anxiety of the maiden almost overturned her
caution. Her whispers became full and perfect
sounds at the close, and were silenced in much
agitation by the father, who pointed to Rawlins,
now approaching with the body of Vernon, which
he had lifted upon his massive shoulders, and was
bearing to the carriage. The groan of the father
was insuppressible.
Not now, my child, not now. We must submit
to this. Take your seat; Ellen will sit on the front
with me. The stranger speaks truly. It might have
been, but for the youth's coming, that we had lost that
which is of more value than life.
The parties were soon seated, and the cushions of
the vehicle were made to support, in tolerable ease,
the form of the wounded man, from whom an
occasional
escaping groan announced the lingering
presence of life within him. Having effected all the
arrangements, to his own satisfaction at least,
Rawlins
took charge of Vernon's horse, which he led;
and congratulating the old man upon his
slowly-recovered
humanity, he proceeded to guide him to the
dwelling which he had assigned for their temporary
lodging-house, leaving the dead robber to the
possible
care of his comrades.
By the powers! old gentleman, said he, with an
air of great tolerance, as he rode up beside the
vehicle, and looked in upon the face of his
companion
,
it was only because of the young ladies
that I let you off so easily. When you wanted to
back out, and leave the lad in his blood, when he
had just done getting you out of a mighty ugly
scrape, I had it in mind to make you walk your own
trotters, and take the wagon to myself all together;
for, you see, it would have been mighty shameful in
you to go off in safety, not asking and not caring
what became of him that helped you. If you had
seen him ride as I did, when he heard the screams
of the ladies, and seen his face when he spoke, and
heard his words when he cried to me that was riding
close behind him, `a woman's voice, Rawlins!'
Rawlins is my name, siryou would say to yourself,
`by the powers! this is the very sort of man to wrap
up in your heart, and to love,' and I love him,
stranger, by the powers!I love the lad for what
I've seen him do to-day, jist the same as if I know'd
him for a hundred years, though I never set eyes on
him afore to-day.
He is a stranger, then, in this neighbourhood?
was the inquiry of the old gentleman.
A traveller, like yourself; he comes from below
I reckon from some of the old states, for he's got
a sight of larning, knows every thing, and talks jist
like a book.
The eyes of the elder maiden were fixed for
awhile with increasing interest upon the pale
countenance
of the wounded man, and she now remarked
the finely formed and expressive featuresexpressive
even while overspread by a pallor such as that of
deaththe softness and fineness of his skin, the small,
sweet mouth, and the flowing locks of hair which
escaped in small, single ringlets from the confining
cap which he wore, but which had been displaced
by the motion of the carriage. The instincts of
women are no less busy and prompt than those of
men, else why should the maiden blush when she
beheld the eyes of the woodman suddenly cast
upon her, as she scanned the features of his
unconscious
companion? She had, with equal suddenness,
arrived at the conviction that the face of the
stranger youth was one of the most noble she had
ever seen, and distinguished by that delicacy of
feature and expression which are conjectured to
denote equally aristocratic birth and natural genius.
This conviction was, perhaps, strengthened by the
few words which Rawlins had spoken, and which
represented the youth as a traveller like themselves.
Imagination soon busied itself to discover his objects,
his pursuits, family, and mental resources; and even
when the searching glance of the woodman
compelled
her to avert her eyes to the opposite side of
the carriage from the wounded man, the subject
was too interesting to suffer her to forego its
consideration
,
which employed her young thoughts and
virgin fancies in a manner which did not please the
less because they lacked all means for arriving at
any conclusion. The carriage reached Zion's Hill
the name which the strongly assured Methodist had
conferred upon his habitationand yet Virginia
Wilsonfor Wilson was the name given by her
father, as his own, in reply to the demand of Rawlins
with a tenacity which is probably rational enough
among young ladies in all such cases, had not yet
exhausted her subject.
CHAPTER XVII.
Wolsey
.  Sir,
For holy offices I have a time; a time
To think upon the part of business which
I bear i' the state.
King Henry
VIII.
The
party was received very cordially, though
with great solemnity, by the sober Methodist. He
descended from his steps to the carriage; freely
welcomed the proprietor; commanded all care for
the wounded man; bade his servants in attendance;
had refreshments served, and though, in these
respects
,
exhibiting the essentials of a most solid and
earnest hospitality, he never yet unbent a muscle of
his hard countenance, nor modulated to softness the
harsh accents of a voice, stern, cold, slow, emphatic,
and measuredly monotonous. He listened to the
unusual
narrative of their escape, with the same
composure
as he would have heard the complaints of his
niece, Rachel, who had pricked her finger with a
needle; and his congratulations to the party on their
escape, were uttered with very much like the manner
which he employed when saying grace before the
morning meal. A matter-of-fact face received every
circumstance, and requited all the wonders which
he heard; and nothing in the world could be more
mortifying to the enthusiastic temperament, than the
repulsive and chilling expression of a countenance
21*
that seemed to be set on high, as a sort of moral
scarecrow, to rebuke the intrusive passions; the
fervid
temperament; the glowing and impatient zeal,
that burns, and swells, and bounds, and is never so
angry as when it encounters the high fences which
prudence sets up to restrain its roving and incursive
propensities. William Badger had no sympathy with
the enthusiasm that dilates readily at every impulse.
His enthusiasm was all religious; his zeal, deep,
earnest
,
and perpetually glowing, was restrained by that
decorum alone, which is the fruit of intense
veneration
.
To speak fast, seemed to his mind to indulge
in levity; to utter promptly his feelings, might be to
do injustice to his own judgment, to the governing
providence of God, or to the rights and interests of
others. It may be added, that, with a temperament
sanguine in the extreme; a mind free, full and
active
;
an intense self-esteem, and that disposition to
sway which is, perhaps, a natural attribute of such a
character, his impetuosity of disposition was simply
methodized and more completely systematized and
made equal from the external restraints put upon it.
I have seen him in a roaring passion, said
Rawlins
to his companion, when he didn't know what
he said or did, and swore like a Massissippi
boatman
;
and yet one word came out after another jist
as slowly as if he was making his morning prayer.
He's a most strange man, that same Billy Badger;
but he means always to do right, even when he's
most wrong; and if you'll let him alone, when he's
most wrong, he'll come right after a season; but I
do think he'd not suffer the angel Gabriel to set him
right, or show him that he was wrong, one minute
before he was willing to see it for himself.
The first care of all parties was to see into the
condition and render assistance to the wounded man.
He was conveyed into a quiet chamber, and Badger
himself attended chiefly to his hurts. An inspection
of them showed him to have been wounded by two
balls, both of which had fortunately struck fleshy
parts of the thigh, and the swooning had been
occasioned
by the loss of blood, and not in consequence
of any serious causes of exhaustion. When the
venerable
elder had satisfied himself of these facts, he
made very light, in his solemn manner, of the
danger
,
and assured the anxious Rawlins that the youth
would scarcely feel his hurts in a day or two. The
balls not having lodged, but, having cut the flesh in
two parallel spots, some two inches apart, it was
easy to dress the wounds, which had already ceased
to pour forth those free streams which, at first, had
threatened to exhaust the fountains of life within him,
and might have done so, but for the timely
bandaging
that Rawlins had made both below and above
the places which were hurt. Badger, who asked no
counsel of those around him, administered a sleeping
draught to the patient, which silenced the groans,
at moments escaping feebly from his lips, and set
him to sleep so soundly that there was but little
prospect,according to the woodman,of his
hearing
any of the long sermon that night. To do Mr.
Wilson all manner of justice, we may say, that he
showed no lack of interest in the situation of the
young man. He watched beside him until Badger
had declared his perfect conviction of his safety, and
then left him only to quiet the becoming anxiety of
another, whose solicitude in his fate, which might
have seemed improper under other circumstances,
found its sufficient justification in her gratitude.
Virginia
Wilson felt a strange beating at her heart, and
trembled with a new sentiment of pleasure, as she
listened to these tidings. Was there any thing
singular
in the fact that she retired that instant to the
chamber which had been assigned herself and younger
sister, and shed in secret those tears which it might
have puzzled her to explain why she shed at all. Yet
such was the case, and those tears, it may be added,
were no less sweetly strange to her own heart, than
they would have been surprising to any other not
perfectly conscious of their source.
Meanwhile, Mr. Wilson and our friend Rawlins
were compelled to undergo the protracted
examination
of the Methodist, on the subject of the late
adventure
;
the circumstances of which seemed to
awaken in him no less curiosity than concern.
Evil is abroad in the world, he said, beginning
to sermonize at the conclusion of his examination;
there is no place altogether secure from the
dominion
of Satan; but that here, so nigh unto Zion,
where I have, for the space of two blessed years,
striven to uphold the work and the worship of our
heavenly father; that sin should so boldly demean
herself, seems to be as passing strange, as it is sad.
But, marvel ye not, Walter Rawlins, at what I am
about to say to you; and regard it not as
unbecoming
in one who preaches peace on earth and
goodwill
to all men, if I declare to you that we must all
arise, and put on the armour of strife, yea, the very
armour of man, and gird upon our thighs the carnal
weapons of human wrath. The traveller must not
be stricken down upon the highway without
summons
of eternity, without warning to prepare for
death in season. We must go forth in seeking for
these bloody men; we must put them to defiance,
and as they have not hearkened to our words of
prayer and peace, neither have they given heed to
the forbearance of our own example, then must we
use against them the same weapons which they are
so ready to use against the wayfaring man, and we
must smite them hip and thigh to their utter undoing.
If they will not hearken to the imploring angel; if
they will not heed the promise of the forgiving angel;
nor incline their hearts to the prayers of the
righteous
,
God will commission the destroying angel,
even as he hath commissioned him against the
Amalekite
and the Assyrian of old, until there be none
left to tell the story of their undeserving, and their
heaped-up bones alone shall remain to declare their
sudden punishment, in warning to the other tribes of
evildoers which shall follow them. Truly, it grieves
me, that here, within sight of the Hill of Zion, which
I had thought to set apart as a spot where evil should
not have foothold or countenance, such deeds should
be done as shall make the traveller tremble to
approach
,
even when he comes on the sabbath, seeking
crumbs of comfort from the Lord. My heart is full
of shame within me, that I should have fought the
good fight with so feeble an arm, and should have
gone into the battle with a spirit waxing faint in the
hour when there is most need of performance. Here,
Mr. Wilson, with the Lord's favour, did I pitch my
tent, at a time when the land around me was in
possession
of the heathen, though even then decreed for
the heritage of the believing. Well may I declare
that it was like unto a desert, where the dews of
heavenly bounty never fell, or if they fell, which were
drunk up without profit to earth or heaven by the
thirsty, but unimproving lands. Since that time, the
heathen hath sunk away from the broad possession of
the land, and hath given place to a people, which, if
they be not yet holy, were yet better favoured of
God with the true lights of righteousness. Many, I
am glad to declare, have had the fountains of life to
spring up within their hearts, with a streaming which
shall never fail; but as thou seest, there are many
still who grope in the ways of darkness, and fight
under the banners of the mighty sinner who first
made all to sin. These robbers who have assailed,
with design, perchance, to slay
The harangue which, temperately begun, promised
to be of interminable dimensions, was here cut short
by the interruption of one who had entered without
being seen by the elder. This was his own son,
Gideon, a youth of twenty years or thereabouts,
whom Rawlins had already described as a sly
fellow
,
having something wrong about him, and one
whom he did not like. The youth was a
proper-looking
youth enough; but his keen, quick eye, the lively
play of temper about his mouth, the sudden
transition
of expression in his glance, his studious methodism
in garb and accent, so much at variance with the
natural
characteristics of his countenance and manner,
would have impressed a close spectator with a
conviction
of the perfect felicity of Rawlins' brief, but
comprehensive
description. He sat demurely in the seat
which he had taken at entrance, immediately behind
his father; his hands were clasped upon his knees,
his legs drawn up, and half inclined beneath his
chair, his eyes cast down upon the floor even while
he spoke. His interruption arose quite as much, if
the truth was known, from his impatience at a sort
of exhortation, in which, whatever might be the case
with the traveller, his experienced ears found little
of novelty; and though, in what he said, he fancied
he should gratify the
amour propre
of the veteran
religionist
,
his aim was, perhaps, simply to suppress a
discourse, of which the reader has probably had quite
as much as himself, and may thank him for the
interruption
.
It may be, sir, that you are doing some injustice
to your own labours, and to the character of the
goodly neighbourhood in which we live. I am of
the opinion, sir, that these robbers must be strangers
in these parts, the outcasts from other states and
cities, men of desperate hope and fortune, who rove
the country like raging lions seeking whom they
shall devour, and none of whom have ever hearkened
to your voice, or to the wholesome preaching of any
of God's servants. I cannot think that any of those
whom we are accustomed to behold at Zion's Hill,
hearkening to the word, will ever be found in the
evil ways of these wretched robbers.
The lurking tribute to the old man's vanity which
was contained in this speech, did not do away with
the impertinence of the interruption. The father,
slowly and without a word, when he first heard the
voice of the son, wheeled his chair about so that he
might face the speaker. He heard him patiently to
the end, and then answered him in grave, stern
accents.
And what know you, Gideon Badger, of the
hearts of men, even though they be neighbours unto
Zion's Hill? And what know you of these robbers,
of whom you speak so readily, that you should
venture to hopeay, sir, I say, to hopethat all or
even any of those who hearken to God's word in
this place, are free from the damnable leprosy of
sin? There is a great presumption in thy thoughts,
Gideon Badger, which should be chastened by
prayer
,
by the prayer of an anguished spirit, that knows
its own presumption, and can find no check to
chasten
it but that which is the free gift of God himself.
When thou speakest so freely of the goodness of thy
neighbours, I greatly fear thou speakest a vain thing.
There are many among them, whom I fear lack
overmuch the becoming humility of God's servants,
and need the visitation of the Saviour in their secret
places, before they will hold up clean hands and pure
hearts in the sight of their heavenly Maker. Nay,
more, Gideon Badger, it is thy practice to seek and
commune with some of those of whom but little that
is good may be spoken. There is that idle man who
lives by taking the innocent fish that swim to and
fro in the Chitta-Loosa, which, though it bears a name
of the heathen, is yet no less a river of the Lord
he whom they call Weston, whose blacksmith craft
were of great profit to him would he pursue it, is
another of whom it were well if thou hadst less
knowledge
Here the old man experienced another
interruption
,
but this time from no less a person than our
friend Rawlins.
He will have no more knowledge of Weston,
said the woodman, than he has already, and that I
can give you now, since Weston was the very man
who was shot down by Mr. Vernon:he sat on the
top of the old gentleman, there, Mr. Wilson, with
pistol out, and another loaded in his breast, when
Vernon tumbled him. Here are the pistols which I
took from him, here's his knife, and these nick-nacks
also came out of his pocket. His carcass lies in the
cross-roads at this moment, where any body who
wants, can have it for the carriage.
This revelation startled the Methodist out of
something
of his equanimity. He half rose from his seat
while Rawlins spoke, but instantly resuming it, as if
conscious of improper precipitancy of movement, he
sat quietly, without farther motion, until the tale was
finished; his eyes meanwhile wandering, with
obvious
anxiety in their glance, from the speaker to his
son, and from him again to the speaker. When the
latter had finished his statement, and thrown down
upon a table the arms and other articles which he
had taken from the slain robber, the old man spoke,
but his voice and manner had resumed all their
deliberateness.
Walter Rawlins, this is a dreadful tale which
thou tellest, and I tremble to hear it, as I cannot
doubt that thou tellest me the truth.
True as gospel, Mr. Badger, if eyes don't cheat
one in the business.
Make no irreverent comparisons, young man,
between such truth which thou tellest, on the
authority
of thy mortal sight, and that wondrous truth of
the gospel which comes of the sight of God. Thy
truth hath its use and its value, and I question it not,
but the truth of eternity is another thing from the truth
of time, and God strengthen the poor eyes that see
but the one, that they be not blinded with the outer
brightness and perfection of the other. Truly, I
make no doubt that thou hast seen this wretched
man, Weston, in the condition which thou
describest
,
though it is a sinful scorn of God's best work
on earth to leave the frame even of the wicked man
to rot above the earth, a prey to the carrion birds
and beasts who prowl by night for food. His burial
must be seen to, his proper burial; and we shall
commit him to his final resting-place, with a prayer
for mercy, though cut off in the very acting of his
miserable crime. Gideon Badger, Gideon Badger,
my son, give thanks to God this night that my timely
warning to thee against this man severed the
association
between ye, else it might have ripened into an
intimacy
with the same sins on thy part, and may have
been followed by a death to thee no less sudden than
it has been to him, a death without repentance and
without hope. Truly, thy tidings, Walter Rawlins,
are full of terror. This is an awful visitation. In
the midst of life we are in death. We know not the
hour, yet we must obey the summons, however
sudden
.
This miserable creaturewell that he hath no
parent to sorrow for his sudden smiting, and his
unatoned sins; he hath no hope of sympathy and
sorrow from usthe law of God and the law of
VOL. I. 22
man command us otherwise. We are called upon
to exult in the death of the evildoer, to rejoice in
the downfall of sin,but we must put the dead out
of our sight. Earth to earth, dust to dust; and it
differs not though the earth be that of the sinner.
We are all sinners, even when we are best;
redeemed
through grace and mercy, and not because of our
own righteousness. Let us go forth and put our
brother in sin into the grave, with a prayer for
mercy to him and to ourselves. Order you the
hands
together, Gideon Badger, and bid them provide
themselves
with torches. Let Timothy and Ephraim
bring pick and spade, that we may not waste
precious
time.
Gideon Badger went slowly to the performance
of this duty, and some time elapsed before the party
was in readiness. Leaving his guests in charge of
his niece, Rachel, of whom the garrulous Walter
Rawlins has permitted us to know something already,
Mr. Badger mounted his steed, a heavy,
English-built
animal, sturdy, and slow, and solemn, like
himself
,
and set forth with all the phlegmatic deliberation
of manner which distinguished the ancient puritan
going forth to battle. There were not wanting other
matters to strengthen this similitude. He carried a
pair of wide-mouthed iron horse-pistols at his
saddle-bow
,
a pair which he had borne with him into battle
when, in his younger days, he followed the banner
of Andrew Jackson, among the mounted men of
Coffee's brigade, and went down from Tennessee to
the fierce and close combats on the Tallapoosa.
Nor did he forget to take with him on this occasion
the knotted hickory, a massive club, almost of the
thickness of his wrist, which, as the supposed
characteristic
of a hero whom he regarded with a large
degree of veneration, he had made his own
inseparable
companion, not simply in times of danger, but
on all occasions.
And danger, said the old Methodist, defending
the propriety of this practice, is even like sin, a
thing of all occasions. The man of wisdom borrows
his lessons from the Christian, and goes armed and
ready at all times for the enemy. There is no telling
at what moment we may meet with him, nor in what
shape; whether he shall appear as the wild beast of
the wilderness, or as the wretched robber, seeking
for your substance. Therefore, I say to you, be ye
always ready.
He was attended by his son Gideon, and Walter
Rawlins, both equally well armed with himself, and
followed by some six or eight negro men, his entire
force
of males, some of them bearing
lightwood
torches, and the rest, the necessary implements for
breaking the mould, and preparing the place of
interment
.
They traversed the path in silence and
without interruption, but, to the astonishment of all,
the dead robber was no where to be found. The
traces of the conflict were numerousthe blood lay
in clotted masses on the sand and leaves; but neither
on the spot where he had been described as having
fallen, nor in the immediately contiguous bushes of
the forest, could they find traces of his mode of
disappearance
.
How know you that his wounds were
death-wounds
,
Walter Rawlins? demanded the Methodist.
May it not be that he hath feigned death while ye
were present, having no serious hurt, and hath stolen
away from the place of battle, the moment ye had
all gone from sight?
If he did, replied Rawlins with a hearty laugh,
he was able to do with less brains than any man I
ever heard tell of before. But there's no danger of
that; his skull was crunched by the bullet, and a
piece of it was wantingclean blown off,as large
as a table-spoon. Besides, I felt at his heart more
than once, while I was searching his pockets, for I
didn't want that a dead man even should open his
eyes and catch me stripping him. The beat was all
gone out of his breast, before I come up from
chasing
his brother rascals.
Verily, Walter, thou couldst not have chased
them to a great distance, for they have surely
returned
to his assistance, and it is by their help that
he hath been taken away.
Like enough, sir; but I did give 'em a chase,
and a mighty close one for the time I took about it.
I wasn't going to run 'em fifty miles, when dark was
coming on, and my company was waiting for me in
the open road. Besides there was little chance, if I
didn't tree 'em at the first jump, that I should find
'em, me one only, in a close thicket like that. That
canebrake would hide a hundred rascals from the
most honest nose among us all.
It needs not that we should speak longer in
this idle fashion: thou hast too great a vanity of thy
speech, Walter Rawlins. It is a sin in youth to
multiply
words, having neither experience nor thinking
to make them stable and of fitting effect. Thou
shouldst better prefer to hear the language of wisdom,
in the counsels of age. Years must pass over thee,
and thou must clothe thyself in holiest meditation,
even as with a shrouding garment, which shall wrap
thee in from all worldly shows and affinities, before
it will be thy right, or in any wise becoming in thee,
to speak freely in the presence of men, or confidently
among their counsels. I will speak more to thee
of this subject on the way homeward. Turn thy
horse, therefore, which improperly crosseth the path,
so that I may advance before thee. It is, perhaps,
well that we are not required to perform this awful
ceremony of committing dust to dust. Let the dead
bury the dead; these are the written words, which
truly signify that the wicked should take upon
themselves
the task of putting their fellow-sinners from
sight. Yet, young men, the ceremony of human
burial is not an unfitting spectacle for the young and
erring like yourselves, and had these wretched people
left to us the task of committing their slain comrade
to the earth, I should have striven to fill your minds
with the goodly workings of religious truth. Ye
should have had ample premonition of the fate of
wickedness, so that your hearts might have been
touched in season, and your souls warned with a
righteous fear, which should have moved you in all
haste to fly from the wrath which is to come. Nay,
there is yet time for this, and, God willing, young
men, this shall be the subject of our evening
exhortation
,
ere we seek our rest this night.
An audible groan burst from the lips of Gideon
Badger, which the father ascribed naturally enough
to the solemn and sad course of meditation which
his words had inspired in the breast of the youth.
The less rigid mind of Walter Rawlins referred it to
a more simple, and perhaps, equally natural cause
the terror which such a threat was always
calculated
to awaken in his own bosom, seemed quite
sufficient
to justify the audibly expressed tribulation of
Gideon. If he suspected the latter of a little hypocrisy,
he gave him credit, at least, for a certain degree of
sympathy with himself in the unfavourable estimate
which he had made of the elder's solemn outpourings,
the chief objection to which, in his mind, consisted
in the fact that they occupied time which could be
much more pleasantly disposed of, in communion
with one whose discourse, if less saintly, was far
more sweet, and whose periods were uttered with
less elaborate lips, and closed sometimes with far
more pleasant emphasis.
22*
But if the disappearance of this slain robber
relieves
us of one duty, Walter Rawlins, continued
the old man in a different strain of thought, it
seems to impress upon us the necessity of other
duties
,
no less painful, and perhaps, more full of trouble
and danger. It is clear that the companions of this
robber bear the name of legionthey are many,
since they attack the traveller in troops and
squadrons
they
are bold, since they attack him in the
broad daylight, and near unto the very foot of Zion's
hillnor, doth their boldness appear less remarkable
from the fact that they have scarcely been driven
from their prey, with the loss of one slain from their
number, before they return to the spot and carry him
away in safety. This conduct betokeneth the
insolence
of numbers. Doubtless, they came hither after
your departure with a force increased sufficiently to
enable them to avenge their loss. The madness of
wickedness would not stop even at the wanton and
useless repetition of their crime. All this calleth
loudly for exertion among the true peacemakers, the
righteous, and well-wishing among mankind, and for
the suppression of these evildoers, the neighbours
must be stirred up into activity and wrath.
Rumours
have reached me before this, of a gathering
of evil men along this heathen river; and now, when
it cometh so nearly to our own doors, it behoveth
me as a magistrate under an earthly ruler, no less
than as one commissioned by the Most High, to
search into this sin, with keen eyes and a sleepless
spirit. Of this we must have speech and counsel
to-morrow
,
giving our prayerful application to the Lord
Jesus ere we lie down to-night, that the right
wisdom
may fill our understandings, so that we fall upon
the fitting purpose, and take our way along the only
path. Bid the hands follow, Gideon Badgerthey
loiter idly with their torches, and their voices swell
into unruly sounds that are scarcely seemly in this
solemn hour.
They had scarcely gone from sight, when three
men, well armed, emerged from the edge of the
swamp thicket.
By the Dog Shadow of Loosa-Chitta, said one
whose voice announced no other person than our old
acquaintance, Saxon, Badger deals in no small shot;
he's a hundred pounder parson, and I shall owe him
large acknowledgments, when next I find it needful
to become ghostly and unctuous. That Gideon is a
precious rascal; he groaned most piteously, as if no
river could wash the salt savour and the true leaven
out of him. Yet you tell me he scampered off
rather fast, Burritt?
Ay, as fast as two slender shanks could carry a
small body and a frightened heart. We put him at
the easiest business, only to hold the horses, while
Weston grappled the old man, and I looked for the
cash. With the first sound of the enemy, he was
off.
And had this old man any cash?
I'm afraid not, or he hid it too snugly for us to
find it in a hurry. The watch was all I brought off,
and that I pulled from the daughter's side almost
without her knowing it.
Well, say nothing reproachfully of Gideon;
coward or not, he is of too much use to us, while his
father lives, to suffer us to complain of his little
deficiencies
.
The old man is no coward, that is clear,
and would go as heartily into a fight, as he goes into
a sermon. He would fight like a bull-dog. The
young fellow who gave Weston his quietusyou
are sure you shot him?
If aim was ever good, mine was upon his
breast-button
.
Well, it is, perhaps, quite as well that it is all
over. If he's dead, it's one out of the way that I
suspect would have been very troublesome to us; if
not, as old Badger would tell you, you have not the
heavier sin to answer for. But, dead or alive, it is
still important that we should see what papers he
carries; we must see what beagles are down in the
Governor's catalogue. Gideon may get these papers
without much risk, and when there's no danger, there
will be little fear. We must summon him to-night.
CHAPTER XVIII.
A fair, young, modest damsel I did meet;
She seemed to all a dove, when I passed by,
And I to all a raven.
Thomas Decker
.
That
night, Gideon Badger encountered Rachel
Morrison, his cousin, as she wandered forth into the
shady grove of forest trees, which were allowed to
remain at the clearing, and conducted from the house
into the garden. The youth had evidently placed
himself in waiting, as he sprang from the deep
shadow of an oak at her approach, and presented
himself before her. She started at sight of him, with
a feeling of mixed indignation and surprise. Her
form, rather inclining to be tall and masculine,
seemed to rise in majesty beyond its wont, the
moment
she recovered from her partial surprise, and
the tones of her voice, and the words she used, at
once indicated a condition of
quasi
warfare between
them.
Why will you still pursue, still oppress me in this
manner, Gideon Badger?
Why will you still seek to avoid me in this
manner
,
Rachel Morrison? was his reply.
If it be true that I seek to avoid you, you, as a
man, should scorn to pursue me. Your own pride
should preserve me from your persecution, even if
your sense of generosity failed you. Will you not
suffer me to pass?
No! not yetnot for a while. I would speak
further
,
with you, Rachel, and you must bear with my
persecutions a little longer, for a very good reason.
Let me know the reason, Gideon Badger, and if
it be a good one, rest assured that I will remain and
hear you without reluctance. Until then, you must
forgive me if I say, I hear you with little pleasure.
I doubt not that, Rachel, returned the young
man gloomily, there is another whose speech and
presence have ever given you more pleasure than
mine. It is reason enough why you should remain,
that you cannot so easily escape, and that I am
resolved that you shall hear me; and yet, I would
that you were more yielding to other reasons, which
are enough, not only to persuade you to stay and
hear, but to do so with pleasure and content.
I know not these, Gideon,I would that I did.
Heaven knows how willingly I should incline my
ears to the words of one so dear to my uncle as
yourself. But you well know what better reasons
I have for distrusting your speech and avoiding your
company.
By heavens, Rachel, but you do me wrong!
Because of one error,one crime, if it please you
so to call it,am I to forfeit all your regard, all
indulgence, all hope? You know that I have broken
off from all intimacy with the man Furst. From
that moment when you discovered our connexion,
and the offence of which we were guilty, I promised
you, and my promise has been kept rigidly.
And yet, Gideon, the fate of another of your
intimates alarms methis unhappy man, Weston.
Rachel, Rachel! can it be that you would couple
me with that robber? Can you suppose me lost to
all reason as well as to all religion? Can it be that
you hold me a confederate of this unhappy wretch,
when you know that I have not been seen with him
for months?
You have! was her stern and startling reply to
the warm and earnest asseverations of the youth,
given with all the seeming unaffectedness of truth.
You have been seen with him, Gideon, within three
weeks.
Ha! who says it?how know you?
Mother Kerrison saw you with him at the ferry,
three weeks ago.
Pshaw, Rachel, how anxious must you be to find
out faults in me, when you fall upon such idle tales
as these. For that matter, I have seen the man
almost weekly every month in the past year, but we
have had no intimacy, no communion together, we
have been in no wise associated.
Gideon, there again I must oppose the testimony
of a third person to your own. Who caught those
fish which you brought home with you last Saturday
was a week?
A bitter scowl passed over the countenance of the
youth as he replied
Truly, Rachel, you are in no lack of spies upon
my actions. I suppose it will be in vain to deny
that they were caught by Weston.
It will, indeed, be vain to deny it, Gideon, and
my good reasons for seeking to avoid you, arise from
your having done so already. Your father was
under the persuasion that you caught them by your
own hands.
I never told him so, said the young man
hastily.
No, but your words justified his belief that such
was the case, and he spoke of your success in fishing
to your own ears, and you did not seek to set him
right.
And I am successful in fishing, Rachel, and his
compliments were just enough; as for my statement
misleading him, I can only say that I never intended
it should. But you know, I see, that the fish were
brought from Weston.
I know that you got them from him, but I heard
that they were given to you.
Now, in the name of all that is precious in a
spy, what old woman could have told you this?
Mother Kerrison, again?
It was, indeed, no other.
That old hag ought to be carted through a
cane-brake
,
and drawn through the bog. The fish were
bought with money, Rachel Morrison, and I trust
there's no more harm in buying fish from a man
that turns out to be a rogue, than in buying them
from the best citizen in the county. That you hate
me, Rachel, is sufficiently clear from the collection
of authorities and arguments which you have got
together against me.
Gideon, God knows, and you ought to know,
that I have had, in the kindness of your father to the
poor orphan of his brother's wife, every reason to
make me try to love and to esteem you; and I know,
however little you may be disposed to believe it, how
much I have tried to love you. But you have not
suffered me to do this. Your own wilfulness, your
harshness,shall I say your cold, calculating
artfulness
of conduct in relation to your father, myself,
and others, but your father chieflyhave baffled the
desires of my heart. I cannot love, I cannot honour
younay, I cannot look on you without shrinking
and shudderingwhen I know how prone you have
shown yourself to speak the thing which is not, and
to do the thing which you are commanded by God
and man not to do. But if these reasons were not
wanting, Gideon, to make me desirous to shun you,
there were others, sufficient for my justification, in
your caprice and violence of temper. You have
striven to use me as your plaything; you have tried
to abuse my ignorance, to take advantage of me as
a child, and when you have failed in this, you have
railed at me in ruffianly terms, as if I, too, were a
ruffian. It were conclusive against your claim to
manliness, that you have pursued this course of
conduct, even while I have been in your father's
house, protected by his favour, and almost dependant
on his bounty. Be assured, Gideon Badger, that it
was in my necessity, only, that I have remained and
endured this treatment in silence. I could not have
done so, had the dwelling of any other relative been
open to my entrance, where I might have escaped
such persecution.
Ay, ay, Rachel Morrison, this is all very strong,
and very emphatic, said the youth, with mocking
bitterness; it is, as the old man, my venerable
father, would call it, a searching and soul-harrowing
discourse; but it may be that you have still left
unspoken
some of the grounds which induced your
hatred of Gideon Badger.
I hate you not, Gideon, said the maiden,
mournfully
.
Alas! it is my great sorrow that you will not
suffer me to love you.
Nay, nay, Rachel, these sounds do not delude
me. As I was saying, some of your reasons for
rating me so humblyso scornfully, should be the
wordwere unexpressed. You love another,
Rachel
Morrison, you love this swaggering fellow,
Rawlins; deny it if you can.
I seek not to deny it, Gideon.
It were in vain to do so. I have seen you
together
;
your heads and hands mingling, your forms
linked,ay, you may well shrink and blush while I
say it, Rachel Morrisonyour mutual lips glued to
VOL. I. 23
each other as if they were never more destined to
undergo separation.
The maiden did blush at the description of these
scenes of secret tenderness which she had fancied
utterly unseen by any eyes but those of heaven, and
which, in the purity of her heart and its emotions,
she had neither shame nor scruple that heaven should
behold; but when her accuser spoke of her blushes,
and counselled her to shame, her lofty spirit rose in
majesty, her heart swelled with the pride of
innocence
,
her form dilated in towering beauty, and she
retorted the insolence of the speaker with
well-deserved
scorn.
And if I blush, Gideon Badger, at these scenes,
it is not because they have been witnessed, but that
such as you should have witnessed them. You,
without sympathy for truth and virtue, would only
mock the sincere heart by your jest, or offend it by
your presence. A noble witness had gone from the
spot in silence, and in his secret soul had locked up
the remembrance of what his eyes had beheld
unwittingly
.
Certainly, he would never have laboured
as you have done, to make a woman regret that she
had yielded herself to those feelings which, while
they are pure in the sight of God, should be held no
less sacred in the sight of man. To Walter Rawlins
I am pledgedbetrothedit needs but the sanction
of religion to make us one. We are already one in
spirit and in truthwith God's blessing we shall
soon be one in law.
Never, never! cried the youth impetuously,
with choking accents, and the fierce gesticulation of
one threatening an enemy. Hear me, Rachel
Morrison, you shall never wed this man. One or
both of us shall first perish. I hate him now, as I
have ever hated him, but with a hatred that will no
longer brood and slumber over baffled hopes, and
ineffectual purposes. If you resolve as you declare,
then shall my equal resolution follow hard upon your
declaration. Be sure that no peace which I can
disturb shall dwell with youno hope that I can
banish shall warm your dwellingno happiness
follow your marriage with this man. Nay, there
shall be no security. I will pursue you to the
uttermost
ends of the earth, but I will wrest you from his
grasp; I will pursue him to the uttermost ends of the
earth, but I will paralyze his embrace; and, if I
cannot
triumph in love, at least I will do so in the exercise
of the most despotic hate. You know what I can do
you know my powers and my passions. Beware
how you drive me to desperationbeware how you
compel me to hate, when you know how heartily I
can love.
And know me also, replied the woman with
tremulous but measured and subdued accents, know,
Gideon Badger, that you can no more terrify Rachel
Morrison than you can terrify the man who is
pledged
to be her husband. In God is my trust, and with
a proper confidence in his power to save, I bid
defiance
to all your powers to wrong and to destroy.
He hath strengthened me to bear with many
afflictions
,
with poverty, with evil tongues,even with
dangers that might have stricken and destroyed
he will sustain me in flight, he will defend me
against the pursuer, even if earthly powers should
not avail for my protection. Yet, let me warn you,
Gideon Badger, against this evil resolution. A word
from me to Walter Rawlins, and his foot were upon
your neck the instant after it was spoken.
What! would you so soon threaten me with
your bully, Rachel Morrison?But I fear him not
Enough! she exclaimed, interrupting the farther
course of his insolent speechlet us part, Gideon.
You can say nothing more that can move me
now.
Nay, Rachel,you madden me. Why provoke
me thus when you know my passions?
Your passions shall never be my tyrants, Gideon
Badger; and you, who know so well how to conceal
them in the presence of your father, exhibit but a
poor sort of manliness when you refuse to restrain
them in the presence of a woman. Let us separate,
since it seems impossible for you to forbear language
which it gives me pain to hear. Let us separate,
but not in anger. I forgive you, Gideon; and if
there be one thing more productive than another of
sorrow in my heart, it is that you should so sinfully
and perversely cast your good mind and better
nature
beneath the trampling foot of passions which
first degrade and afterwards destroy. Why, Gideon,
why,son of my second fatherwhy will you
profligately
cast away the noblest gift of God, the noble
reason, and madden thus in a hopeless pursuit of that
which it is beyond your power to procure?
Be not certain of that! It is not beyond my
power, Rachel Morrisononce more I tell you, you
shall never wed this man.
What mean you? Twice, Gideon, have you
spoken in this strange, wild manner. Do you
threaten his life or mine? Can it be that you mean
to murder us?
Murder, indeed! he responded with a hollow
laugh. Who said that? Not I, Rachel, not I
your fancy is at work, and upon this slender stock you
will get up a pretty tale before morning. No! no!
I have no design to murder. I have no idea of
shedding blood; butha!
The bay of the beagle arose faintly from the
forest
,
swelled over the garden, and tremblingly fell
upon their ears through the umbrageous tree-tops
that sheltered them in their conference. A pause
ensued, broken by neither for an instant. He then
continued:
Enough for warning, Rachel,enough. You
will think upon it and be wise. You know it is the
wish of my father that you should be my wife, and
my own love should move you to yield willingly to
his wishes.
Your love, Gideon Badger! Speak of the love
of the storm for the flower which it rends in its rude
embrace;speak of the love of the ocean for the
poor bark which it swallows up;speak of any thing
which makes a sport, a victim, of the object which
it destroys, and you then speak of your love for me.
Your passions, not your love, are busy in all this. It
is they who would be my master, as they are your
own. But they never shall. I will convince you,
Gideon, though I weep for you with a sad sickness
of heart all the while, that when you are most
ungovernable
in your rage, I can be calm and unmoved
by your fury; when you are most angry, I shall be
least moved; and when, to others and to yourself, you
seem most fearful, then shall you behold the orphan
of your father's bounty most fearless and secure. I
praise God that he has given me a strength of soul
which enables me, whatever may be the terror and
the danger, to keep in the way which my heart tells
me is right. With this consciousness, you cannot
affright me, you can no more drive me from my
resolution
,
than you can persuade me from the truth.
You speak boldly, but you know me not. The
time will come when you shall know more. But not
yetnot now. Hark! I hear the whistle of your lover
he is summoning you to your old place of meeting.
Make the most of your time, Rachel Morrison, for,
23*
by the dim lights that will look down upon your
endearments
,
they are destined not to last.
In another instant the maiden, stunned and
oppressed
with painful emotions and troubling fears,
found herself utterly alone. Slowly she made her
way to the garden, where, in a little time, she was
joined by her lover. Gideon Badger, meanwhile,
leaping the little worm-fence that ran along the
lower
limits of the enclosure, was lost from view in the
forest, where his own voice, a moment after the
woods had enshrouded him, might have been heard
in responsive echoes to those mysterious bayings of
the beagle which had summoned him to a meeting
of his confederates.
CHAPTER XIX.
Gentlemen, have you provided me here half a dozen sufficient
men?
Shakspeare
.
With
the dawn of the day following, the
traveller
,
Wilson, with his two daughters, prepared to
resume
their journey. The impatience of this
gentleman
seemed to grow with each moment of delay,
and the protracted exhortations of the hospitable
Methodist, who proved no less liberal of his counsel
than he had shown himself of his meat, contributed
to heat his impatience into fever. Still, though
perhaps
rather from the promptings of his eldest
daughter
than the instigations of his own heart, he took
some pains to assure himself of the favourable
condition
of the young man who had been wounded in
succouring him; and did not resolve upon his
journey
,
or, at least, did not commence his visible
preparations
for it, until he learned from the sober report
of Badger, and the no less credible, but less solemn
statements of Rawlins, that Vernon's hurts were not
such as could detain him more than a day in his
chamber. This ascertained, he bade adieu to Zion's
Hill and his friendly entertainers, and by the time
the sun had fairly purpled the green tops of the
forest, he was speeding fast along the by-road which
conducted to Badger's, and which he had taken the
night before with so much unwillingness, and so little
grace. It was some hours after his departure,
before
Vernon awakened from the deep sleep into
which he had been thrown by the opiate which had
been given him the night before. Nor could he be
said to have awakened to perfect consciousness,
because
he awakened to the light. The stupifying
effect
of the laudanum benumbed his energies, and
seemed to confuse his faculties of thought and
observation
.
A sort of dreamy consciousness of what
had taken place, in which all things floated
incoherently
and indistinctly before his mental vision,
disturbed the certainty of his conceptions; and it was
only by the aid of Rawlins, who sat beside his couch
when his eyes opened, that he recovered the
knowledge
of the events which had taken place the
afternoon
before. The stiffness of his wounded limb, and
a trembling and slightly sore sensation about the
spots which were hurt, confirmed so much of the
particulars as related to his own interest in the
conflict
;
and, gradually he was reminded of other
circumstances
,
which it seemed to him no less important
that he should know. He had an indistinct
recollection
of a bright vision of beauty which had hung for
a few moments above his eyesa vision such as had
been vouchsafed him more than once before, in a
dream no less sweet and inspiriting, though scarcely
so distinct as that which had been more recent.
Then came the passing consciousness that had
possessed
him in the moment when he swooned away,
of his having found the person of the escaping
criminal
whom he sought on the part of his
benefactor
.
With this returning conviction, his faculties
grew more assured and industrious, and, cautiously
concealing his great interest in the issue of his
inquiry
,
he proceeded to examine his companion on
the subject of the party rescued. This examination
tended somewhat to confirm the impression which
he had received the evening before, that William
Maitland actually stood before him, in the person of
the man whom he had rescued; the description of
his person, as given him by Rawlins, strengthened
this belief. The mere difference of name was a
small and trivial obstacle, and one readily overcome
by a reference to the ease with which a name might
be changed, where the party was unknown; and the
obvious policy of one flying from justice, to effect
this change in order to avoid detection. The greater
objection to his conviction lay in the two daughters,
by whom Wilson was accompanied. The elder was
already a woman grown,the other, nearly in her
teens, and the description of Carter had led him to
expect mere children in the daughters of Maitland.
This difficulty, upon reflection, seemed, to the
sanguine
mind of Vernon, scarcely less trivial than that
of the name. Carter spoke of the children as he had
known them, and probably with some reference to
his own greater age; and as Vernon threw back
his thoughts to the period when Maitland practised
his treachery upon his friend, and married Ellen
Taylor, the probabilities gained strength, as he found
that, allowing them to have had children within a
reasonable
space of time after marriage, those children
might very well be sixteen or seventeen, the apparent
age of the eldest daughter of the traveller. But if
this conclusion gave him pleasure in one respect, as
it satisfied him that the means of retrieving the
fortunes
and the credit of his patron were almost in his
grasp, he, singularly enough, felt some reluctance to
pursue them, when he thought of the misery and
disgrace
which exposure of the father would bring upon
the lovely woman, his daughter, whose first glance
had so impressed itself upon his fancy. The matter
would have seemed easy enough to provide for the
children, as such, who, at the tender years of
childhood
,
could not well have been conscious of the
shame which would necessarily follow the detection
of the father. But the case became wonderfully
different
and difficult when the child was a woman
and such a woman,having, without doubt,
sensibilities
keen and quickening, such as are proper to
her sex; and a consciousness of shame corresponding
with that intelligence, which, without any other
knowledge than lay in his own endowing fancy, he
assumed, must belong to such lovely and speaking
features, as those which looked down upon him in
his moments of lapsing consciousness. How could
he pursue, without relenting, the father of such a
woman? how could he, as the stern minister of
justice
in
fact, the sheriff's agent, with a special power
to place fetters upon his limbshow could he drag that
old man, felon though he was, from the presence of
that daughter? He felt that she would rise between
him and his victimthe rebuking, the imploring, the
preserving angel;that her tears would be his
reproach
;
her sorrows, his sentence of condemnation;
and he felt, even then, that her hate to the oppressor
of her father, would be a something beyond his best
ability to bear. But when, on the other hand, he
thought of Carterhis patron, his only father,the
sterner commands of dutythe earnest voice of
soliciting
gratitudespoke another language to his
better judgment.
I must do my duty, he murmured to himself
as he strove feebly to rise from the couch; it must
be done. Rawlins, my good fellow, help me to put
myself in trim, for I feel very stiff and stupid. I
must get up: I must see this gentleman.
What gentleman? said Rawlins.
Mr. Wilson; the gentleman we helped
yesterday
.
Did you not tell me that he came with us
that he brought me here?
Ay, but he cleared out by sunrise this morning.
He was in a monstrous hurry to be off, and would
have gone before daylight, if 'twasn't for that angel
creature, his daughter. She told him mighty plain
that 'twouldn't do for them to go till they know'd
that you were safe.
Ha! Did she say that?
I heard her with my own ears, though she didn't
know I was nigh. I was coming in at the entry
door leading to the shed, and her back was to me
all the time. She said a good deal more which I
couldn't make out, but I understood enough to see
that she was blaming him for his hard-hearted way
of making thanks for the help he got from usnot
to speak of my help in the business, for it was mostly
yours. Yet she didn't leave me out, she spoke to
me herself about it, and told me how her father
owed every thing to us, and how I must tell you this
when you got better. Well, they waited, as she said
they must, till Billy Badger felt your pulse, and
looked at your faceand he looked long enough, and
felt long enough to have answered for all the sick
men in Massissippi. When he told them that you'd
do well enough without any more doctoring, I never
saw a girl more relieved. She didn't say any thing
then, but tied the bonnet on her sister, and went jist
as the old gentleman told her; but I saw a big drop
in her eyes as she was going, and her last words
were to me, remembering me to tell you what she
said, and how sorry she was that her father's
business
made him hurry away, so that he couldn't say
for himself how much they thanked you. She's a
most notable fine girl, I'm thinking, as ever I looked
upon.
Vernon derived a greater degree of gratification
from this detail of his companion, than the long,
rambling
sentences of Rawlins were usually apt to afford
him. But though he lingered over the narrative
with a silent pleasure, he did not forego his purpose
of rising from his couch of inactivity, and of
pursuing
the task which he had too deliberately and
resolutely
undertaken to forego without shame. The
rapid haste of Wilson tended to confirm him in the
belief that it was Maitland that he pursued; and
when he recollected the liberal and large extent of
the commission which had been entrusted to his
hands, the discretion which it empowered him to
exercise
in the case of the absconding criminal, and
the ease with which, under its indulgent privileges,
he might obtain his object without any public
exposure
of the victimnay, even without a revelation
of the crime to the innocent daughter of the
criminal
,he
found himself strengthened for the duty, and
eager once more for its resumption. But he rose
with some increase of pain. The limb which, in his
quiescent state, was tolerably easy, now throbbed
painfully with the weight and pressure of his frame
upon it, and having, with the assistance of his friend
Rawlins, reached the hall where the family was
assembled
,
he found himself compelled to appropriate
the calico-covered sofa to its whole extent, in the
hope to regain that position of quiet, which he had
found before in his couch. In this effort, and while
enjoying the returning ease which it brought him,
he was no doubt greatly strengthened and assisted
by the consoling review of his situation, and the
circumstances
attending it, which his ghostly landlord,
in his own measured manner, presented to his mind.
According to this venerable elder, his hurt was a
subject of self-congratulation, which should not be
suffered to escape his own commentary. He was
one of those, who, regarding evils as masked
benefits
,
looked upon Vernon as particularly fortunate
in the favour of Providence, and rated the extent of
his good by the degree of dissatisfaction and
impatience
which the victim displayed beneath it.
Having
exhausted all the proverbial forms of biblical and
mere moral expression on the subject, he proceeded
to a display of his own experience; and, if his
judgment
might have been regarded as equally valuable
with his faith, it would have appeared convincing
enough to his hearers, that he had never yet suffered
an affliction which had not in its ultimate consequences
been a real blessing, infinitely beyond any other,
which, in its absence, might have fallen to his lot.
His voluminous history, fortunately for Vernon, had
its own interest, apart from the savoury Christian
deductions which the narrator never failed to make
from all its leading details; and if the youth was not
greatly enlightened and strengthened in moral
respects
by what he heard, he was certainly edified,
amused, and sometimes excited, by adventures on
field and flood, in forest and prairie, in which, like
one half of the settlers of Mississippi, William
Badger had proved the possession of a manly soul
and strength, contending with savage beasts and
forests, and not unfrequently with more savage men.
But for these details, which gave action and vitality
to the old man's prosing, Vernon might have made
his retreat in utter desperation; but he bore it with
becoming fortitude, until relieved by more exciting
details, which put a stop to those of the Methodist,
and sent all parties to new subjects of cogitation and
remark.
The dinner hour had arrived, and the family had
already taken their places around the table; Rachel
presiding, opposite to the uncle; on one hand,
Rawlins
,
on the other, Gideon Badger, as demure, while
VOL. I. 24
in the presence of the father, as the most worthy of
the congregation. Vernon was indulged with a
small table beside the sofa on which he lay, upon
which was placed some thin soup and a few
well-boiled
fragments of chicken, such being thought the
least hurtful diet for an invalid. William Badger
had already commenced that interminable grace
before
meat, which Rawlins, after the fashion of his
own wit, had styled the dinner cooler, when a
bustle was heard at the door, as of one about to
enter, and the tones of a voice which Rawlins
immediately
recognised as that of Edward Mabry, the
youth, whose fight with, and pursuit of, young
Horsey
,
has already been recorded.
It's Edward Mabry, said Rawlins, looking up
from his plate as he perceived from the pause which
William Badger made in his grace that the
interruption
had reached his ears. But, as if resolved that
no intrusion ought to put a stop to the wholesome
preliminary service in which he was engaged, with
a devotedness which most persons of good appetite
would have preferred paying to the dinner itself, he
resumed his prayer just where it had been
arrested
:
Thy divine countenance, oh Lord Jesus
Christ, and sanctify to us the food which is now
before us and so he proceeded to the end without
farther notice of the events going on around him,
though, in the meanwhile, Edward Mabry, with more
haste than was consistent, either with the solemn
visage, rigid habits, or grave ceremony of the host,
rushed into the apartment. His audacity did not
venture to go farther when he found in what manner
the venerable elder was engaged; and standing
apart, with hat in hand, he waited, breathless and
impatient, until the grace, which seemed to expand
even beyond its ordinary limits, was brought to the
conclusion. The amen was scarcely uttered
before
the torrent burst its barriers.
Mr. Badger, Mr. Badger, said the young man,
I come for a warranttake up a villainenough
to hang himshall do it. Must grant a warrant,
and send Harvey out this very evening. Only sorry
I didn't come to you before. But it's not too late
never too late to hang a rascal, and a warrant this
evening will answera warrant to Harvey. I'm
ready to swear ag'in him any moment.
A warrant, Ned! exclaimed Rawlins.
A warrant! echoed Gideon Badger, with rather
more nervousness than the occasion seemed to call
for; and even the usually composed maiden, Rachel
Morrison, could not forbear the like exclamation.
A warrant!
Ay, a warrant!a warrant against John
Yarbers
,
Mr. Badger,he's a villain, a thief,he's the
man that helped to run Jo Watson's horse, and I can
prove that he put him in the hands of Bill Munson,
the fellow that got off last month from deputy
Nichols. I'm ready to take my affidavy to it.
The methodical lips of William Badger at length
parted. His face put on new terrors, his words
were stern, and the tone threatening.
Young man, he said, regarding the disfigured
visage of the intruder rather than the tale which he
told, young man, you have been fighting.
The youth muttered some hasty words, in which
honour,insolent fellow,had to fight, were
strangely jumbled up with other less significant
syllables
,
but the ascetic elder cut short the worthless
pretext in a fashion of his own.
Edward Mabry, have I not repeatedly
counselled
you against this brutal and blackguard
practice
?
Have I not repeatedly told you that I care
not to see you in my dwelling so long as you
cannot forbear the rending and gouging of your
neighbours?
I come about business, Mr. Badger, said the
other, sulkily, I come about business; I come to
you as a justice, I don't come as a visiter.
And I speak to you as a justice; and had I
caught you, sir, in the brutal act, I should, as a
justice
,
have had you taken and punished; though, to
be sure, you seem to have had something more than
your usual share of punishment already. God has
seen fit to send you a foe who could imprint on you
those marks which you are but too apt to put upon
the faces of others; upon faces, Edward Mabry,
made after God's own blessed image. It is his
image that you tear, and bruise, and gouge, with a
most miserable propensity to sin. But sit you down
why stand you in waiting when the meat is
sanctified
and ready? Sit you down and partake with
us, young man, though it grieves and sickens me to
behold you in this condition. Rachel, set a plate.
I'm not hungry, replied the youth, with no
abatement of his sullenness, for the reference which
Badger had made to the superiority of his enemy
had irritated an old soreI'm not hungry, I thank
God, Mr. Badger, since if I was, I could not sit
down at a man's table when he don't wish to see me
in his house.
There is hope of you, was the cool reply of the
Methodist, so long as you have the grace to thank
God for any thing. Sit you down, I say, whether
hungry or not, and wait on those who are. As a
magistrate, I will hear your statement, and take your
oath if need be, when we have dined; but I warn
you, Edward Mabry, that an oath is a serious and
solemn invocation; the Lord is spiritually present
when it is taken; it is an awful, and soul-binding,
and soul-responsible assurance. Beware, then, that
you swear not against your neighbour, unless with a
perfect certainty, so far as the blindness of human
sense and judgment may admit of certainty, that
what you say is the truth. But sit you down and
eat. Gideon Badger, help Edward Mabry to some
of the chicken which is before you. Eat, Walter
Rawlins.And so, Edward Mabry, you are certain
that it was Yarbers who run the horse?
Caught him a-doing it, sir. But that aint all;
there's another business more serious. I have a
strong notion I can prove he's been talking
insurrection
stuff among the niggers.
That is a dreadful crime, Edward Mabry, and
I could wish that you spoke not such suspicions
aloud, until you have strong proof of their truth. If
I remember rightly, it is now near a month since
Joseph Watson recovered the horse which had been
stolen.
Yes, sir, about a month.
Ah! and you knew the fact at the time. You
knew when the robbery was committed.
'Twas I caught Yarbers with the animal, making
tracks for Vicksburg.
And wherefore have you kept this thing hidden
so long, Edward Mabry? Why have you foreborne
to bring this evildoer to punishment before this?
And why is it, that, having suppressed the truth so
long, you now declare it in the unbecoming language
of human passion? Answer me these questions,
Edward Mabry, for something of my conduct will
depend upon the explanation which you may now
give of yours.
These were home questions, and the effort to
answer them only involved the speaker in all the
meshes of a seemingly inextricable confusion. It
was only by piecemeal, and after the most Socratic
24*
examination, that the keen, searching, old Methodist
obtained all the facts, and came to the conclusion,
that, but for a quarrel between the parties, the
horse-stealing
,
and other offences of John Yarbers, might
have been buried in utter oblivion, so far as the
testimony of Edward Mabry was concerned. In
brief, the party was soon apprised that Mabry,
whose attachment to Mary Stinson was, like most
attachments of country lovers, known to all the
neighbourhood, had, after fruitlessly pursuing the
actor to the river without overtaking him, returned
with a double feeling of wrath and mortification to
his own home. From thence he had gone, early the
next morning, to the house of Yarbers, and there
had pressed his claim, in the absence of the latter,
to the hand of his daughter-in-law. He had done
this quite as much in anger as in love, being resolved
to bring the matter to a close, as he found himself
unable to bear the continual anxiety and passionate
strifes to which his position exposed him: and he did
not, in fact, believe that he was entirely wanting in
attraction to the eyes of the damsel. But he made
his application at the worst possible moment. The
calculating mother and uncalculating daughter had
but too recently parted with the gay and attractive
actor, and he met with a flat rejection from both,
the terms of which, on the part of Mrs. Yarbers,
were uttered in a manner no ways
complimentary
to the pride and vanity of the suitor. Burning
with indignation, he rushed from the house, only
to encounter John Yarbers at the entrance. To him
he breathed, without stint or limit, the indignation
which he felt; and his rage was complete when the
husband simply and civilly confessed that he had no
power to alter the decision of his wife. Yarbers
was rather
nonchalant
in his treatment of Mabry,
for he had just before had the assurance of the
master-spirit
,
Saxon, that the thing should be settled in
such a manner as to save him harmless; but he
begged Mabry to wait awhile longer, and concluded
having a reference to some crude and
half-digested
plan of Saxonby recommending that Mabry
should contrive to get himself made colonel; a
vacancy
then existing in the regiment by the death of
the late celebrated Colonel Quillinan. To the raging
Mabry, this seemed little less than downright
mockery
;
and without farther exchange of words, he put
spurs to his horse, and took the road to the house of
the justice of Zion's Hill. The progress of the visiter
in this quarter, has so far been narrated. Taking
the magistrate apart, Walter Rawlins ventured to
excuse Mabry's suppression of the facts so long, by
taking upon himself a portion of the blame.
As the thing's out, now, Mr. Badger, though to
my thinking it had been better in for a while longer,
even though John Yarbers got quite off, why, I may
as well up and tell you, sir, that I advised Ned
Mabry
to keep the matter quiet.
And, pray, what may have been your reasons,
Walter Rawlins, for thus seeking to screen the
criminal from the hands of justice?
Only that the hands of justice might get a good
gripe when she tried for it, was the prompt reply
of the woodman. Then, proceeding with some
rapidity, as he saw that his farther treatment of the
figure was regarded with a grave countenance by
the Methodist, he went on to give certain reasons
and facts for the policy which he had pursued.
You must know, Mr. Badger, that there are
more persons than John Yarbers concerned in this
trade of horse-stealing, and it isn't the one mare of
Joe Watson that's been cleared out by 'em in my
time. We happen to know of many horses that's
been lost to their owners, that John Yarbers found a
claim in; and we sort o' concludedme, and Tom
Coleman, Jack Andrews, and Ned Mabry, here
that, as we knew all that any did know, and as that
wasn't enough to clinch any but John Yarbers, that
we'd say nothing for a while, and only keep a sharp
look out and be in readiness to find out the rest. We
all considered Yarbers to be a poor shoat, that only
did as others told him. We had suspicions of three
other men that took the horses after Yarbers had
run 'em to the river, and carried 'em on from hand
to hand, till they got 'em where they could sell 'em
without danger of being known; and we thought by
keeping quiet about Yarbers, and watching him
close, that we might get on a trail that would lead
us to the other rascals. Yarbers don't dream to this
day that any body but Ned Mabry knows about his
rascality. Ned caught him with the horse hobbled;
and his liking for Yarbers' wife's daughter made
him very willing to say nothing, till now, about the
dad. He told me only because we were so friendly,
and he knew I could keep a close mouth over any
secret.
You have done wrong; you should have brought
this man to justice. The law is the terror to
evil-doers
,
and they should be made to feel it. And who,
Walter Rawlins, are the men of whom you have
suspicions?
Well, Squire, I can't tell you that, seeing that
I've made a promise not to do so until there's a good
chance to clinch 'em, and we get good witnesses.
I'm sort of dubious it'll be a mighty tough business
whenever the time comes.
And what, Walter Rawlins, may be the reason
of this fear? said the magistrate, with increasing
severity of tone and solemnity of look, his
self-esteem
being grievously disturbed by the refusal of
the woodman to confide in him the extent of his
knowledge.
Because, Squire, we've good reasons for
thinking
these rascals are backed by a great number that
pass for honest men and good Christians; and up to
this time, Squire, we're at a loss to say which is
which among our acquaintance and those that put
on religion, and talk very good things at meeting.
Every now and then there's a robbery, now on this,
and now on the other side of the Big Black, but at
all times too mighty nigh us not to make it very
strange of the sort of folks that live about. There
was Dick Coby robbed of his watch and all he had,
coming from Benton a week ago, by two men in
disguise; and there was the beating that Harvey got
up by Doak's stand, about the same time, by other
men in disguise, while he was on his way to sarve
your warrant; then, again, this attack on the old
gentleman, Mr. Wilson, here, as I may say, in sight
of Zion's Hill;why, Squire, you can't shut your eyes
to the thing. It's clear as noonday that there's a
gang of rascals that stand by each other, and aint
afraid of the worst that can be done to them.
Besides
,
I'm somehow thinking, Squire, that there's
nothing you can do, or any magistrate, that they
won't get wind of, in a mighty short time after they
do it.
Rawlins did not confine himself to this brief array
of circumstances to establish the probability of the
faith that was in him. He proceeded to the detail of
other events, some of which were known to the
magistrate and others new; but the accumulation of
facts had the effect of convincing and startling the
Methodist, when, one by one, as they occurred, they
would have made little impression, and that of little
duration, upon his mind.
Verily, Walter Rawlins, thou hast shown me
these things in stronger lights than they have come
to me before. It is a shame and a discredit to me,
as a magistrate under the appointment of man, and
no less as a humble follower of Christ Jesus, that
these things should be suffered to go on around me.
It were well to get the young men together, and
bestir
ourselves in the examination of this swamp
which is beside us; for that, according to my thought
no less than thine, must be the place in which these
villains harbour. How many young men canst thou
muster at blowing of the horn?
Well, Squire, I reckon there may be ten or
thereabouts, returned the woodman, muttering their
names over to himself, and counting upon his fingers
as he spoke.
Ten!ten only! Why, Walter, either I lose my
arithmetic, or you have never yet found yours. By
what rule can you count? Instead of ten, there
may be twenty, nay, thirty, mustered by the horn
blowing.
Yes, Squire, but it aint by horn blowing that I
would bring together the men for such a business as
this. Some of the men that would come at horn
blowing would be more likely to help the rascals
than to hurt them; and if I could tell you some of
the suspicionable names that I know on, you'd look
green again.
I cannot say, Walter Rawlins, that I altogether
understand you when you speak of my looking green
again; but, at all events, I will look farther and
immediately
into this business. I will confer with this
young man, Vernon, who speaks sensibly on most
subjects, and he hath shown himself bold enough to
be a leader in any strife that may follow, and is
surely not to be suspected of any connexion with
these outlaws of whom you speak. If he will go forth
with us, it were something; for thou and thy ten
men would go but a little way to compass all the
points of the swamp, and beleaguer those who
harbour
therein. The canebrake were, alone, a
sufficient
protection. But let us seek these other youths.
We have already five in this dwelling, counting
myself
and Gideon Badger with the rest, and I trust in
God that when the hour of evil strife shall come,
there will be fifty rather than ten willing to gather
together for the good of the covenant.
CHAPTER XX.
We are not grown so proud
As to disdain familiar conference.
Massinger
.
Rawlins
was not altogether satisfied that the
Methodist
should take the business so completely out of
his hands, but he well knew that there was no hope
of successful resistance against the usurpation. The
self-esteem of William Badger was well sustained
by the firm rigidity of his character, and the perfect
unconsciousness of any thing like presumption in the
lead which he was resolved to take. The woodman
shrugged his shoulders, therefore, and said nothing;
congratulating himself that he had kept the suspected
names to himself, and inly determining to continue
his own plans, which, though less dignified and
imposing
than those of the senior, yet promised to be,
for that very reason, far more effective. He
followed
the squire into the
salle a manger
, where the
young men had been left, and where he found them
busily engaged in the discussion of sundry subjects,
all of which were necessarily made to give way to
that which was always the most important to
William
Badger,that, namely, which most interested
himself. The latter proceeded, as if from his own
knowledge and thought,for he made no sort of
reference to Rawlins in the progress of his narrative
to give the substance of what he had heard, to
describe
the evil condition of the neighbourhood, and
to expatiate upon the necessity of gathering the young
men together for the purpose of routing the
evil-doers
.
Vernon heard him with a degree of pleasure
and interest which he found it not so easy to
suppress
;
but he regarded the young Badger with eyes
of too much keenness and suspicion to suffer his real
sentiments to be known. Without hesitation, he
joined issue with the venerable elder, as well on the
propriety as the necessity of the course he proposed
to pursue; deliberately questioning the correctness
of the assumption, that there was any number of
men engaged in the outlawry which had troubled
the neighbourhood; and insisting upon the strong
probability
of all the detailed offences having been
committed
by the same two or three individuals who had
been conspicuous in each. Much of his argument
was founded upon the broad, patriotic text, that in a
country like ours, where the means of life are so
readily and universally to be obtained, it was morally
impossible that any numerous set of men could be
found, wilfully disregarding the laws, and making
themselves liable to their penalties. His views were
supported at large, and with much more earnestness,
by Gideon Badger, who took especial care to wind
up his notions of the subject, by an elaborate eulogy
upon the moral and religious influences which had
been exercised over the neighbourhood by the burning
and shining light fixed upon Zion's Hill. But neither
the well-tempered courtesy with which Vernon had
spoken, nor the closing and rather bald flattery of
Gideon's speech, saved them from the charge of
vaingloriousness and presumption from the
venerable
elder, who was never more full of Christian
texts than when he was following his own mind, and
VOL. I. 25
resolved upon making others do so likewise.
Having
adopted the notions of Rawlins as his own, he
was as rigid in their maintenance as he ever could
have been in that of a favourite text. He went into
a history of all the robberies and murders in the
county and in the neighbouring counties for the ten
previous years; connected them together by a
supposititious
train of circumstances, ascribed them all
to the same set of men, and concluded by declaring,
that the time was at length come for the
punishment
of the offenders; that the vengeance of God
was at length ripe; that the sword was unsheathed
to smite, and sharpened for destruction, and that
hethough this was rather left to the implication
of the hearerswas the appointed messenger of
wrath, who was at once to denounce the judgment
and carry it into execution. His resolution to obey
the commission which had been given him, was
followed
by a direct demand of Vernon's services, to
assist in carrying out his purposes, which he resolved
to begin forthwith.
Impossible, Mr. Badger, impossible! was the
reply of Vernon. I am not the master of my own
time, and can delay no longer than is absolutely
necessary
.
I must pursue my journey to-morrow, and
should have resumed it to-day, but that my thigh felt
too sore and stiff to justify the attempt to ride so soon
after my hurts.
Young man, would you fly from your duty?
demanded the other with solemnity.
No, sir, it is in the performance of my duties
that I would fly so soon from your hospitable
dwelling
.
I have occasions which command my haste
and attention elsewhere; and I propose to leave you,
at the rise of to-morrow's dawn, with the view to
their performance.
The elder was not to be gainsayed, and he showed
himself as tenacious on the present, as upon most
other occasions.
There can be no call so urgent, young man, as
that of our country; no duty so clearly necessary
as the detection and punishment of crime.
You forget, Mr. Badger, replied Vernon,
availing
himself of his own expressed opinions rather than
those which he really felt; you forget, Mr. Badger,
that I take a different view of these facts from
yourself
;
that I see not the same dangers, and do not
recognise
the same necessity; but, even were it
otherwise
,
I see not how I could assist you materially,
and acknowledge the presence of other, and as you
may think them, selfish obligations, which compel
me elsewhere. Should it occur that I may do any
thing to promote your wishes, I believe I may safely
assure you that you should not find me wanting.
We must even try to carry on the good work
without you, replied the other stiffly; and with this
the farther conference between the two ended. But
the reluctance of Vernon rather stimulated than
discouraged
the Methodist, who was always
strengthened
in purpose and performance by the increase of
his own personal responsibilities. Having despatched
a servant to summon his constable, Harvey, to his
presence, he proceeded to concoct his plans for
taking the outlaws, or, at least, breaking up their
nest in the Loosa-Chitta swamp, with more
earnestness
than secrecy. The arrival of Harvey enabled
him to issue the warrant against Yarbers for
horse-stealing
,
based upon the oath of Edward Mabry.
This knocks up your affair with Mary Stinson
for ever, Ned, was the consolatory remark
whispered
in the ears of the lover by his friend Rawlins,
as the warrant was given to the constable.
Well, I know itI don't care a d; I'll make
him sweat for his impudence, though it makes me
lose every thing.
Harvey, who was a stout fellow, of a bold heart
and well-tried honesty, was made a party to the
farther deliberations on the subject of the outlaws
of the neighbourhood, and so much time was
consumed
in the discussion of projects and difficulties,
that night came on ere he was permitted to depart
for the purpose of arresting Yarbers. This duty
was therefore deferred to the ensuing morning; but
that very night, a trusty messenger conveyed the
tidings of his danger to the horse thief, who left a
warm nest, but nothing in it, to reward the industry
of the constable, who returned to the magistrate
with another proof to the many commented on by
Rawlins, that there was some secret and sinister
influence
continually busy to find out his designs, and
defeat his warrants. Yarbers, who was neither
worse nor better than a squatter, before daylight
the next morning, was speeding on with bag and
baggage, wife and daughter, to a place of hiding
well known to all the beagles in the swamp.
But Vernon, though he refrained from yielding
himself to the importunities of Badger, had no such
indifference to his project, nor did he entertain those
doubts of the necessity of proceeding against the
outlaws which he yet professed. In his chamber
that night, alone with Rawlins, he declared himself
more fully.
I agree with you, Rawlins, in my doubts of the
integrity of this youth, Gideon Badger, and I have
as little faith in the judgment of his father. The
one would wilfully and dishonestly betray,the
other would commit the same fault through the
mere love of display and authority. I am pleased
at the reserve which you have shown, and will
requite
it by a degree of confidence which must move
you to increased reserve. What I do and say to
you, must, of all things, be most studiously kept from
this old man and his son; and, indeed, whatever
you propose to do in the case of these robbers, must
be also withheld, if you hope to be successful in your
projects. Your passionate friend, Mabry, too, should
have none of your confidence in such matters, for,
though honest enough, he lacks all discretion, and
would blow us in the first gust of phrensy that
happened
to seize upon him. See to that doorI heard
footstepsI speak for your ears only.
This done, and assured that there was none to
hear but Rawlins, Vernon proceeded to inform the
astounded woodman of those facts in the history of
the mystic brotherhood, and the flight of Clem
Foster from Alabama, and his probable presence in
the neighbourhood, all of which had been gathered
by him in his interview with the Governor of
Mississippi
.
We forbear the long detail, so
unnecessary
to us, and avoid repetition of the still longer
conversation which ensued between the two in
reference
to the subject, and the proper course to be
pursued by Rawlins in the management of the game
before him. Vernon studiously counselled the other
to forbear taking any active part in the affair, until
events had more completely developed the persons,
the aims, and the particular whereabouts of the
outlaws
.
In all circumstances he especially counselled
the sturdy woodmanwho already regarded him
as an oracle,while using the influence of William
Badger, on no account to admit his privity to any
plan which he might deem it advisable to pursue.
It may be that I shall be able to assist you in
person before many days. My present hope is to
accomplish the urgent business upon which I shall
set forth to-morrow, in time to fulfil the partial
promise which I made, on leaving Raymond, to the
Governor. But, at all events, I will provide you
with authority for your own action, which will
25*
strengthen your power, and confirm your influence
over your neighbours. Here is a commission, with
his Excellency's signature, which makes you a
captain over such a body of men as you may
gather together willing to obey your command.
Here, farther, is a small list of suspected persons.
To none of these should you extend your trust.
Some of the persons, perhaps, may be among your
acquaintance, and it would be advisable, however
well you may esteem them, to maintain towards
them the utmost reserve respecting all your plans.
I will write to his Excellency to-night, under an
assumed name, and leave the letter with you, to
despatch from the nearest post-office. The address
will be one already agreed upon between us, and he
will give you farther instructionsperhaps send to
you a special messengeras George Jenkinson.
You will answer to the name for a time, since it
would be unsafe to address you by your own. I
will also give you another letter to a friend, which
you will oblige me by despatching by the same post
as that which takes my letter to the Governor.
There are other matters upon which I will reflect
before sleeping to-night, which will, perhaps, enable
us to correspond while apart, and play this difficult
game with some good prospects of success. For
the present, let us separate, that there may be no
suspicions of the confidence between us.
That night Vernon prepared his letters for the
Governor, and his friend and patron, Carter. To the
former he detailed such a portion of his adventures,
and his brief experience at Zion's Hill, as would
enable him to form an idea of the material he had
to depend upon in the issue which, it was obvious
enough, was approaching fast between the outlaws
and the government. The merits of Walter
Rawlins
were set forth in proper language, and a list of
names, which had been furnished by the worthy
woodman, of persons to be relied on, was included
in the letter. To Carter he wrote a more
comprehensive
epistle, in which his fortunes from the
moment
of their separation, were described at large.
He did not fail to apprise him of the discovery,
which he thought himself to have made, of
Maitland
in the person of the traveller whom he had
rescued from the robbers. His hurt, slight as it
was, was spoken of even more slightingly than it
deserved; and he declared his ability and intention
to renew his pursuit on the morning following. His
language was full of hope and light-heartedness, his
tone being studiously assumed to encourage his
friend and patron. But it might have been remarked
that though Vernon spoke freely and fully of all
other matters, he yet found, on finishing the letter,
that he had said not a word on the subject of the
two daughtersor, rather, the one daughter of
Maitlandwho accompanied him. He was
reminded
,
on re-perusing the epistle, to say something
to supply this omission in the form of a postscript,
but finding that he had not room to say much, he
adopted the satisfactory determination to say
nothing
;
and so his labours closed for the night.
While the conference was going on between
Vernon and Rawlins, Gideon Badger was making
his way to the woods, where he found Saxon, Jones,
and another of the confederates. To them he
narrated
the discussion which had taken place, under
his father's lead, between the assembled company at
Zion's Hill.
This fellow, Mabry, said Saxon, will not
sleep soundly until he's knocked on the head. We
must send Yarbers off, for it won't do to kick up a
bobbery on his account. Mack, he continued,
addressing
the confederate hitherto unnamed, take
horse instantly for Yarberstell him what's going
on, and say from me, that we can do nothing for
him just now. Let him make tracks for Bear
Garden
before day peeps.
To hear was to obey. The fellow was off in the
twinkling of an eye, and Saxon continued thus:
What the devil shall we do to quiet your father,
Gideon? I am puzzled what to do with him.
Knock him on the head, too, was the answer
of Jones, if it's only to help Gideon to a little that
he ought to have, and rescue him from the straight
jacket of Methodism. Lord! Saxon, it's the most
funny thing in the world, to see the pompous old
parson, his round, red face looking forth from his
white neckcloth, and half fenced in by his high
shoulders and black cape, like a terrapin on a wet
log, meditating the ways and means for a Sunday
dinner, and Gideon, meek as a mouse in the corner
of a trap that has baffled all his efforts at escape,
patiently resigned to what is comingan evening
prayer and sermon three hours long, church
measure
cursing
in his heart, all the while, that sort of
heavenly unction which keeps him in a stew worse
than any ever known in hell. I have peeped in
once when I went to look after Gideon, and once
was enough. After that I never went nigher than
the garden fence, and there I gave the signal. That
sermon was quite enough to keep off any beagle of
any taste, and sure am I, that the old man had
better
begin to hunt us with a full mouth, such as he
had that day, than with a six pounder. We could
dodge the shot, but that sermon would be sure to
reach us wherever we might skulk. For my part,
let me be safe hidden in a hollow, and put Billy
Badger near by, well wound up for a long run, he'd
be sure to drive me out. I must stop my ears, or
let my heels go, for stand him ten minutes I neither
could nor would, for all that head or heels might be
worth. I'm clear, the shortest and best way for all
parties is to knock him on the head with Mabry.
We have good reason for thinking that Gideon
would never take up preaching as a trade, certainly
he cannot give us such prayers as his father; and
so the sooner the old man is gathered, the better for
the goodly seed which he leaves behind him.
Gideon, who was one of those goodly rogues that
like to keep up appearances even in situations
where hypocrisy seems to be the last thing
necessary
,
growled out something in reply to this, of an
angry savour; but Jones knew his man and
answered
:
Tut, tut, Gideon, you waste breath. You know
as well as I, that were the Lord in his mercyto
use the goodly phraseology of Zion's Hillto
summon
to his keeping the blessed head thereof, it
would be a call more grateful to his devout and
affectionate son Gideon, than any his ears ever
heard.
Enough, Jones, said the more considerate
Saxon
,
this talk, which Gideon may suppose you to
utter earnestly, brings us no nigher to our object.
Of course we should never think of doing hurt or
harm to any of the family of one who belongs to,
and acts with us, unless it became absolutely
necessary
to his and to our interests. The only course
which seems clear to me, if the old man gets up
his squad, which he will find it hard work to do, is
that we must skulk and run for it. That he can
neither find nor trouble us, is sufficiently certain.
Gideon, alone, as one of his band, will give us all
intelligence; and there is Cotton, Saunders, Furst,
Mason, Wilkes, and others, whom he will no doubt
muster with him, and who will tell us just when and
where the cat will jump, so that we may leave the
nest empty. We must leave you, Jones, to receive
notice from Gideon, whom you can see nightly, of
any thing that may be determined on, and this
intelligence
you must send by the quickest beagle you
can call up, so that we may know at Cane Castle
and Bear Garden what to look for and when. What
you tell me of this young fellow, Vernon, is the
most surprising of all. Can it be that I am mistaken
in the man? Is it possible that he is only going for
private business? But what business? It may be
the location of Yazoo lands; he may be another of
the mad fools who dream nothing but pre-emptions,
and fancy they are playing the great game to
themselves
,
while all the rest of the world is gaping and
looking on. You say you searched his baggage
and found no papers?
None. I emptied his portmanteau while he
slept on the sofa in the hall, and found nothing but a
few changes of linen, a vest, some handkerchiefs,
and half a dozen stockings. There was neither
letter nor writing.
Did you open the stockings?
No! I didn't think of that.
Ah! that was half doing the business only. But
you say that he not only objected to going with
your father, but doubted the truth of his
conjectures
.
Made light of itnay, laughed at it; and
concluded
by declaring his intention to resume his own
journey upward by to-morrow's sun.
I must meet with him. I must look into him
myself, said Saxon. I will join him on the road,
to-morrow, and he will be a keen lawyer, indeed, if
I do not probe his depth, and find out his secrets.
It may be that I am deceived, yet the circumstances
are all strong and strange. He may have laughed
at the Governor's fears as he laughed at Badger's;
and yet, after all, it may have been a private
speculation
only. Would I could have heard that
conversation
;
but regret is useless. We must make
up in skill the deficiencies of fortune, and make
ingenuity do that which necessity requires to be
done. If I do not sound him thoroughly to-morrow
we must call Justice Nawls to our assistance.
Much of this was spoken soliloquizingly; and
was, possibly, beyond the immediate comprehension
of his comrades. At its close, Gideon Badger
asked
Did you suffer the old man, Wilson, to get
off?
Yes:your blundering the day before, and the
death of Weston, persuaded me that it was proper
for us to do so, at least in this neighbourhood. I set
a hound on his track, however, so that we may
know where he earths, and what course he takes.
If he has any thing, we can easily cover him before
he touches the Tennessee line. But enough with
you to-night, Gideon. A dog will bark at the foot
of the garden at noon to-morrowlet him know
what the old man has done, or is about to do. Good
night.
The confederates separated; Saxon and his
companion
,
Jones, sinking into the deep woods beyond
the garden, and Gideon Badger, leaping the fence,
and taking a shorter way to the house. They had
fully gone from sight and hearingten minutes had
been allowed to elapse after their absencewhen
Rachel Morrison emerged from the cowering
attitude
in which she had crouched and found
concealment
in a thick body of young plum saplings, brier
and shrub shoots, that skirted the spot where the
conspirators had carried on their conference, and in
which she had heard every syllable that had been
uttered. Her cheeks were pale, very pale, when
she came forth from her place of concealment; her
form trembled with the crowding and conflicting
emotions of her soul; but her resolution, which had
brought her to the spot, and had kept her firm, and
above any of those apprehensions which afflict most
women, was still as strong and unyielding as at
first. Sick at heart, and sad, with a bitter sadness,
she was yet glad that she had so far conquered her
womanly fearsthe scruples of a nice, and in
ordinary
necessities a proper delicacyand had listened
to that cold, calculating conference of villany, in
which the fate of those to whom she was linked by
innumerable ties, was so intimately interested.
It is, then, true, all true, she exclaimed; even
as Mother Kerrison assured me, and as my own
fears were most ready to believe. Gideon Badger
is lostlost for ever; and my poor old uncleso
proud in himselfso confident of all around him
with such hope in his only sonwhat will be the
pang at his heartwhat the crushing and humbling
misery of his soul, when he shall hear of this? And
hear of it he must. Even if my lips remain closed
upon the subject, the truth will reach his ears at
last. There must come the hour of discovery, when
all will be known; and heGod strengthen and
sustain him in that dreadful hour! For me, for me,
what is left now? Shall I speak of what I have
seen and heard? Shall my lips declare these
dreadful
tidings, and my hands offer him the bitter cup of
desolation? No! no! I may notI must not. I
have not the strengthnot the heart for this. I
must contrive other means to prevent the utter ruin
of the one, and the heart-wasting desolation of the
other. God of Heaveneternal and preserving
Father, be with me this blessed night, and counsel
me in the fitting course, which shall defeat the
danger
,
and disarm the sting of this threatening sorrow.
To thy grace and saving mercy, Lord Jesus, I
commend myself, in this moment of doubt and
difficulty.
Never was prayer more humble and devout, and
offered with a more becoming sense and spirit,
than that of Rachel Morrison, kneeling among
the withered leaves, in the silence of the night, on
the edge of that deep, dim, and mournfully sighing
forest.
END OF VOL. I.